Leviticus

Chapter 1

1 Nowe the Lorde called Moses, and spake vnto him out of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and thou shalt say vnto them, If any of
you offer a sacrifice vnto the Lord, ye shall offer your sacrifice of cattell,
as of beeues and of the sheepe.
3 If his sacrifice be a burnt offering of the heard, he shall offer a male
without blemish, presenting him of his owne voluntarie will at the doore of the
Tabernacle of the Congregation before the Lorde.
4 And he shall put his hande vpon the head of the burnt offering, and it shalbe
accepted to the Lorde, to be his atonement.
5 And he shall kill the bullocke before the Lord, and the Priestes Aarons sonnes
shall offer the blood, and shal sprinckle it round about vpon the altar, that is
by the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
6 Then shall he fley the burnt offering, and cut it in pieces.
7 So the sonnes of Aaron the Priest shall put fire vpon the altar, and lay the
wood in order vpon the fire.
8 Then the Priestes Aarons sonnes shall lay the parts in order, the head & the
kall vpon the wood that is in the fire which is vpon the altar.
9 But the inwardes thereof and the legges thereof he shall wash in water, and
the Priest shal burne all on the altar: for it is a burnt offering, an oblation
made by fire, for a sweete sauour vnto the Lorde.
10 And if his sacrifice for the burnt offering be of the flocks (as of the
sheepe, or of the goats) he shall offer a male without blemish,
11 And he shall kill it on the Northside of the altar before the Lorde, and the
Priestes Aarons sonnes shall sprinckle the blood thereof rounde about vpon the
altar.
12 And he shall cut it in pieces, separating his head and his kall, and the
Priest shall lay them in order vpon the wood that lyeth in the fire which is on
the altar:
13 But he shall wash the inwardes, and the legges with water, and the Priest
shall offer the whole & burne it vpon the altar: for it is a burnt offering, an
oblation made by fire for a sweete sauour vnto the Lorde.
14 And if his sacrifice be a burnt offring to the Lord of ye foules, then he
shall offer his sacrifice of the turtle doues, or of the yong pigeons.
15 And the Priest shall bring it vnto the altar, and wring the necke of it
asunder, & burne it on the altar: and the blood thereof shall bee shed vpon the
side of the altar.
16 And he shall plucke out his maw with his fethers, and cast them beside the
altar on the East part in the place of the ashes.
17 And he shall cleaue it with his wings, but not deuide it asunder: and the
Priest shall burne it vpon the altar vpon the wood that is in the fire: for it
is a burnt offering, an oblation made by fire for a sweete sauour vnto the
Lorde.

Chapter 2

1 And when any will offer a meate offering vnto the Lorde, his offering shall be
of fine floure, and he shall powre oyle vpon it, and put incense thereon,
2 And shall bring it vnto Aarons sonnes the Priestes, and he shall take thence
his handfull of the flowre, and of the oyle with al the incense, and the Priest
shall burne it for a memoriall vpon the altar: for it is an offering made by
fire for a sweete sauour vnto the Lorde.
3 But the remnant of the meate offering shalbe Aarons and his sonnes: for it is
most holy of the Lordes offrings made by fire.
4 If thou bring also a meate offring baken in the ouen, it shalbe an vnleauened
cake of fine floure mingled with oyle, or an vnleauened wafer anointed with
oyle.
5 But if thy meate offring be an oblation of the frying pan, it shall be of fine
flowre vnleauened, mingled with oyle.
6 And thou shalt part it in pieces, and powre oyle thereon: for it is a meate
offring.
7 And if thy meate offring be an oblation made in the caldron, it shalbe made of
fine floure with oyle.
8 After, thou shalt bring the meate offering (that is made of these things) vnto
the Lord, and shalt present it vnto the Priest, and he shall bring it to the
altar,
9 And the Priest shall take from the meate offring a memoriall of it, and shall
burne it vpon the altar: for it is an oblation made by fire for a sweete sauour
vnto the Lord.
10 But that which is left of the meate offring, shalbe Aarons and his sonnes:
for it is most holy of the offrings of the Lorde made by fire.
11 All the meate offrings which ye shall offer vnto the Lorde, shalbe made
without leauen: for ye shall neither burne leauen nor honie in any offring of
the Lorde made by fire.
12 In the oblation of the first fruits ye shal offer them vnto the Lorde, but
they shall not be burnt vpon the altar for a sweete sauour.
13 (All the meate offrings also shalt thou season with salt, neither shalt thou
suffer the salt of the couenant of thy God to be lacking from thy meate offring,
but vpon all thine oblations thou shalt offer salt)
14 If then thou offer a meate offring of thy first fruites vnto the Lorde, thou
shalt offer for thy meate offering of thy first fruites eares of corne dryed by
the fire, and wheate beaten out of the greene eares.
15 After, thou shalt put oyle vpon it, and lay incense thereon: for it is a
meate offring.
16 And the Priest shall burne the memoriall of it, euen of that that is beaten,
and of the oyle of it, with all the incense thereof: for it is an offring vnto
the Lorde made by fire.

Chapter 3

1 Also if his oblation be a peace offering, if he will offer of the droue
(whether it be male or female) he shall offer such as is without blemish, before
the Lorde,
2 And shall put his hande vpon the head of his offering, and kill it at the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation: and Aarons sonnes the Priestes
shall sprinkle the blood vpon the altar rounde about.
3 So he shall offer part of the peace offerings as a sacrifice made by fire vnto
the Lorde, euen the fat that couereth the inwardes, and all the fat that is vpon
the inwardes.
4 He shall also take away the two kidneis, & the fat that is on them, and vpon
the flankes, and the kall on the liuer with the kidneis.
5 And Aarons sonnes shall burne it on the altar, with the burnt offering, which
is vpon the wood, that is on the fire: this is a sacrifice made by fire for a
sweete sauour vnto the Lorde.
6 Also if his oblation be a peace offring vnto the Lorde out of ye flocke,
whether it be male or female, he shall offer it without blemish.
7 If he offer a lambe for his oblation, then he shall bring it before the Lorde,
8 And lay his hand vpon the head of his offring, & shall kill it before the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, and Aarons sonnes shall sprinckle the blood
thereof round about vpon the altar.
9 After, of the peace offrings he shal offer an offring made by fire vnto the
Lord: he shall take away the fat therof, & the rump altogether, hard by the
backe bone, and the fat that couereth the inwardes, & all the fat that is vpon
the inwards.
10 Also hee shall take away the two kidneis, with the fat that is vpon them, &
vpon the flankes, and the kall vpon the liuer with the kidneis.
11 Then the Priest shall burne it vpon the altar, as the meat of an offring made
by fire vnto the Lord.
12 Also if his offring be a goate, then shal he offer it before the Lord,
13 And shall put his hande vpon the head of it, and kil it before the Tabernacle
of the Congregation, & the sonnes of Aaron shall sprinkle the blood thereof vpon
the altar round about.
14 Then he shall offer thereof his offring, euen an offring made by fire vnto
the Lorde, the fat that couereth the inwardes, and all the fatte that is vpon
the inwardes.
15 Also hee shall take away the two kidneis, and the fat that is vpon them, and
vpon ye flankes, and the kall vpon the liuer with the kidneis.
16 So the Priest shall burne them vpon the altar, as the meate of an offering
made by fire for a sweete sauour: all the fatte is the Lordes.
17 This shalbe a perpetual ordinance for your generations, throughout al your
dwellings, so that ye shall eate neither fatte nor blood.

Chapter 4

1 Moreouer the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, saying, If any shall sinne through
ignorance, in any of the commandementes of the Lord, (which ought not to be
done) but shall doe contrary to any of them,
3 If the Priest that is anointed doe sinne (according to the sinne of the
people) then shall he offer, for his sinne which hee hath sinned, a yong
bullocke without blemish vnto the Lorde for a sinne offring,
4 And hee shall bring the bullocke vnto the dore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation before the Lorde, and shall put his hande vpon the bullocks head,
and kill the bullocke before the Lorde.
5 And the Priest that is anointed shall take of the bullocks blood, and bring it
into the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
6 Then the Priest shall dippe his finger in the blood, & sprinkle of the blood
seuen times before the Lord, before the vaile of the Sanctuarie.
7 The Priest also shall put some of the blood before the Lord, vpon the hornes
of the altar of sweete incense, which is in the Tabernacle of the Congregatoin,
then shall hee powre all the rest of the blood of the bullocke at the foote of
the altar of burnt offring, which is at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
8 And hee shall take away all the fat of the bullocke for the sinne offring: to
wit, the fat that couereth the inwardes, and all the fatte that is about the
inwardes.
9 He shall take away also the two kidneis, and the fat that is vpon them, and
vpon the flankes, and the kall vpon the liuer with the kidneis,
10 As it was taken away from the bullock of the peace offrings, & the Priest
shall burne them vpon the altar of burnt offring.
11 But the skinne of the bullocke, and all his flesh, with his heade, and his
legs, and his inwardes, and his dung shal he beare out.
12 So he shall cary the whole bullocke out of the host vnto a cleane place,
where the ashes are powred, & shall burne him on ye wood in the fire: where ye
ashes are cast out, shal he be burnt.
13 And if the whole Congregation of Israel shall sinne through ignorance, and
the thing be hid from the eyes of the multitude, and haue done against any of
the commaundementes of the Lorde which should not be done, and haue offended:
14 When the sinne which they haue committed shalbe knowen, then the Congregation
shall offer a yong bullocke for the sinne, & bring him before the Tabernacle of
the Congregation,
15 And the Elders of the Congregation shal put their handes vpon the head of the
bullocke before the Lorde, and he shall kill the bullocke before the Lorde.
16 Then the Priest that is anointed, shall bring of the bullockes blood into the
Tabernacle of the Congregation,
17 And the Priest shall dip his finger in the blood, and sprinkle it seuen times
before the Lord, euen before the vaile.
18 Also he shall put some of ye blood vpon the hornes of the altar, which is
before the Lord, that is in the Tabernacle of the Congregation: then shall he
powre all the rest, of the blood at ye foote of the altar of burnt offring,
which is at the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
19 And he shall take all his fat from him, and burne it vpon the altar.
20 And the Priest shal doe with this bullocke, as he did with the bullocke for
his sinne: so shall he do with this: so the Priest shal make an atonement for
them, and it shalbe forgiuen them.
21 For he shal carie the bullocke without the hoste, and burne him as he burned
the first bullock: for it is an offring for the sinne of the Congregation.
22 When a ruler shal sinne, and do through ignorance against any of the
commaundementes of the Lorde his God, which should not be done, and shall
offend,
23 If one shewe vnto him his sinne, which he hath committed, the shall he bring
for his offring an hee goat without blemish,
24 And shall lay his hand vpon the heade of the he goate, and kill it in the
place where he should kill the burnt offring before the Lord: for it is a sinne
offring.
25 Then the Priest shall take of the blood of the sinne offring with his finger,
and put it vpon the hornes of the burnt offring altar, and shall powre the rest
of his blood at the foote of the burnt offring altar,
26 And shall burne all his fat vpon the altar, as the fat of the peace offring:
so the Priest shall make an atonement for him, concerning his sinne, and it
shalbe forgiuen him.
27 Likewise if any of the people of ye lande shall sinne through ignoraunce in
doing against any of the commandements of the Lord, which should not be done,
and shall offend,
28 If one shewe him his sinne which he hath committed, then he shall bring for
his offring, a shee goate without blemish for his sinne which he hath committed,
29 And he shall lay his hand vpon the head of the sinne offring, and slay the
sinne offring in the place of burnt offring.
30 Then the Priest shall take of the blood thereof with his finger, and put it
vpon the hornes of the burnt offring altar, & powre all the rest of the blood
thereof at the foote of the altar,
31 And shall take away all his fat, as the fat of the peace offringes is taken
away, and the Priest shall burne it vpon the altar for a sweete sauour vnto the
Lorde, and the Priest shall make an atonement for him, and it shalbe forgiuen
him.
32 And if he bring a lambe for his sinne offring, he shall bring a female
without blemish,
33 And shall lay his hand vpon the head of the sinne offring, and hee shall slay
it for a sinne offring in the place where hee shoulde kill the burnt offring.
34 Then the Priest shall take of the blood of the sinne offring with his finger,
and put it vpon the hornes of the burnt offring altar, and shall powre al the
rest of the blood thereof at the foote of the altar.
35 And he shall take away all the fat thereof, as the fatte of the lambe of the
peace offrings is taken away: then the Priest shall burne it vpon the altar with
the oblations of the Lord made by fire, and the Priest shall make an atonement
for him concerning his sinne that he hath committed, and it shalbe forgiuen him.

Chapter 5

1 Also if any haue sinned, that is, If he haue heard the voyce of an othe, and
hee can be a witnes, whether he hath seene or knowen of it, if hee doe not vtter
it, he shall beare his iniquitie:
2 Either if one touche any vncleane thing, whether it be a carion of an vncleane
beast, or a carion of vncleane cattel, or a carion of vncleane creeping things,
and is not ware of it, yet he is vncleane, and hath offended:
3 Eyther if hee touche any vncleannesse of man (whatsoeuer vncleannes it be,
that hee is defiled with) and is not ware of it, and after commeth to the
knowledge of it, he hath sinned:
4 Either if any sweare and pronounce with his lippes to do euill, or to doe good
(whatsoeuer it bee that a man shall pronounce with an othe) and it be hid from
him, and after knoweth that he hath offended in one of these poyntes,
5 Whe he hath sinned in any of these things, then he shal confesse that he hath
sinned therein.
6 Therefore shall he bring his trespasse offring vnto the Lord for his sinne
which he hath committed, euen a female from ye flocke, be it a lambe or a she
goat for a sinne offring, and the Priest shall make an atonement for him,
concerning his sinne.
7 But if he be not able to bring a sheepe, he shall bring for his trespas which
he hath committed, two turtle doues, or two yong pigeons vnto the Lord, one for
a sinne offring, and the other for a burnt offring.
8 So he shall bring them vnto the Priest, who shall offer the sinne offring
first, and wring the necke of it a sunder, but not plucke it cleane off.
9 After he shall sprinkle of the blood of the sinne offring vpon the side of the
altar, and the rest of the blood shall be shed at the foote of the altar: for it
is a sinne offering.
10 Also he shall offer the seconde for a burnt offring as the maner is: so shall
the Priest make an atonement for him (for his sinne which hee hath committed)
and it shalbe forgiuen him.
11 But if he be not able to bring two turtle doues, or two yong pigeons, then he
that hath sinned, shall bring for his offring, the tenth parte of an Ephah of
fine floure for a sinne offring, he shall put none oyle thereto, neither put any
incense thereon: for it is a sinne offering.
12 Then shall hee bring it to the Priest, and the Priest shall take his handfull
of it for the remembrance thereof, and burne it vpon the altar with the offrings
of the Lorde made by fire: for it is a sinne offring.
13 So the Priest shal make an atonement for him, as touching his sinne that he
hath committed in one of these poyntes, and it shall bee forgiuen him: and the
remnant shalbe the Priests, as the meate offring.
14 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
15 If any person transgresse & sinne through ignorance by taking away things
consecrated vnto the Lorde, hee shall then bring for his trespasse offring vnto
the Lorde a ramme without blemish out of the flocke, worth two shekels of siluer
by thy estimation after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, for a trespasse offring.
16 So hee shall restore that wherein hee hath offended, in taking away of the
holy thing, and shall put the fift part more thereto, and giue it vnto the
Priest: so the Priest shal make an atonement for him with the ram of ye
trespasse offring, and it shalbe forgiuen him.
17 Also if any sinne and doe against any of the commaundementes of the Lorde,
which ought not to be done, and knowe not and sinne and beare his iniquitie,
18 Then shall he bring a ramme without blemishe out of the flocke, in thy
estimation worth two shekels for a trespasse offring vnto ye Priest: and the
Priest shall make an atonement for him concerning his ignorance wherein he
erred, and was not ware: so it shalbe forgiuen him.
19 This is the trespasse offring for the trespasse committed against the Lord.

Chapter 6

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 If any sinne and commit a trespasse against the Lorde, and denie vnto his
neighbour that, which was take him to keepe, or that which was put to him of
trust, or doth by robberie, or by violence oppresse his neighbour,
3 Or hath found that which was lost, and denieth it, and sweareth falsely, for
any of these things that a man doeth, wherein he sinneth:
4 When, I say, he thus sinneth & trespasseth, he shall then restore the robbery
that he robbed, or the thing taken by violence which hee tooke by force, or the
thing which was deliuered him to keepe, or the lost thing which he founde,
5 Or for whatsoeuer he hath sworne falsely, he shall both restore it in the
whole summe, and shall adde the fift parte more thereto, and giue it vnto him to
whome perteyneth, the same day that he offreth for trespasse.
6 Also he shall bring for his trespasse vnto the Lorde, a ramme without blemish
out of the flocke in thy estimation worth two shekels for a trespasse offring
vnto the Priest.
7 And the Priest shall make an atonement for him before the Lorde, and it shall
be forgiuen him, whatsoeuer thing he hath done, and trespassed therein.
8 Then the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
9 Commaund Aaron and his sonnes, saying, This is the lawe of the burnt offring,
(it is the burnt offring because it burneth vpon the altar al the night vnto the
morning, and the fire burneth on the altar)
10 And the Priest shall put on his linen garment, and shall put on his linen
breeches vpon his flesh, and take away the ashes when the fire hath consumed the
burnt offring vpon the altar, and he shall put them beside the altar.
11 After, he shal put off his garments, and put on other raiment, and cary the
ashes foorth without the hoste vnto a cleane place.
12 But the fire vpon the altar shall burne thereon and neuer be put out:
wherefore the Priest shall burne wood on it euery morning, and lay the burnt
offering in order vpon it, and he shall burne thereon the fat of the peace
offrings.
13 The fire shall euer burne vpon the altar, and neuer go out.
14 Also this is the lawe of the meate offring, which Aarons sonnes shall offer
in the presence of the Lorde, before the altar.
15 He shall euen take thence his handfull of fine flowre of the meate offring
and of the oyle, & all the incense which is vpon the meat offring, and shall
burne it vpon the altar for a sweete sauour, as a memoriall therefore vnto the
Lorde:
16 But the rest thereof shall Aaron and his sonnes eate: it shalbe eaten without
leauen in the holy place: in the court of the Tabernacle of the Congregation
they shall eate it.
17 It shall not be baken with leauen: I haue giuen it for their portion of mine
offrings made by fire: for it is as the sinne offering and as the trespasse
offring.
18 All the males among the children of Aaron shall eate of it: It shalbe a
statute for euer in your generations concerning the offrings of the Lord, made
by fire: whatsoeuer toucheth them shall be holy.
19 Agayne the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
20 This is the offering of Aaron & his sonnes, which they shall offer vnto the
Lorde in the day when he is anointed: the tenth part of an Ephah of fine floure,
for a meate offering perpetuall: halfe of it in ye morning, & halfe thereof at
night.
21 In the frying panne it shalbe made with oyle: thou shalt bring it fryed, and
shalt offer the baken pieces of the meate offering for a sweete sauour vnto the
Lorde.
22 And the Priest that is anointed in his steade, among his sonnes shall offer
it: It is the Lordes ordinance for euer, it shall be burnt altogether.
23 For euery meate offring of the Priest shall be burnt altogether, it shall not
be eaten.
24 Furthermore, the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
25 Speake vnto Aaron, and vnto his sonnes, and say, This is the Lawe of the
sinne offering, In the place where the burnt offring is killed, shall the sinne
offring be killed before the Lord, for it is most holy.
26 The Priest that offreth this sinne offring, shall eate it: in the holy place
shall it be eaten, in the court of ye Tabernacle of the Congregation.
27 Whatsoeuer shall touch the flesh thereof shalbe holy: & when there droppeth
of the blood thereof vpon a garment, thou shalt wash that whereon it droppeth in
the holy place.
28 Also the earthen pot that it is sodden in, shalbe broken, but if it be sodden
in a brasen pot, it shall both be scoured and washed with water.
29 All the males among the Priestes shal eate thereof, for it is most holy.
30 But no sinne offering, whose blood is brought into the Tabernacle of the
Congregation to make reconciliation in the holy place, shalbe eaten, but shalbe
burnt in the fire.

Chapter 7

1 Likewise this is the lawe of the trespasse offering, it is most holy.
2 In the place where they kill the burnt offering, shall they kill the trespasse
offering, and the blood thereof shall he sprinkle rounde about vpon the altar.
3 All the fat thereof also shall he offer, the rumpe, and the fat that couereth
the inwardes.
4 After he shall take away the two kidneis, with the fat that is on them & vpon
the flankes, and the kall on the liuer with the kidneis.
5 Then the Priest shall burne them vpon the altar, for an offring made by fire
vnto the Lorde: this is a trespasse offring.
6 All the males among the Priestes shall eate thereof, it shalbe eaten in the
holy place, for it is most holy.
7 As the sinne offring is, so is the trespasse offring, one lawe serueth for
both: that wherewith the Priest shall make atonement, shalbe his.
8 Also the Priest that offereth any mans burnt offring, shall haue the skinne of
the burnt offring which he hath offered.
9 And all the meate offring that is baken in the ouen, and that is dressed in
the pan, and in the frying pan, shall be the Priestes that offereth it.
10 And euery meate offering mingled with oyle, and that is dry, shall pertaine
vnto all the sonnes of Aaron, to all alike.
11 Furthermore, this is the lawe of the peace offrings, which he shall offer
vnto the Lorde.
12 If he offer it to giue thankes, then he shal offer for his thankes offering,
vnleauened cakes mingled with oyle, and vnleauened wafers anointed with oyle,
and fine floure fryed with the cakes mingled with oyle.
13 He shall offer also his offring with cakes of leauened bread, for his peace
offrings, to giue thankes.
14 And of all the sacrifice he shall offer one cake for an heaue offering vnto
the Lorde, and it shalbe the Priestes that sprinckleth the blood of the peace
offrings.
15 Also the flesh of his peace offerings, for thankesgiuing, shalbe eaten the
same day that it is offered: he shall leaue nothing thereof vntill the morning.
16 But if the sacrifice of his offring be a vow, or a free offering, it shalbe
eaten the same day that he offreth his sacrifice: and so in the morning the
residue thereof shalbe eaten.
17 But as much of the offered flesh as remaineth vnto the third day, shalbe
burnt with fire.
18 For if any of the flesh of his peace offrings be eaten in the third day, he
shall not be accepted that offereth it, neither shall it be reckoned vnto him,
but shalbe an abomination: therefore ye person that eateth of it shall beare his
iniquitie.
19 The flesh also that toucheth any vncleane thing, shall not be eaten, but
burnt with fire: but of this flesh all that be cleane shal eate thereof.
20 But if any eate of the flesh of the peace offerings that pertaineth to the
Lorde, hauing his vncleannesse vpon him, euen the same person shalbe cut off
from his people.
21 Moreouer, whe any toucheth any vncleane thing, as the vncleannesse of man, or
of an vncleane beast, or of any filthie abomination, and eate of the flesh of
the peace offrings, which pertaineth vnto the Lorde, euen that person shalbe cut
off from his people.
22 Againe ye Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
23 Speake vnto the children of Israel, & say, Ye shall eate no fat of beeues,
nor of sheepe, nor of goates:
24 Yet the fat of the dead beast, and the fat of that, which is torne with
beastes, shalbe occupied to any vse, but ye shall not eate of it.
25 For whosoeuer eateth the fat of the beast, of the which he shall offer an
offering made by fire to the Lorde, euen the person that eateth, shalbe cut off
from his people.
26 Neither shall ye eate any blood, either of foule, or of beast in all your
dwellings.
27 Euery person that eateth any blood, euen the same person shall be cut off
from his people.
28 And the Lord talked with Moses, saying,
29 Speake vnto the children of Israel, & say, Hee that offereth his peace
offerings vnto the Lorde, shall bring his gifte vnto the Lorde of his peace
offerings:
30 His handes shall bring the offerings of the Lorde made by fire: euen the
fatte with the breast shall he bring, that the breast may be shaken to and fro
before the Lorde.
31 Then the Priest shall burne the fatte vpon the Altar, and the breast shall be
Aarons and his sonnes.
32 And the right shoulder shall ye giue vnto the Priest for an heaue offering,
of your peace offrings.
33 The same that offreth the blood of ye peace offrings, and the fatte, among
the sonnes of Aaron, shall haue the right shoulder for his parte.
34 For the breast shaken to and fro, and the shoulder lifted vp, haue I taken of
the children of Israel, euen of their peace offrings, and haue giuen them vnto
Aaron the Priest and vnto his sonnes by a statute for euer from among the
children of Israel.
35 This is the anointing of Aaron, & the anointing of his sonnes, concerning the
offerings of the Lord made by fire, in the day when he presented them to serue
in the Priestes office vnto the Lorde.
36 The which portions the Lorde commanded to giue them in the day that he
anointed them from among the children of Israel, by a statute for euer in their
generations.
37 This is also the lawe of the burnt offring of the meate offring, and of the
sinne offring, and of the trespasse offring, and of the consecrations, and of
the peace offrings,
38 Which the Lorde commaunded Moses in the mount Sinai, when he commanded the
children of Israel to offer their giftes vnto the Lorde in the wildernesse of
Sinai.

Chapter 8

1 Afterwarde the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Take Aaron and his sonnes with him, and the garments and the anointing oyle,
and a bullocke for the sinne offring, & two rammes, and a basket of vnleauened
bread,
3 And assemble all the company at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
4 So Moses did as the Lord had commanded him, & the companie was assembled at
the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
5 Then Moses said vnto the company, This is the thing which the Lorde hath
commaunded to doe.
6 And Moses brought Aaron and his sonnes, and washed them with water,
7 And put vpon him the coate, and girded him with a girdle, & clothed him with
the robe, and put the Ephod on him, which he girded with the broydred garde of
the Ephod, and bounde it vnto him therewith.
8 After he put the brest plate thereon, and put in the breast plate the Vrim and
the Thummim.
9 Also he put the miter vpon his head, and put vpon the miter on the fore front
the golden plate, and the holy crowne, as the Lorde had commanded Moses.
10 (Nowe Moses had taken the anointing oyle, and anoynted the Tabernacle, and al
that was therein, and sanctified them,
11 And sprinkled thereof vpon the altar seuen times, and anointed the altar and
all his instruments, and the lauer, and his foote, to sanctifie them)
12 And he powred of the anointing oyle vpon Aarons head, and anointed him, to
sanctifie him.
13 After, Moses brought Aarons sonnes, and put coates vpon them, and girded them
with girdles, and put bonets vpon their heades, as the Lorde had commanded
Moses.
14 Then he brought the bullocke for the sinne offring, and Aaron and his sonnes
put their handes vpon the head of the bullocke for the sinne offring.
15 And Moses slew him, and tooke the blood, which he put vpon the hornes of the
Altar roud about with his finger, and purified the altar, & powred the rest of
the blood at the foote of ye altar: so he sanctified it, to make reconciliation
vpon it.
16 Then he tooke all the fatte that was vpon the inwardes, and the kall of the
liuer and the two kidneis, with their fat, which Moses burned vpon the Altar.
17 But the bullocke and his hide, and his flesh, and his doung, hee burnt with
fire without the host as the Lord had commanded Moses.
18 Also hee brought the ram for the burnt offring, and Aaron and his sonnes put
their hands vpon the head of the ramme.
19 So Moses killed it, and sprinkled the blood vpon the Altar round about,
20 And Moses cut the ram in pieces, & burnt the head with the pieces, and the
fat,
21 And washed the inwardes and the legges in water: so Moses burnt the ram euery
whit vpon ye Altar: for it was a burnt offring for a sweete sauour, which was
made by fire vnto the Lord, as the Lord had commanded Moses.
22 After, he brought the other ram, the ram of consecrations, and Aaron and his
sonnes layed their handes vpon the head of the ram,
23 Which Moses slewe, and tooke of the blood of it, and put it vpon the lappe of
Aarons right eare, & vpon the thumbe of his right hand, and vpon the great toe
of his right foote.
24 Then Moses brought Aarons sonnes, and put of the blood on the lap of their
right eares, and vpon the thumbes of their right handes, and vpon the great toes
of their right feete, and Moses sprinckled the rest of the blood vpon the Altar
round about.
25 And he tooke the fat & the rumpe and all the fat that was vpon the inwards,
and the kall of the liuer, and the two kidneis with their fat, & the right
shoulder.
26 Also he tooke of ye basket of ye vnleauened bread that was before the Lorde,
one vnleauened cake and a cake of oiled bread, & one wafer, and put them on the
fat, & vpon the right shoulder.
27 So hee put all in Aarons handes, and in his sonnes handes, and shooke it to
and fro before the Lord.
28 After, Moses tooke the out of their hands, & burnt them vpon the altar for a
burnt offring: for these were consecrations for a sweete sauour which were made
by fire vnto the Lord.
29 Likewise Moses tooke the breast of the ram of consecrations, & shooke it to
and fro before the Lord: for it was Moses portion, as the Lord had commanded
Moses.
30 Also Moses tooke of the anointing oyle, and of the blood which was vpon the
Altar, and sprinkled it vpon Aaron, vpon his garments, and vpon his sonnes, and
on his sonnes garments with him: so hee sanctified Aaron, his garments, & his
sonnes, and his sonnes garments with him.
31 Afterward Moses saide vnto Aaron and his sonnes, Seethe the flesh at the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation, & there eate it with the bread that
is in the basket of consecrations, as I commanded, saying, Aaron and his sonnes
shall eate it,
32 But that which remaineth of the flesh and of the bread, shall ye burne with
fire.
33 And ye shall not depart from the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation
seuen dayes, vntill the dayes of your consecrations bee at an ende: for seuen
dayes, saide the Lorde, shall hee consecrate you,
34 As hee hath done this day: so the Lorde hath commanded to doe, to make an
atonement for you.
35 Therefore shall yee abide at the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation
day and night, seuen dayes, and shall keepe the watch of the Lord, that ye dye
not: for so I am commanded.
36 So Aaron and his sonnes did all thinges which the Lorde had commanded by the
hand of Moses.

Chapter 9

1 And in the eight day Moses called Aaron and his sonnes, and the Elders of
Israel:
2 Then hee sayde vnto Aaron, Take thee a yong calfe for a sinne offring, and a
ram for a burnt offring, both without blemish, and bring them before the Lord.
3 And vnto the children of Israel thou shalt speake, saying, Take yee an hee
goate for a sinne offring, and a calfe, and a lambe, both of a yeere olde,
without blemish for a burnt offring:
4 Also a bullock, and a ramme for peace offringes, to offer before the Lorde,
and a meate offring mingled with oyle: for to day the Lorde will appeare vnto
you.
5 Then they brought that which Moses commanded before the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, and all the assembly drewe neere and stood before the Lord.
6 (For Moses had sayde, This is the thing, which the Lord commaunded that ye
should do, and the glory of the Lord shal appeare vnto you)
7 Then Moses sayd vnto Aaron, Draw neere to the Altar, and offer thy sinne
offering, and thy burnt offring, and make an attonement for thee and for the
people: offer also the offring of the people, and make an atonement for them, as
the Lord hath commaunded.
8 Aaron therefore went vnto the Altar, and killed the calfe of the sinne
offring, which was for himselfe.
9 And the sonnes of Aaron brought ye blood vnto him, and he dipt his finger in
the blood, and put it vpon the hornes of the Altar, and powred the rest of the
blood at the foote of the Altar.
10 But the fat and the kidneis and the kall of the liuer of the sinne offring,
he burnt vpon the Altar, as the Lord had commaunded Moses.
11 The flesh also and the hide hee burnt with fire without the hoste.
12 After, he slewe the burnt offering, and Aarons sonnes brought vnto him the
blood, which he sprinckled round about vpon the Altar.
13 Also they brought the burnt offring vnto him with the pieces thereof, and the
head, and he burnt them vpon the Altar.
14 Likewise he did wash the inwardes and the legs, and burnt them vpon the burnt
offring on the Altar.
15 Then he offred the peoples offring, and tooke a goate, which was the sinne
offring for the people, and slewe it: and offred it for sinne, as the first:
16 So he offred the burnt offring, and prepared it, according to the maner.
17 He presented also the meate offring, & filled his hand thereof, and beside
the burnt sacrifice of the morning he burnt this vpon the Altar.
18 He slewe also the bullock, and the ram for the peace offrings, that was for
the people, and Arons sonnes brought vnto him the blood, which he sprinkled vpon
the Altar round about,
19 With the fat of the bullocke, and of the ram, the rumpe, and that which
couereth the inwards and the kidneis, and the kall of the liuer.
20 So they layed the fat vpon the breasts, and he burnt the fat vpon the Altar.
21 But the breastes and the ryght shoulder Aaron shooke to and fro before the
Lord, as the Lord had commaunded Moses.
22 So Aaron lift vp his hand toward the people, and blessed them, and came downe
from offring of the sinne offring, and the burnt offring, and the peace
offrings.
23 After, Moses and Aaron went into the Tabernacle of the Congregation, and came
out, and blessed the people, and the glorie of the Lord appeared to all the
people.
24 And there came a fire out from the Lord and consumed vpon the Altar the burnt
offring and the fatte: which when all the people sawe, they gaue thankes, and
fell on their faces.

Chapter 10

1 Bvt Nadab and Abihu, the sonnes of Aaron, tooke either of them his censor, and
put fire therein, and put incense thereupon, and offred strange fire before the
Lorde, which hee had not commaunded them.
2 Therefore a fire went out from the Lord, & deuoured them: so they dyed before
the Lord.
3 Then Moses sayde vnto Aaron, This is it that the Lord spake, saying, I will
bee sanctified in the that come neere me, & before all the people I will be
glorified: but Aaron held his peace.
4 And Moses called Mishael and Elzaphan the sonnes of Vzziel, the vncle of
Aaron, & saide vnto them, Come neere, cary your brethre from before the
Sanctuarie out of the hoste.
5 Then they went, and caried them in their coates out of the host, as Moses had
comaunded.
6 After, Moses saide vnto Aaron and vnto Eleazar & Ithamar his sonnes, Vncouer
not your heads, neither rent your clothes, least ye dye, and least wrath come
vpon all ye people: but let your brethren, all the house of Israel bewayle the
burning which the Lorde hath kindled.
7 And go not yee out from the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation, least
ye dye: for the anointing oyle of the Lorde is vpon you: and they did according
to Moses commaundement.
8 And the Lorde spake vnto Aaron, saying,
9 Thou shalt not drinke wine nor strong drinke, thou, nor thy sonnes with thee,
when yee come into the Tabernacle of the Congregation, lest ye die: this is an
ordinance for euer throughout your generations,
10 That ye may put difference betweene the holy and the vnholy, and betweene the
cleane and the vncleane,
11 And that ye may teach the children of Israel all the statutes which the Lorde
hath commaunded them by the hand of Moses.
12 Then Moses saide vnto Aaron and vnto Eleazar and to Ithamar his sonnes that
were left, Take the meate offring that remaineth of the offrings of the Lorde,
made by fire, and eate it without leauen beside ye altar: for it is most holy:
13 And ye shall eate it in the holy place, because it is thy duetie and thy
sonnes duety of the offringes of the Lorde made by fire: for so I am commannded.
14 Also the shaken breast and the heaue shoulder shall yee eate in a cleane
place: thou, and thy sonnes, and thy daughters with thee: for they are giuen as
thy duetie & thy sonnes duety, of the peace offringes of the children of Israel.
15 The heaue shoulder, and the shaken breast shall they bring with the offringes
made by fire of the fat, to shake it to and fro before the Lord, and it shalbe
thine and thy sonnes with thee by a lawe for euer, as the Lord hath commaunded.
16 And Moses sought the goate that was offred for sinne, and lo, it was burnt:
therefore he was angrie with Eleazar and Ithamar the sonnes of Aaron, which were
left aliue, saying,
17 Wherfore haue ye not eaten the sinne offring in the holy place, seeing it is
most Holie? & God hath giuen it you, to beare the iniquitie of the Congregation,
to make an atonement for them before the Lorde.
18 Beholde, the blood of it was not brought within the holy place: ye should
haue eaten it in the holy place, as I commaunded.
19 And Aaron said vnto Moses, Behold, this day haue they offred their sinne
offring, and their burnt offring before the Lorde, and such things as thou
knowest are come vnto mee: If I had eaten the sinne offring to day, should it
haue bene accepted in the sight of the Lord?
20 So when Moses heard it, he was content.

Chapter 11

1 After, the Lord spake vnto Moses and to Aaron, saying vnto them,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say, These are the beastes which yee
shall eate, among all the beasts that are on the earth.
3 Whatsoeuer parteth the hoofe, and is clouen footed, and cheweth the cudde,
among the beastes, that shall ye eate.
4 But of them that chewe the cud, or deuide the hoofe onely, of them yee shall
not eate: as the camel, because he cheweth the cud, & deuideth not ye hoofe, he
shall be vncleane vnto you.
5 Likewise the conie, because he cheweth the cud and deuideth not the hoofe, he
shall bee vncleane to you.
6 Also the hare, because he cheweth the cud, and deuideth not the hoofe, he
shalbe vncleane to you.
7 And the swine, because he parteth ye hoofe and is clouen footed, but cheweth
not the cud, he shalbe vncleane to you.
8 Of their flesh shall yee not eate, and their carkeise shall yee not touch: for
they shall bee vncleane to you.
9 These shall ye eate, of all that are in the waters: whatsoeuer hath finnes &
skales in ye waters, in the seas, or in the riuers, them shal ye eate.
10 But all that haue not finnes nor skales in the seas, or in the riuers, of all
that moueth in the waters, and of al liuing things that are in the waters, they
shalbe an abomination vnto you.
11 They, I say, shalbe an abomination to you: ye shall not eate of their flesh,
but shall abhorre their carkeis.
12 Whatsoeuer hath not fins nor skales in the waters, that shalbe abomination
vnto you.
13 These shal ye haue also in abomination among the foules, they shal not be
eaten: for they are an abomination, the egle, and the goshauke, and the osprey:
14 Also the vultur, & the kite after his kinde,
15 And all rauens after their kinde:
16 The ostrich also, and the night crowe, and the seameaw, and the hauke after
his kinde:
17 The litle owle also, and the connorant, and the great owle.
18 Also the redshanke and the pelicane, and the swanne:
19 The storke also, the heron after his kinde, and the lapwing, and the backe:
20 Also euery foule that creepeth & goeth vpon all foure, such shalbe an
abomination vnto you.
21 Yet these shal ye eate: of euery foule that creepeth, and goeth vpon all
foure which haue their feete and legs all of one to leape withal vpon the earth,
22 Of them ye shal eate these, the grashopper after his kinde, & the solean
after his kinde, the hargol after his kinde, & the hagab after his kind.
23 But al other foules that creepe & haue foure feete, they shalbe abomination
vnto you.
24 For by such ye shalbe polluted: whosoeuer toucheth their carkeis, shalbe
vncleane vnto the euening.
25 Whosoeuer also beareth of their carkeis, shal wash his clothes, and be
vncleane vntil euen.
26 Euery beast that hath clawes deuided, and is not clouen footed, nor cheweth
the cud, such shalbe vncleane vnto you: euery one that toucheth them, shalbe
vncleane.
27 And whatsoeuer goeth vpon his pawes among all maner beastes that goeth on all
foure, such shalbe vncleane vnto you: who so doth touch their carkeis shalbe
vncleane vntil the euen.
28 And he that beareth their carkeis, shal wash his clothes, and be vncleane
vntill the euen: for such shalbe vncleane vnto you.
29 Also these shalbe vncleane to you amog the things that creepe and moue vpon
the earth, the weasell, and the mouse, and the frog, after his kinde:
30 Also the rat, and the lizard, and the chameleon, and the stellio, and the
molle.
31 These shall be vncleane to you among all that creepe: whosoeuer doeth touch
them when they be dead, shalbe vncleane vntil the euen.
32 Also whatsoeuer any of the dead carkeises of them doth fall vpon, shalbe
vncleane, whether it be vessel of wood, or rayment, or skinne, or sacke:
whatsoeuer vessel it be that is occupied, it shalbe put in the water as vncleane
vntil the euen, and so be purified.
33 But euery earthen vessel, whereinto any of them falleth, whatsoeuer is within
it shalbe vncleane, and ye shal breake it.
34 Al meate also that shalbe eaten, if any such water come vpon it, shalbe
vncleane: & all drinke that shalbe drunke in al such vessels shalbe vncleane.
35 And euery thing that their carkeis fall vpon, shalbe vncleane: the fornais or
the pot shalbe broken: for they are vncleane, & shalbe vncleane vnto you.
36 Yet the fountaines and welles where there is plentie of water shalbe cleane:
but that which toucheth their carkeises shalbe vncleane.
37 And if there fal of their dead carkeis vpo any seede, which vseth to be sowe,
it shalbe cleane.
38 But if any water be powred vpon ye seede, and there fal of their dead carkeis
thereon, it shal be vncleane vnto you.
39 If also any beast, whereof ye may eate, die, he that toucheth the carkeis
thereof shal be vncleane vntil the euen.
40 And he that eateth of the carkeis of it, shal wash his clothes and be
vncleane vntil the euen: he also that beareth the carkeis of it, shal wash his
clothes, and be vncleane vntil the euen.
41 Euery creeping thing therefore that creepeth vpon the earth shalbe an
abomination, and not be eaten.
42 Whatsoeuer goeth vpon the breast, and whatsoeuer goeth vpon al foure, or that
hath many feete among all creeping thinges that creepe vpon the earth, ye shal
not eate of them, for they shalbe abomination.
43 Ye shall not pollute your selues with any thing that creepeth, neither make
your selues vncleane with them, neither defile your selues thereby: ye shal not,
I say, be defiled by them,
44 For I am the Lord your God: be sanctified therefore, and be holy, for I am
holy, and defile not your selues with any creeping thing, that creepeth vpon the
earth.
45 For I am the Lorde that brought you out of the lande of Egypt, to be your
God, and that you should be holy, for I am holy.
46 This is the law of beasts, and of foules, and of euery liuing thing that
moueth in the waters, and of euery thing that creepeth vpon the earth:
47 That there may be a difference betweene the vncleane and cleane, and betweene
the beast that may be eaten, and the beast that ought not to be eaten.

Chapter 12

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say, When a woman hath brought forth
seede, & borne a manchilde, shee shalbe vncleane seuen dayes, like as she is
vncleane when she is put apart for her disease.
3 (And in the eight day, the foreskin of the childes flesh shalbe circumcised)
4 And she shal continue in the blood of her purifying three and thirtie dayes:
she shal touch no halowed thing, nor come into the Sanctuarie, vntil the time of
her purifying be out.
5 But if she beare a mayde childe, then shee shalbe vncleane two weekes, as when
shee hath her disease: and she shal continue in the blood of her purifying three
score and sixe dayes.
6 Nowe when the dayes of her purifying are out, (whether it be for a sonne or
for a daughter) shee shal bring to the Priest a lambe of one yeere olde for a
burnt offering, and a yong pigeon or a turtle doue for a sinne offring, vnto the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
7 Who shal offer it before the Lord, & make an atonement for her: so she shalbe
purged of the issue of her blood this is the law for her that hath borne a male
or female.
8 But if she bee not able to bring a lambe, she shall bring two turtles, or two
yong pigeons: the one for a burnt offring, and the other for a sinne offring:
and the Priest shall make an atonement for her: so she shal be cleane.

Chapter 13

1 Moreouer the Lorde spake vnto Moses, and to Aaron, saying,
2 The man that shall haue in the skin of his flesh a swelling or a skab, or a
white spot, so that in the skinne of his flesh it be like the plague of
leprosie, then he shalbe brought vnto Aaron the Priest, or vnto one of his
sonnes the Priestes,
3 And the Priest shall looke on the sore in the skinne of his flesh: if the
heare in the sore be turned into white, and the sore seeme to be lower then the
skinne of his flesh, it is a plague of leprosie. Therefore the Priest shall
looke on him, and pronounce him vncleane:
4 But if the white spot be in the skinne of his flesh, and seeme not to bee
lower then the skin, nor the heare thereof be turned vnto white, then the Priest
shall shut vp him that hath the plague, seuen dayes.
5 After, the Priest shall looke vpon him the seuenth day: and if the plague
seeme to him to abide still, and the plague growe not in the skin, the Priest
shal shut him vp yet seuen dayes more.
6 Then the Priest shall looke on him againe the seuenth day, and if the plague
be darke, and the sore grow not in the skinne, then the Priest shal pronounce
him cleane, for it is a skab: therefore he shall washe his clothes and be
cleane.
7 But if the skab growe more in the skinne, after that he is seene of ye Priest
for to be purged, he shall be seene of the Priest yet againe.
8 Then the Priest shall consider, and if the skab growe in the skin, then the
Priest shal pronounce him vncleane: for it is leprosie.
9 When the plague of leprosie is in a man, he shalbe brought vnto the Priest,
10 And the Priest shall see him: and if the swelling be white in ye skin, & haue
made ye heare white, and there be rawe flesh in the swelling,
11 It is an old leprosie in the skin of his flesh: and the Priest shall
pronounce him vncleane, and shall not shut him vp, for he is vncleane.
12 Also if the leprosie breake out in the skin, and the leprosie couer all the
skin of the plague, from his head euen to his feete, wheresoeuer the Priest
looketh,
13 Then the Priest shall consider: and if the leprosie couer all his flesh, he
shal pronounce the plague to bee cleane, because it is all turned into
whitenesse: so he shalbe cleane.
14 But if there be raw flesh on him when he is seene, he shalbe vncleane.
15 For the Priest shall see the rawe flesh, and declare him to be vncleane: for
the rawe flesh is vncleane, therefore it is the leprosie.
16 Or if the rawe flesh change and be turned into white, then he shall come to
the Priest,
17 And the Priest shal beholde him and if the sore be changed into white, then
the Priest shall pronounce the plague cleane, for it is cleane.
18 The flesh also in whose skin there is a bile and is healed,
19 And in ye place of the bile there be a white swelling, or a white spot
somewhat reddish, it shal be seene of the Priest.
20 And when the Priest seeth it, if it appeare lower then the skinne, and the
heare thereof bee changed into white, ye Priest then shal pronounce him
vncleane: for it is a plague of leprosie, broken out in the bile.
21 But if the Priest looke on it, & there be no white heares therein, and if it
bee not lower then the skin, but be darker, then the Priest shall shut him vp
seuen dayes.
22 And if it spred abroad in the flesh, ye Priest shall pronounce him vncleane,
for it is a sore.
23 But if the spot continue in his place, and growe not, it is a burning bile:
therefore the Priest shall declare him to be cleane.
24 If there be any flesh, in whose skin there is an hote burning, & the quick
flesh of ye burning haue a white spot, somewhat reddish or pale,
25 Then the Priest shall looke vpon it: and if the heare in that spot be changed
into white, and it appeare lower then the skin, it is a leprosie broken out in
the burning therefore the Priest shall pronounce him vncleane: for it is the
plague of leprosie.
26 But if the Priest looke on it, and there be no white heare in the spot, and
be no lower then the other skinne, but be darker, then the Priest shall shut him
vp seuen dayes.
27 After, the Priest shall looke on him the seuenth day: if it be growen abroad
in the skinne, then the Priest shall pronounce him vncleane: for it is the
plague of leprosie.
28 And if the spot abide in his place, not growing in the skin, but is darke, it
is a rising of the burning: the Priest shall therefore declare him cleane, for
it is the drying vp of the burning.
29 If also a man or woman hath a sore on the head or in the beard,
30 Then the Priest shall see his sore: and if it appeare lower then the skin,
and there be in it a smal yelow heare, then the Priest shal pronouce him
vncleane: for it is a blacke spot, and leprosie of the head or of the beard.
31 And if the Priest looke on the sore of the blacke spotte, and if it seeme not
lower then the skinne, nor haue any blacke heare in it, then the Priest shall
shut vp him, that hath the sore of the blacke spot, seuen dayes.
32 After, in the seuenth day the Priest shall looke on the sore: and if the
blacke spot growe not, and there be in it no yelowe heare, and the blacke spot
seeme not lower then the skinne,
33 Then he shalbe shauen, but the place of the blacke spot shall he not shaue:
but the Priest shall shut vp him, that hath the blacke spot, seuen dayes more.
34 And the seuenth day the Priest shall looke on the blacke spot: and if the
blacke spot growe not in the skinne, nor seeme lower then the other skinne, then
the Priest shall clense him, and hee shall wash his clothes, and be cleane.
35 But if the blacke spot growe abroad in the flesh after his clensing,
36 Then the Priest shall looke on it: & if the blacke spot grow in the skin, the
Priest shall not seeke for the yelowe heare: for he is vncleane.
37 But if ye blacke spot seeme to him to abide, and that blacke heare growe
therein, the blacke spot is healed, he is cleane, and the Priest shall declare
him to be cleane.
38 Furthermore if there bee many white spots in the skin of the flesh of man or
woman,
39 Then the Priest shall consider: and if the spots in the skin of their flesh
be somewhat darke and white withall, it is but a white spot broken out in the
skin: therefore he is cleane.
40 And the man whose heare is fallen off his head, and is balde, is cleane.
41 And if his head lose the heare on the forepart, and be balde before, he is
cleane.
42 But if there be in the balde head, or in the balde forehead a white reddish
sore, it is a leprosie springing in his balde head, or in his balde forehead.
43 Therefore the Priest shall looke vpon it, & if the rising of the sore bee
white reddish in his balde head, or in his bald forehead, appearing like
leprosie in the skin of the flesh,
44 He is a leper and vncleane: therefore the Priest shall pronounce him
altogether vncleane: for the sore is in his head.
45 The leper also in whom the plague is, shall haue his clothes rent, and his
head bare, & shall put a couering vpon his lips, and shal cry, I am vncleane, I
am vncleane.
46 As long as the disease shall be vpon him, he shalbe polluted, for he is
vncleane: he shall dwell alone, without the campe shall his habitation be.
47 Also the garment that the plague of leprosie is in, whether it be a wollen
garment or a linen garment,
48 Whether it bee in the warpe or in ye woofe of linen or of wollen, either in a
skin, or in any thing made of skin,
49 And if the sore be greene or somewhat reddish in the garment or in ye skin,
or in the warpe, or in the woofe, or in any thing that is made of skin, it is a
plague of leprosie and shalbe shewed vnto the Priest.
50 Then the Priest shall see the plague, and shut vp it that hath the plague,
seuen dayes,
51 And shall looke on the plague the seuenth day: if the plague growe in the
garment or in the warpe, or in the woofe, or in the skinne, or in any thing that
is made of skin, that plague is a fretting leprosie and vncleane.
52 And hee shall burne the garment, or the warpe, or the woofe, whether it bee
wollen or linen, or any thing that is made of skin, wherein the plague is: for
it is a freating leprosie, therefore it shalbe burnt in the fire.
53 If the Priest yet see that the plague grow not in the garment, or in the
woofe, or in whatsoeuer thing of skin it be,
54 Then the Priest shall commaunde them to wash the thing wherein the plague is,
and he shall shut it vp seuen dayes more.
55 Againe ye Priest shall looke on the plague, after it is washed: and if the
plague haue not changed his colour, though the plague haue spred no further, it
is vncleane: thou shalt burne it in the fire, for it is a fret inwarde, whether
the spot bee in the bare place of the whole, or in part thereof.
56 And if the Priest see that the plague bee darker, after that it is washed, he
shall cut it out of the garment, or out of the skin, or out of the warpe, or out
of the woofe.
57 And if it appeare stil in ye garment or in the warpe, or in the woofe, or in
any thing made of skin, it is a spreading leprie: thou shalt burne the thing
wherein the plague is, in the fire.
58 If thou hast washed ye garment or ye warpe, or ye woofe, or whatsouer thing
of skin it be, if the plague be departed therefrom, then shal it be washed the
second time, and be cleane.
59 This is the lawe of the plague of leprosie in a garment of wollen or linnen,
or in the warpe, or in the woofe, or in any thing of skin, to make it cleane or
vncleane.

Chapter 14

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 This is the law of the leper in the day of his clensing: that is, he shall be
brought vnto the Priest,
3 And the Priest shall go out of the campe, & the Priest shall consider him: and
if the plague of leprosie be healed in the leper,
4 Then shall the Priest commaunde to take for him that is clensed, two sparrowes
aliue and cleane, and cedar wood and a skarlet lace, and hyssope.
5 And the Priest shall commaunde to kill one of the birdes ouer pure water in an
earthen vessell.
6 After, he shall take the liue sparowe with the cedar wood, and the skarlet
lace, and the hyssope, and shall dip them and the liuing sparowe in the blood of
the sparowe slaine, ouer the pure water,
7 And hee shall sprinkle vpon him, that must be clensed of his leprosie, seuen
times, and clense him, and shall let goe the liue sparowe into the broad fielde.
8 Then he that shall be clensed, shall wash his clothes, and shaue off all his
heare, and wash himselfe in water, so he shalbe cleane: after that shall he come
into the host, but shall tary without his tent seuen dayes.
9 So in the seuenth day hee shall shaue off all his heare, both his head, and
his beard, and his eye browes: euen all his heare shall he shaue, and shall wash
his clothes and shall wash his flesh in water: so he shalbe cleane.
10 Then in the eight day he shal take two hee lambes without blemish, and an ewe
lambe of a yere olde without blemish, and three tenth deales of fine flower for
a meate offering, mingled with oyle, and a pint of oyle.
11 And the Priest that maketh him cleane shal bring the man which is to bee made
cleane, and those things, before the Lord, at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
12 Then the Priest shall take one lambe, and offer him for a trespasse offering,
and the pint of oyle, and shake the to and fro before the Lord.
13 And hee shall kill the lambe in the place where the sinne offring and the
burnt offring are slaine, euen in the holy place: for as the sinne offring is
the Priests, so is the trespasse offring: for it is most holy.
14 So the Priest shal take of the blood of the trespasse offring, and put it
vpon the lappe of the right eare of him that shalbe clensed, and vpon the thumbe
of his right hand, and vpon the great toe of his right foote.
15 The Priest shall also take of ye pint of oyle, and powre it into the palme of
his left hand,
16 And the Priest shal dip his right finger in the oyle that is in his left
hand, & sprinkle of the oyle with his finger seuen times before the Lord.
17 And of the rest of the oyle that is in his hand, shal the Priest put vpon the
lap of the right eare of him that is to bee clensed, and vpon the thumbe of his
right hand, and vpon the great toe of his right foote, where the blood of the
trespasse offring was put.
18 But the remnant of the oyle that is in the Priests hand, he shal powre vpon
the head of him that is to be clensed: so the Priest shall make an atonement for
him before the Lord.
19 And the Priest shal offer the sinne offring and make an atonement for him
that is to bee clensed of his vncleannesse: then after shall he kill the burnt
offring.
20 So the Priest shal offer ye burnt offring and the meat offring vpon ye altar
and the Priest shall make an atonement for him: so he shalbe cleane.
21 But if he be poore, and not able, then he shall bring one lambe for a
trespasse offring to be shaken, for his reconciliation, and a tenth deale of
fine flower mingled with oyle, for a meate offring, with a pinte of oyle.
22 Also two turtle doues, or two yong pigeons, as he is able, whereof the one
shalbe a sinne offering, and the other a burnt offring,
23 And he shall bring them the eight day for his clensing vnto the Priest at the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation before ye Lord.
24 The the Priest shall take the lambe of the trespasse offring, & the pint of
oyle, & the Priest shall shake them to and fro before the Lord.
25 And he shall kil the lambe of the trespasse offering, and the Priest shall
take of the blood of the trespasse offring, and put it vpon the lap of his right
eare that is to be clensed, & vpon ye thumbe of his right hande, and vpon the
great toe of his right foote.
26 Also the Priest shal powre of the oyle into the palme of his owne left hand.
27 So ye Priest shal with his right finger sprinkle of the oyle that is in his
left hand, seuen times before the Lord.
28 Then the Priest shall put of the oyle that is in his hande, vpon the lap of
the right eare of him that is to bee clensed, and vpon the thumbe of his right
hande, and vpon the great toe of his right foote: vpon the place of the blood of
the trespasse offring.
29 But ye rest of the oyle that is in the Priests hand, he shall put vpon the
head of him that is to be clensed, to make an atonement for him before the Lord.
30 Also hee shall present one of the turtle doues, or of the yong pigeons, as he
is able:
31 Such, I say, as he is able, the one for a sinne offring, and the other for a
burnt offring with the meate offring: so the Priest shall make an atonement for
him that is to bee clensed before the Lord.
32 This is the lawe of him which hath the plague of leprosie, who is not able in
his clensing to offer the whole.
33 The Lord also spake vnto Moses and to Aaron, saying,
34 When ye be come vnto the land of Canaan which I giue you in possession, if I
sende the plague of leprosie in an house of the land of your possession,
35 Then he that oweth the house, shall come and tell the Priest, saying, Me
thinke there is like a plague of leprosie in the house.
36 Then the Priest shall commande them to emptie the house before the Priest goe
into it to see the plague, that all that is in the house be not made vncleane,
and then shall the Priest goe in to see the house,
37 And hee shall marke the plague: and if the plague be in the walles of the
house, & that there be deepe spots, greenish or reddish, which seeme to be lower
then the wall,
38 Then the Priest shall goe out of the house to the doore of the house, and
shall cause to shut vp the house seuen dayes.
39 So the Priest shall come againe ye seuenth day: and if he see that the plague
bee increased in the walles of the house,
40 Then the Priest shall commande them to take away the stones wherein the
plague is, and they shall cast them into a foule place without the citie.
41 Also hee shall cause to scrape the house within rounde about, and powre the
dust, that they haue pared off, without the citie in an vncleane place.
42 And they shall take other stones, and put them in the places of those stones,
and shall take other mortar, to plaister the house with.
43 But if the plague come againe and breake out in the house, after that he hath
taken away ye stones, and after that hee hath scraped and playstered the house,
44 Then the Priest shall come and see: and if the plague growe in the house, it
is a freating leprosie in the house: it is therefore vncleane.
45 And hee shall breake downe the house, with the stones of it, and the timber
thereof, and all the mortar of the house, and hee shall carie them out of the
citie vnto an vncleane place.
46 Moreouer he that goeth into the house all the while that it is shut vp, hee
shall bee vncleane vntill the euen.
47 Hee also that sleepeth in the house shall wash his clothes: he likewise that
eateth in the house, shall wash his clothes.
48 But if the Priest shall come and see, that the plague hath spread no further
in the house, after the house be plaistered, the Priest shall pronounce that
house cleane, for the plague is healed.
49 Then shal he take to purifie the house, two sparrowes, and cedar wood, and
skarlet lace, and hyssope.
50 And hee shall kill one sparowe ouer pure water in an earthen vessell,
51 And shall take the cedar wood, and the hyssope, and the skarlet lace with the
liue sparow, and dip them in the blood of the slayne sparow, and in the pure
water, and sprinkle the house seuen times:
52 So shall hee clense the house with ye blood of the sparowe, & with the pure
water, and with the liue sparowe, and with the cedar wood, and with the hyssope,
and with the skarlet lace.
53 Afterwarde he shal let go the liue sparowe out of the towne into the broad
fieldes: so shal he make atonement for the house, and it shal be cleane.
54 This is the law for euery plague of leprosie and blacke spot,
55 And of the leprosie of the garment, and of the house,
56 And of the swelling, and of the skab, and of the white spot.
57 This is the lawe of the leprosie to teache when a thing is vncleane, & when
it is cleane.

Chapter 15

1 Moreouer the Lord spake vnto Moses, and to Aaron, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, Whosoeuer hath an issue
from his flesh, is vncleane, because of his issue.
3 And this shalbe his vncleannes in his issue: when his flesh auoydeth his
issue, or if his flesh be stopped from his issue, this is his vncleannes.
4 Euery bed whereon he lyeth that hath the issue, shall be vncleane, and euery
thing whereon he sitteth, shalbe vncleane.
5 Whosoeuer also toucheth his bed, shal wash his clothes, and wash himselfe in
water, and shall be vncleane vntill the euen.
6 And he that sitteth on any thing, whereon he sate that hath the issue, shall
wash his clothes, and wash himselfe in water, and shalbe vncleane vntill the
euen.
7 Also he that toucheth the flesh of him that hath the issue, shal wash his
clothes, & wash himselfe in water, & shalbe vncleane vntil the euen.
8 If he also, that hath the issue, spit vpon him that is cleane, he shal wash
his clothes, and wash himselfe in water, and shalbe vncleane vntill the euen.
9 And what saddle soeuer he rideth vpon, that hath the issue, shalbe vncleane,
10 And whosoeuer toucheth any thing that was vnder him, shall be vncleane vnto
the euen: and he that beareth those things, shall wash his clothes, and wash
himselfe in water, and shall be vncleane vntill the euen.
11 Likewise whomesoeuer hee toucheth that hath the issue (and hath not washed
his handes in water) shal wash his clothes and wash himselfe in water, and
shalbe vncleane vntill the euen.
12 And the vessel of earth that he toucheth, which hath the issue, shalbe
broken: and euery vessel of wood shalbe rinsed in water.
13 But if he that hath an issue, be cleansed of his issue, then shall he count
him seuen dayes for his cleansing, and wash his clothes, and wash his flesh in
pure water: so shal he be cleane.
14 Then the eight day he shall take vnto him two Turtle doues or two yong
pigeons, and come before the Lorde at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, and shall giue them vnto the Priest.
15 And the Priest shall make of the one of them a sinne offring, & of the other
a burnt offering: so the Priest shall make an atonement for him before the Lord,
for his issue.
16 Also if any mans issue of seede depart from him, he shal wash all his flesh
in water, and be vncleane vntill the euen.
17 And euery garment, & euery skinne whereupon shalbe issue of seede, shall be
euen washed with water, and be vncleane vnto the euen.
18 If he that hath an issue of seede, do lie with a woman, they shall both wash
themselues with water, and be vncleane vntill the euen.
19 Also when a woman shal haue an issue, and her issue in her flesh shalbe
blood, she shalbe put apart seuen dayes: and whosoeuer toucheth her, shalbe
vncleane vnto the euen.
20 And whatsoeuer she lieth vpon in her separation, shalbe vncleane, and euery
thing that she sitteth vpon, shalbe vncleane.
21 Whosoeuer also toucheth her bedde, shall wash his clothes, and wash himselfe
with water, & shalbe vncleane vnto the euen.
22 And whosoeuer toucheth any thing that she sate vpon, shal wash his clothes,
and wash him selfe in water, & shalbe vncleane vnto the euen:
23 So that whether he touche her bed, or any thing whereon shee hath sit, he
shalbe vncleane vnto the euen.
24 And if a man lye with her, and the flowers of her separation touch him, he
shalbe vncleane seuen dayes, and all the whole bed whereon he lieth, shalbe
vncleane.
25 Also when a womans issue of blood runneth long time besides the time of her
floures, or when she hath an issue, longer then her floures, all the dayes of
the issue of her vncleannesse shee shalbe vncleane, as in the time of her
floures.
26 Euery bed whereon shee lyeth (as long as her issue lasteth) shalbe to her as
her bed of her separation: & whatsoeuer she sitteth vpon, shalbe vncleane, as
her vncleannes whe she is put apart.
27 And whosoeuer toucheth these things, shal be vncleane, & shal wash his
clothes, & wash him selfe in water, & shalbe vncleane vnto the euen.
28 But if she be clensed of her issue, then shee shall count her seuen dayes,
and after, shee shall be cleane.
29 And in the eight day shee shall take vnto her two Turtles or two yong
pigeons, and bring them vnto the Priest at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
30 And the Priest shall make of ye one a sinne offring, and of the other a burnt
offring, and the Priest shal make an atonement for her before the Lord, for the
issue of her vncleannes.
31 Thus shal yee separate the children of Israel from their vncleannes, that
they dye not in their vncleannesse, if they defile my Tabernacle that is among
them.
32 This is the lawe of him that hath an issue, and of him from whome goeth an
issue of seede whereby he is defiled:
33 Also of her that is sicke of her floures, and of him that hath a running
issue, whether it bee man or woman, and of him that lyeth with her which is
vncleane.

Chapter 16

1 Fvrthermore the Lord spake vnto Moses, after the death of the two sonnes of
Aaron, whe they came to offer before the Lord, and dyed:
2 And the Lord sayd vnto Moses, Speake vnto Aaron thy brother, that he come not
at all times into the Holy place within the vayle, before the Merciseate, which
is vpon the Arke, that he dye not: for I wil appeare in the cloude vpon the
Merciseate.
3 After this sort shall Aaron come into the Holy place: euen with a yong
bullocke for a sinne offring, and a ramme for a burnt offring.
4 He shal put on the holy linnen coate, and shal haue linnen breeches vpon his
flesh, & shal be girded with a linnen girdle, and shal couer his head with a
linnen miter: these are the holy garments: therefore shal hee wash his flesh in
water, when he doeth put them on.
5 And hee shal take of the Congregation of the children of Israel, two hee
goates for a sinne offring, and a ramme for a burnt offring.
6 Then Aaron shal offer the bullocke for his sinne offring, and make an
atonement for himselfe, and for his house.
7 And he shal take the two hee goates, and present them before the Lord at the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
8 Then Aaron shal cast lots ouer the two hee goates: one lot for the Lord, and
the other for the Scape goate.
9 And Aaron shal offer the goat, vpon which the Lords lot shal fal, & make him a
sinne offring.
10 But the goate, on which the lot shal fall to be the Scape goate, shalbe
presented aliue before the Lord, to make reconciliation by him, & to let him go
(as a Scape goate) into the wildernes.
11 Thus Aaron shal offer the bullocke for his sinne offring, and make a
reconciliation for himselfe, and for his house, and shal kill the bullocke for
his sinne offring.
12 And he shal take a censer full of burning coles from off the altar before the
Lorde, and his handfull of sweete incense beaten small, & bring it within the
vayle,
13 And shal put the incense vpon the fire before the Lorde, that the cloude of
the incense may couer the Merciseat that is vpon the Testimonie: so he shal not
dye.
14 And hee shall take of the blood of the bullocke, and sprinkle it with his
finger vpon the Merciseat Eastward: and before the Merciseate shal he sprinkle
of the blood with his finger seuen times.
15 Then shall he kill the goate that is the peoples sinne offring, and bring his
blood within the vaile, and doe with that blood, as he did with the blood of the
bullocke, and sprinckle it vpon the Merciseate, and before the Merciseate.
16 So he shal purge the Holy place from the vncleannes of the children of
Israel, & from their trespasses of all their sinnes: so shal he do also for the
Tabernacle of the Cogregation placed with them, in the middes of their
vncleannesse.
17 And there shalbe no man in the Tabernacle of the Congregation, when he goeth
in to make an atonement in the Holy place, vntill hee come out, and haue made an
atonement for himselfe, and for his housholde, and for all the Congregation of
Israel.
18 After, he shal goe out vnto the altar that is before the Lord & make a
reconciliation vpon it, and shal take of the blood of the bullocke, and of the
blood of the goate, and put it vpon the hornes of the Altar round about:
19 So shal hee sprinkle of the blood vpon it with his finger seuen times, &
clense it, & halowe it from the vncleannes of the children of Israel.
20 When he hath made an ende of purging the Holy place, and the Tabernacle of
the Congregation, and the altar, then he shall bring the liue goate:
21 And Aaron shal put both his handes vpon the head of the liue goate, &
confesse ouer him al the iniquities of the children of Israel, & all their
trespasses, in all their sinnes, putting them vpon the head of the goate, & shal
sende him away (by the hand of a man appointed) into the wildernes.
22 So the goate shal beare vpon him all their iniquities into the land that is
not inhabited, & he shal let the goate go into the wildernesse.
23 After, Aaron shal come into the Tabernacle of the Congregation, and put off
the linnen clothes, which he put on when he went into the Holy place, and leaue
them there.
24 Hee shal wash also his flesh with water in the Holy place, and put on his
owne rayment, and come out, and make his burnt offring, & the burnt offring of
the people, and make an atonement for himselfe, and for the people.
25 Also the fatte of the sinne offring shal he burne vpon the altar.
26 And he that caried forth the goat, called the Scape goat, shal wash his
clothes, & wash his flesh in water, and after that shal come into the hoste.
27 Also the bullocke for the sinne offring, & the goate for the sinne offring
(whose blood was brought to make a reconciliation in the Holy place) shal one
carie out without the hoste to be burnt in the fire, with their skinnes, and
with their flesh, and with their doung.
28 And hee that burneth them shal wash his clothes, and wash his flesh in water,
and afterward come into the hoste.
29 So this shalbe an ordinance for euer vnto you: the tenth day of the seuenth
moneth, yee shal humble your soules, & do no worke at all, whether it be one of
the same countrey or a strager that soiourneth among you.
30 For that day shal ye Priest make an atonement for you to clense you: ye
shalbe cleane from all your sinnes before the Lord.
31 This shall be a Sabbath of rest vnto you, and ye shal humble your soules, by
an ordinance for euer.
32 And the Priest whom he shal anoynt, & whom he shal cosecrate (to minister in
his fathers steade) shal make the atonement, & shal put on the linnen clothes
and Holy vestments,
33 And shal purge the Holy Sanctuarie & the Tabernacle of the Congregation, and
shal clense the altar, and make an atonement for the Priests and for all the
people of the Congregation.
34 And this shalbe an euerlasting ordinance vnto you, to make an atonement for
the children of Israel for all their sinnes once a yeere: and as the Lord
commanded Moses, he did.

Chapter 17

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto Aaron, and to his sonnes, and to all the children of Israel, & say
vnto them, This is the thing which the Lorde hath commanded, saying,
3 Whosoeuer he be of the house of Israel that killeth a bullocke, or lambe, or
goate in the hoste, or that killeth it out of the hoste,
4 And bringeth it not vnto the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation to
offer an offring vnto the Lord before the Tabernacle of the Lord, blood shalbe
imputed vnto that man: he hath shed blood, wherefore that man shall be cut off
from among his people.
5 Therefore the children of Israel shall bring their offrings, which they would
offer abroad in the fielde, & present the vnto ye Lord at the doore of the
Tabernacle of ye Congregation by ye Priest, and offer them for peace offrings
vnto the Lord.
6 Then the Priest shall sprinkle the blood vpon the Altar of the Lord before the
doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation, and burne the fat for a sweete
sauour vnto the Lord.
7 And they shall no more offer their offerings vnto deuils, after whom they haue
gone a whoring: this shalbe an ordinance for euer vnto them in their
generations.
8 Also thou shalt say vnto them, whosoeuer he be of the house of Israel, or of
the strangers which soiourne among them, that offreth a burnt offring or
sacrifice,
9 And bringeth it not vnto ye doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation to
offer it vnto the Lord, euen that man shall be cut off from his people.
10 Likewise whosoeuer he be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that
soiourne among them, that eateth any blood, I will euen set my face against that
person that eateth blood, & will cut him off from among his people.
11 For the life of the flesh is in the blood, and I haue giuen it vnto you to
offer vpon the altar, to make an atonemet for your soules: for this blood shall
make an atonement for the soule.
12 Therefore I saide vnto ye children of Israel, None of you shall eate blood:
neither the stranger that soiourneth among you, shall eate blood.
13 Moreouer whosoeuer he be of the children of Israel, or of the strangers that
soiourne among the, which by hunting taketh any beast or foule that may be
eaten, he shal powre out the blood thereof, and couer it with dust:
14 For ye life of all flesh is his blood, it is ioyned with his life: therefore
I sayd vnto the children of Israel, Ye shall eate the blood of no flesh: for the
life of al flesh is the blood thereof: whosoeuer eateth it, shalbe cut off.
15 And euery person that eateth it which dyeth alone, or that which is torne
with beastes, whether it be one of the same countrey or a stranger, he shall
both wash his clothes, and wash himselfe in water, and be vncleane vnto the
euen: after he shalbe cleane.
16 But if he wash them not, nor wash his flesh, then he shall beare his
iniquitie.

Chapter 18

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, I am the Lord your God.
3 After ye doings of the land of Egypt, wherin ye dwelt, shall ye not doe: and
after the maner of the land of Canaan, whither I will bring you, shal ye not do,
neither walke in their ordinances,
4 But do after my iudgementes, and keepe mine ordinances, to walke therein: I am
the Lord your God.
5 Ye shall keepe therefore my statutes, & my iudgementes, which if a man doe, he
shall then liue in them: I am the Lord.
6 None shall come neere to any of ye kinred of his flesh to vncouer her shame: I
am the Lord.
7 Thou shalt not vncouer the shame of thy father, nor the shame of thy mother:
for she is thy mother, thou shalt not discouer her shame.
8 The shame of thy fathers wife shalt thou not discouer: for it is thy fathers
shame.
9 Thou shalt not discouer the shame of thy sister the daughter of thy father, or
the daughter of thy mother, whether shee bee borne at home, or borne without:
thou shalt not discouer their shame.
10 The shame of thy sonnes daughter, or of thy daughters daughter, thou shalt
not, I say, vncouer their shame: for it is thy shame.
11 The shame of thy fathers wiues daughter, begotten of thy father (for she is
thy sister) thou shalt not, I say, discouer her shame.
12 Thou shalt not vncouer the shame of thy fathers sister: for she is thy
fathers kinswoman.
13 Thou shalt not discouer the shame of thy mothers sister: for she is thy
mothers kinsewoman.
14 Thou shalt not vncouer the shame of thy fathers brother: that is, thou shalt
not goe in to his wife, for she is thine aunte.
15 Thou shalt not discouer the shame of thy daughter in lawe: for she is thy
sonnes wife: therefore shalt thou not vncouer her shame.
16 Thou shalt not discouer the shame of thy brothers wife. for it is thy
brothers shame.
17 Thou shalt not discouer the shame of the wife and of her daughter, neither
shalt thou take her sonnes daughter, nor her daughters daughter, to vncouer her
shame: for they are thy kinsfolkes, and it were wickednesse.
18 Also thou shalt not take a wife with her sister, during her life, to vexe
her, in vncouering her shame vpon her.
19 Thou shalt not also go vnto a woman to vncouer her shame, as long as she is
put apart for her disease.
20 Moreouer, thou shalt not giue thy selfe to thy neighbours wife by carnall
copulation, to be defiled with her.
21 Also thou shalt not giue thy children to offer them vnto Molech, neither
shalt thou defile the name of thy God: for I am the Lord.
22 Thou shalt not lie with ye male as one lieth with a woman: for it is
abomination.
23 Thou shalt not also lie with any beast to bee defiled therewith, neither
shall any woman stand before a beast, to lie downe thereto: for it is
abomination.
24 Yee shall not defile your selues in any of these things: for in al these the
nations are defiled, which I will cast out before you:
25 And the land is defiled: therefore I wil visit the wickednesse thereof vpon
it, and the lande shall vomit out her inhabitants.
26 Ye shall keepe therefore mine ordinances, and my iudgementes, and commit none
of these abominations, aswell hee that is of the same countrey, as the straunger
that soiourneth among you.
27 (For all these abominations haue the men of the land done, which were before
you, and the land is defiled:
28 And shall not the lande spue you out if ye defile it, as it spued out the
people that were before you?)
29 For whosoeuer shall commit any of these abominations, the persons that doe
so, shall bee cut off from among their people.
30 Therefore shall yee keepe mine ordinances that ye do not any of the
abominable customes, which haue bene done before you, and that yee defile not
your selues therein: for I am the Lorde your God.

Chapter 19

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto all the Congregation of the children of Israel, and say vnto them,
Ye shalbe holy, for I the Lord your God am holy.
3 Yee shall feare euery man his mother and his father, and shall keepe my
Sabbaths: for I am the Lord your God.
4 Ye shall not turne vnto idoles, nor make you molten gods: I am the Lord your
God.
5 And when yee shall offer a peace offering vnto the Lord, ye shall offer it
freely.
6 It shall be eaten the day yee offer it, or on the morowe: and that which
remaineth vntill the third day, shalbe burnt in the fire.
7 For if it be eaten the third day, it shall be vncleane, it shall not be
accepted.
8 Therefore he that eateth it, shal beare his iniquitie, because he hath defiled
the halowed thing of the Lorde, and that person shalbe cut off from his people.
9 When yee reape the haruest of your land, ye shal not reape euery corner of
your field, neither shalt thou gather the glainings of thy haruest.
10 Thou shalt not gather the grapes of thy vineyarde cleane, neyther gather
euery grape of thy vineyarde, but thou shalt leaue them for the poore and for
the straunger: I am the Lorde your God.
11 Ye shall not steale, neither deale falsely, neither lie one to another.
12 Also yee shall not sweare by my name falsely, neither shalt thou defile the
name of thy God: I am the Lord.
13 Thou shalt not do thy neighbour wrong, neither rob him. The workemans hire
shal not abide with thee vntil the morning.
14 Thou shalt not curse the deafe, neither put a stumbling blocke before the
blinde, but shalt feare thy God: I am the Lord.
15 Ye shall not doe vniustly in iudgement. Thou shalt not fauour the person of
the poore, nor honour the person of the mightie, but thou shalt iudge thy
neighbour iustly.
16 Thou shalt not walke about with tales among thy people. Thou shalt not stand
against the blood of thy neighbour: I am the Lord.
17 Thou shalt not hate thy brother in thine heart, but thou shalt plainely
rebuke thy neighbour, and suffer him not to sinne.
18 Thou shalt not auenge, nor be mindful of wrong against ye childre of thy
people, but shalt loue thy neighbour as thy selfe: I am the Lord.
19 Yee shall keepe mine ordinances. Thou shalt not let thy cattel gender with
others of diuers kindes. Thou shalt not sowe thy fielde with mingled seede,
neyther shall a garment of diuers thinges, as of linen and wollen come vpon
thee.
20 Whosoeuer also lyeth and medleth with a woman that is a bonde mayde,
affianced to a husbande, and not redeemed, nor freedome giuen her, she shalbe
scourged, but they shall not die, because she is not made free.
21 And he shall bring for his trespasse offring vnto the Lorde, at the doore of
the Tabernacle of the Congregation, a ramme for a trespasse offering.
22 Then the Priest shall make an atonement for him with the ramme of the
trespasse offering before the Lorde, concerning his sinne which he hath done,
and pardon shalbe giuen him for his sinne which he hath committed.
23 Also when ye shall come into the land, & haue planted euery tree for meate,
ye shal count the fruite thereof as vncircumcised: three yeere shall it be
vncircumcised vnto you, it shall not be eaten:
24 But in the fourth yere all the fruite thereof shalbe holy to the praise of
the Lorde.
25 And in the fifth yeere shall ye eate of the fruite of it that it may yeelde
to you the encrease thereof: I am the Lorde your God.
26 Ye shal not eat the flesh with the blood, ye shall not vse witchcraft, nor
obserue times.
27 Ye shall not cut rounde the corners of your heades, neither shalt thou marre
the tuftes of thy beard.
28 Ye shal not cut your flesh for the dead, nor make any print of a marke vpon
you: I am the Lorde,
29 Thou shalt not make thy daughter common, to cause her to be a whore, least
the lande also fall to whoredome, and the lande bee full of wickednesse.
30 Ye shall keepe my Sabbaths and reuerence my Sanctuarie: I am the Lorde.
31 Ye shall not regarde them that worke with spirites, neither soothsayers: ye
shall not seeke to them to be defiled by them: I am the Lorde your God.
32 Thou shalt rise vp before the horehead, and honour the person of the old man,
and dread thy God: I am the Lorde.
33 And if a stranger soiourne with thee in your lande, ye shall not vexe him.
34 But the stranger that dwelleth with you, shalbe as one of your selues, and
thou shalt loue him as thy selfe: for ye were strangers in the lad of Egypt: I
am the Lorde your God.
35 Ye shall not doe vniustly in iudgement, in line, in weight, or in measure.
36 You shall haue iust ballances, true weightes, a true Ephah, and a true Hin. I
am the Lorde your God, which haue brought you out of the lande of Egypt.
37 Therefore shall ye obserue all mine ordinances, and all my iudgements, and
doe them: I am the Lorde.

Chapter 20

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Thou shalt say also to the children of Israel, Whosoeuer he be of the children
of Israel, or of the strangers that dwell in Israel, that giueth his children
vnto Molech, he shal die the death, ye people of ye land shall stone him to
death.
3 And I will set my face against that man and cut him off from among his people,
because he hath giuen his children vnto Molech, for to defile my Sanctuarie, and
to pollute mine holye Name.
4 And if the people of the lande hide their eyes, and winke at that man when he
giueth his children vnto Molech, and kill him not,
5 Then will I set my face against that man, and against his familie, and will
cut him off, and all that go a whoring after him to comit whoredome with Molech,
from among their people.
6 If any turne after such as worke with spirits, and after soothsayers, to go a
whoring after them, then will I set my face against that person, and will cut
him off from among his people.
7 Sanctifie your selues therefore, and be holie, for I am the Lorde your God.
8 Keepe ye therefore mine ordinances, and doe them. I am the Lorde which doeth
sanctifie you.
9 If there be any that curseth his father or his mother, he shall die the death:
seeing hee hath cursed his father and his mother, his blood shalbe vpon him.
10 And the man that committeth adulterie with another mans wife, because he hath
comitted adulterie with his neighbours wife, the adulterer and the adulteresse
shall die the death.
11 And the man that lyeth with his fathers wife, because hee hath vncouered his
fathers shame, they shall both dye: their blood shalbe vpon them.
12 Also the man that lyeth with his daughter in lawe, they both shall dye the
death, they haue wrought abomination, their blood shalbe vpon them.
13 The ma also that lyeth with the male, as one lyeth with a woman, they haue
both committed abomination: they shall dye the death, their blood shalbe vpon
them.
14 Likewise he that taketh a wife and her mother, committeth wickednesse: they
shal burne him and them with fire, that there be no wickednes among you.
15 Also the man that lyeth with a beast, shall dye the death, and ye shall slay
the beast.
16 And if a woman come to any beast, and lye therewith, then thou shalt kill the
woman and the beast: they shall die the death, their blood shalbe vpon them.
17 Also the man that taketh his sister, his fathers daughter, or his mothers
daughter, & seeth her shame and she seeth his shame, it is villenie: therefore
they shall be cut off in the sight of their people, because he hath vncouered
his sisters shame, he shall beare his iniquitie.
18 The man also that lyeth with a woman hauing her disease, and vncouereth her
shame, and openeth her fountaine, and she open the foutaine of her blood, they
shall bee euen both cut off from among their people.
19 Moreouer thou shalt not vncouer the shame of thy mothers sister, nor of thy
fathers sister: because he hath vncouered his kin, they shall beare their
iniquitie.
20 Likewise the man that lyeth with his fathers brothers wife, and vncouereth
his vncles shame: they shall beare their iniquitie, and shall die childlesse.
21 So the man that taketh his brothers wife, committeth filthines, because he
hath vncouered his brothers shame: they shalbe childles.
22 Ye shall keepe therefore all mine ordinances and all my iudgements, and doe
them, that the land, whither I bring you to dwel therein, spue you not out.
23 Wherefore ye shall not walke in the maners of this nation which I cast out
before you: for they haue committed all these things, therefore I abhorred them.
24 But I haue saide vnto you, ye shall inherite their land, & I will giue it
vnto you to possesse it, euen a land that floweth with milke and honie: I am the
Lorde your God, which haue separated you from other people.
25 Therefore shall ye put difference betweene cleane beastes and vncleane, &
betweene vncleane foules and cleane: neither shall ye defile your selues with
beastes and foules, nor with any creeping thing, that ye ground bringeth forth,
which I haue separated from you as vncleane.
26 Therefore shall ye be holie vnto me: for I the Lorde am holy, and I haue
separated you from other people, that ye shoulde be mine.
27 And if a man or woman haue a spirite of diuination, or soothsaying in them,
they shall die the death: they shall stone them to death, their blood shalbe
vpon them.

Chapter 21

1 And the Lorde said vnto Moses, Speake vnto the Priestes the sonnes of Aaron,
and say vnto them, Let none be defiled by the dead among his people,
2 But by his kinseman that is neere vnto him: to wit, by his mother, or by his
father, or by his sonne, or by his daughter, or by his brother,
3 Or by his sister a maid, that is neere vnto him, which hath not had a husband:
for her he may lament.
4 He shall not lament for the Prince among his people, to pollute him selfe.
5 They shall not make balde partes vpon their head, nor shaue off the locks of
their beard, nor make any cuttings in their flesh.
6 They shalbe holy vnto their God, and not pollute the name of their God: for
the sacrifices of the Lorde made by fire, and the bread of their God they doe
offer: therefore they shalbe holie.
7 They shall not take to wife an whore, or one polluted, neither shall they
marrie a woman diuorced from her husband: for such one is holy vnto his God.
8 Thou shalt sanctifie him therefore, for he offereth the bread of thy God: he
shall be holy vnto thee: for I the Lorde, which sanctifie you, am holy.
9 If a Priestes daughter fall to play the whore, she polluteth her father:
therefore shal she be burnt with fire.
10 Also ye hie Priest among his brethren, (vpon whose head the anointing oyle
was powred, and hath consecrated his hand to put on the garments) shall not
vncouer his head, nor rent his clothes,
11 Neither shall he goe to any dead bodie, nor make him selfe vncleane by his
father or by his mother,
12 Neither shall he goe out of the Sanctuarie, nor pollute the holy place of his
God: for the crowne of the anoynting oyle of his God is vpon him: I am the
Lorde.
13 Also he shall take a maide vnto his wife:
14 But a widowe, or a diuorced woman, or a polluted, or an harlot, these shall
he not marrie, but shall take a maide of his owne people to wife:
15 Neyther shall he defile his seede among his people: for I am the Lorde which
sanctifie him.
16 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
17 Speake vnto Aaron, and say, Whosoeuer of thy seede in their generations hath
any blemishes, shall not prease to offer the bread of his God:
18 For whosoeuer hath any blemish, shall not come neere: as a man blinde or
lame, or that hath a flat nose, or that hath any misshapen member,
19 Or a man that hath a broken foote, or a broken hande,
20 Or is crooke backt, or bleare eyed, or hath a blemish in his eye, or be
skiruie, or skabbed, or haue his stones broken.
21 None of the seede of Aaron the Priest that hath a blemish, shall come neere
to offer the sacrifices of the Lorde made by fire, hauing a blemish: he shall
not prease to offer the bread of his God.
22 The bread of his God, euen of the most holie, and of the holy shall he eate:
23 But he shall not goe in vnto the vaile, nor come neere the altar, because hee
hath a blemish, least he pollute my Sanctuaries: for I am the Lord that
sanctifie them.
24 Thus spake Moses vnto Aaron, and to his sonnes, and to all the children of
Israel.

Chapter 22

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto Aaron, and to his sonnes, that they be separated from the holy
thinges of the children of Israel, and that they pollute not mine holy name in
those things, which they hallowe vnto me: I am the Lorde.
3 Say vnto them, Whosoeuer he be of all your seede among your generations after
you, that toucheth the holy things which the children of Israel hallowe vnto the
Lord, hauing his vncleannesse vpon him, euen that person shall be cut off from
my sight: I am the Lorde.
4 Whosoeuer also of the seede of Aaron is a leper, or hath a running issue, he
shall not eate of the holy things vntill he be cleane: and who so toucheth any
that is vncleane, by reason of the dead, or a man whose issue of seede runneth
from him,
5 Or the man that toucheth any creeping thing, whereby he may be made vncleane,
or a man, by whom he may take vncleannesse, whatsoeuer vncleannesse he hath,
6 The person that hath touched such, shall therefore be vncleane vntill the
euen, and shall not eat of ye holy things, except he haue washed his flesh with
water.
7 But when the Sunne is downe, hee shalbe cleane, & shall afterward eate of the
holy things: for it is his foode.
8 Of a beast that dyeth, or is rent with beasts, whereby he may be defiled, hee
shall not eate: I am the Lorde.
9 Let them keepe therefore mine ordinance, least they beare their sinne for it,
and die for it, if they defile it: I the Lord sanctifie them.
10 There shall no stranger also eate of the holie thing, neither the ghest of
the Priest, neither shall an hired seruant eat of the holie thing:
11 But if the Priest bye any with money, he shall eate of it, also he that is
borne in his house: they shall eate of his meate.
12 If the Priests daughter also be maried vnto a stranger, she may not eate of
the holy offrings.
13 Notwithstanding if the Priests daughter be a widowe or diuorced, and haue no
childe, but is returned vnto her fathers house shee shall eate of her fathers
bread, as she did in her youth but there shall no stranger eate thereof.
14 If a man eate of the holie thing vnwittingly, he shall put the fift part
thereunto, and giue it vnto the Priest with the halowed thing.
15 So they shall not defile the holy things of the children of Israel, which
they offer vnto the Lord,
16 Neither cause the people to beare the iniquitie of their trespas, while they
eate their holy thing: for I the Lorde do halowe them.
17 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
18 Speake vnto Aaron, and to his sonnes, and to all the children of Israel, and
say vnto them, Whosoeuer he be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers in
Israel, that will offer his sacrifice for all their vowes, and for all their
free offrings, which they vse to offer vnto the Lorde for a burnt offring,
19 Yee shall offer of your free minde a male without blemish of the beeues, of
the sheepe, or of the goates.
20 Ye shall not offer any thing that hath a blemish: for that shal not be
acceptable for you.
21 And whosoeuer bringeth a peace offring vnto ye Lord to accomplish his vowe,
or for a free offring, of the beeues, or of the sheepe, his free offring shall
bee perfect, no blemish shalbe in it.
22 Blinde, or broken, or maimed, or hauing a wenne, or skiruie, or skabbed:
these shall yee not offer vnto the Lord nor make an offring by fire of these
vpon the altar of the Lorde.
23 Yet a bullocke, or a sheepe that hath any member superfluous, or lacking,
such mayest thou present for a free offring, but for a vowe it shall not be
accepted.
24 Ye shall not offer vnto ye Lord that which is bruised or crusshed, or broken,
or cut away, neither shal ye make an offring thereof in your land,
25 Neither of ye hand of a strager shal ye offer ye bread of your God of any of
these, because their corruption is in them, there is a blemish in them:
therefore shall they not be accepted for you.
26 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
27 When a bullocke, or a sheepe, or a goate shal be brought foorth, it shalbe
euen seuen daies vnder his damme: and from the eight day forth, it shalbe
accepted for a sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord.
28 As for the cowe or the ewe, yee shall not kill her, and her yong both in one
day.
29 So when ye will offer a thanke offring vnto the Lord, ye shall offer
willingly.
30 The same day it shalbe eaten, yee shall leaue none of it vntill the morowe: I
am the Lord.
31 Therefore shall ye keepe my commandements and do them: for I am the Lord.
32 Neither shal ye pollute mine holy Name, but I will be halowed among the
children of Israel. I the Lord sanctifie you,
33 Which haue brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the
Lord.

Chapter 23

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, & say vnto them, The feastes of ye Lord
which yee shall call ye holie assemblies, euen these are my feasts.
3 Six daies shall worke be done, but in the seuenth day shalbe the Sabbath of
rest, an holie conuocation: ye shall do no worke therein, it is the Sabbath of
the Lorde, in all your dwellings.
4 These are the feastes of the Lord, and holie conuocations, which yee shall
proclaime in their seasons.
5 In the first moneth, and in the fourteenth day of the moneth at euening shalbe
ye Passeouer of the Lord.
6 And on the fifteenth day of this moneth shalbe the feast of vnleauened bread
vnto the Lord: seuen dayes ye shall eate vnleauened bread.
7 In the first day yee shall haue an holy conuocation: ye shal do no seruile
worke therein.
8 Also ye shall offer sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord seuen daies, and in
the seuenth day shalbe an holie conuocation: ye shall do no seruile worke
therein.
9 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
10 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When ye be come into
ye land which I giue vnto you, and reape the haruest thereof, then ye shal bring
a sheafe of the first fruites of your haruest vnto the Priest,
11 And hee shall shake the sheafe before the Lord, that it may be acceptable for
you: the morowe after the Sabbath, the Priest shall shake it.
12 And that day when yee shake the sheafe, shall yee prepare a lambe without
blemish of a yeere olde, for a burnt offring vnto the Lord:
13 And the meate offring thereof shalbe two tenth deales of fine floure mingled
with oyle, for a sacrifice made by fire vnto ye Lord of sweete sauour; the
drinke offring thereof the fourth part of an Hin of wine.
14 And ye shal eat neither bread nor parched corne, nor greene eares vntill the
selfe same day that ye haue brought an offring vnto your God: this shalbe a lawe
for euer in your generations and in all your dwellings.
15 Ye shall count also to you from the morowe after the Sabbath, euen from the
day that yee shall bring the sheafe of the shake offring, seuen Sabbaths, they
shalbe complete.
16 Vnto ye morow after the seuenth Sabbath shall ye nomber fiftie dayes: then
yee shall bring a newe meate offring vnto the Lord.
17 Ye shal bring out of your habitatios bread for the shake offring: they shalbe
two loaues of two tenth deales of fine floure, which shalbe baken with leauen
for first fruites vnto the Lord.
18 Also yee shall offer with the bread seuen lambes without blemish of one yeere
olde, and a yong bullocke and two rams: they shalbe for a burnt offring vnto the
Lorde, with their meate offrings and their drinke offrings, for a sacrifice made
by fire of a sweete sauour vnto the Lord.
19 Then ye shall prepare an hee goate for a sinne offring, and two lambes of one
yeere olde for peace offrings.
20 And the Priest shall shake them to and fro with the bread of the first fruits
before the Lord, and with the two lambes: they shalbe holy to the Lord, for the
Priest.
21 So ye shall proclayme the same day, that it may be an holie conuocation vnto
you: ye shall doe no seruile worke therein: it shalbe an ordinance for euer in
al your dwellinges, throughout your generations.
22 And when you reape the haruest of your land, thou shalt not rid cleane the
corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither shalt thou make any
aftergathering of thy haruest, but shalt leaue them vnto the poore and to the
stranger: I am the Lord your God.
23 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
24 Speake vnto the children of Israel, & say, In the seuenth moneth, and in the
first day of the moneth shall ye haue a Sabbath, for the remembrance of blowing
the trumpets, an holy conuocation.
25 Ye shall do no seruile worke therein, but offer sacrifice made by fire vnto
the Lord.
26 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
27 The tenth also of this seuenth moneth shalbe a day of reconciliation: it
shalbe an holie conuocation vnto you, and yee shall humble your soules, and
offer sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord.
28 And ye shall doe no worke that same day: for it is a day of reconciliation,
to make an atonement for you before the Lord your God.
29 For euery person that humbleth not himselfe that same day, shall euen be cut
off from his people.
30 And euery person that shall doe any work that same day, the same person also
will I destroy from among his people.
31 Ye shall do no maner worke therefore: this shalbe a law for euer in your
generations, throughout all your dwellings.
32 This shalbe vnto you a Sabbath of rest, & ye shall humble your soules: in the
ninth day of the moneth at euen, from euen to euen shall ye celebrate your
Sabbath.
33 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
34 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say, In the fifteenth day of this
seueth moneth shalbe for seuen dayes the feast of Tabernacles vnto the Lorde.
35 In the first day shalbe an holie conuocation: ye shall do no seruile worke
therein.
36 Seuen daies ye shall offer sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord, and in the
eight day shalbe an holy conuocation vnto you, and ye shall offer sacrifices
made by fire vnto the Lorde: it is the solemne assemblie, yee shall doe no
seruile worke therein.
37 These are the feastes of the Lord (which ye shall call holie conuocations) to
offer sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord, as burnt offring, and meate offring,
sacrifice, and drinke offrings, euery one vpon his day,
38 Beside the Sabbaths of the Lorde, and beside your giftes, and beside al your
vowes, and beside all your free offrings, which ye shal giue vnto the Lorde.
39 But in the fifteenth day of the seueth moneth, when ye haue gathered in the
fruite of the land, ye shall keepe an holie feast vnto the Lord seuen daies: in
the first day shalbe a Sabbath: likewise in the eight day shalbe a Sabbath.
40 And yee shall take you in the first day the fruite of goodly trees, branches
of palme trees, & the boughes of thicke trees, and willowes of the brooke, and
shall reioyce before the Lorde your God seuen daies.
41 So ye shall keepe this feast vnto the Lorde seuen daies in the yere, by a
perpetuall ordinance through your generations: in the seuenth moneth shall you
keepe it.
42 Ye shall dwell in boothes seuen daies: all that are Israelites borne, shall
dwel in boothes,
43 That your posterity may know that I haue made the children of Israel to dwell
in boothes, when I brought them out of the lande of Egypt: I am the Lord your
God.
44 So Moses declared vnto the children of Israel the feastes of the Lord.

Chapter 24

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Commande the children of Israel that they bring vnto thee pure oyle oliue
beaten, for the light, to cause ye lampes to burne continually.
3 Without the vaile of the Testimonie, in the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
shal Aaron dresse them, both euen and morning before the Lord alwayes: this
shalbe a lawe for euer through your generations.
4 He shall dresse the lampes vpon the pure Candlesticke before the Lorde
perpetually.
5 Also thou shalt take fine floure, and bake twelue cakes thereof: two tenth
deales shalbe in one cake.
6 And thou shalt set them in two rowes, six in a rowe vpon the pure table before
the Lorde.
7 Thou shalt also put pure incense vpon the rowes, that in steade of the bread
it may bee for a remembrance, and an offering made by fire to the Lord.
8 Euery Sabbath hee shall put them in rowes before the Lord euermore, receiuing
them of the children of Israel for an euerlasting couenant.
9 And the bread shalbe Aaros & his sonnes, and they shall eate it in the holie
place: for it is most holie vnto him of the offrings of the Lord made by fire by
a perpetuall ordinance.
10 And there went out among the children of Israel the sonne of an Israelitish
woman, whose father was an Egyptian: and this sonne of the Israelitish woman,
and a man of Israel stroue together in the hoste.
11 So the Israelitish womans sonne blasphemed the name of the Lord, and cursed,
and they brought him vnto Moses (his mothers name also was Shelomith, the
daughter of Dibri, of the tribe of Dan)
12 And they put him in warde, till he tolde them the minde of the Lorde.
13 Then the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
14 Bring the blasphemer without the hoste, and let all that heard him, put their
handes vpon his head, and let all the Congregation stone him.
15 And thou shalt speake vnto the children of Israel, saying, Whosoeuer curseth
his God, shall beare his sinne.
16 And he that blasphemeth the name of the Lord, shalbe put to death: all the
Congregation shall stone him to death: aswell the stranger, as he that is borne
in the lande: when he blasphemeth the name of the Lorde, let him beslaine.
17 He also that killeth any man, he shal be put to death.
18 And he that killeth a beast, he shal restore it, beast for beast.
19 Also if a man cause any blemish in his neighbour: as he hath done, so shall
it be done to him.
20 Breache for breach, eye for eye, tooth for tooth: such a blemish as he hath
made in any, such shalbe repayed to him.
21 And he that killeth a beast shall restore it: but he that killeth a man shall
be slaine.
22 Ye shall haue one lawe: it shalbe aswel for the stranger as for one borne in
the countrey: for I am the Lorde your God.
23 Then Moses tolde the children of Israel, and they brought the blasphemer out
of the hoste, and stoned him with stones: so the children of Israel did as the
Lorde had commanded Moses.

Chapter 25

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses in mount Sinai, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When ye shall come into
the lande which I giue you, the lande shall keepe Sabbath vnto the Lorde.
3 Sixe yeeres thou shalt sowe thy field, and sixe yeeres thou shalt cut thy
vineyarde, and gather the fruite thereof.
4 But the seuenth yeere shalbe a Sabbath of rest vnto the lande: it shall be the
Lordes Sabbath: thou shalt neither sowe thy fielde, nor cut thy vineyarde.
5 That which groweth of it owne accorde of thy haruest, thou shalt not reape,
neither gather the grapes that thou hast left vnlaboured: for it shalbe a yeere
of rest vnto the land.
6 And the rest of the lande shall be meate for you, euen for thee, and for thy
seruant, and for thy mayde, and for thy hired seruant, and for the stranger that
soiourneth with thee:
7 And for thy cattell, and for the beastes that are in thy lande shall all the
encrease thereof be meate.
8 Also thou shalt number seuen Sabbaths of yeeres vnto thee, euen seuen times
seuen yeere: and the space of the seuen Sabbaths of yeeres will be vnto thee
nine and fourtie yeere.
9 Then thou shalt cause to blow the trumpet of the Iubile in the tenth day of
the seuenth moneth: euen in the day of the reconciliation shall ye make the
trumpet blowe, throughout all your lande.
10 And ye shall halowe that yeere, euen the fiftieth yeere, and proclaime
libertie in the lande to all the inhabitants thereof: it shalbe the Iubile vnto
you, and ye shall returne euery man vnto his possession, and euery man shall
returne vnto his familie.
11 This fiftieth yeere shalbe a yeere of Iubile vnto you: ye shall not sowe,
neither reape that which groweth of it selfe, neither gather the grapes thereof,
that are left vnlaboured.
12 For it is the Iubile, it shall be holy vnto you: ye shall eate of the
encrease thereof out of the fielde.
13 In the yeere of this Iubile, ye shall returne euery man vnto his possession.
14 And when thou sellest ought to thy neighbour, or byest at thy neighbours
hande, ye shall not oppresse one another:
15 But according to the nomber of yeeres after the Iubile thou shalt bye of thy
neighbour: also according to the nomber of the yeeres of the reuenues, he shall
sell vnto thee.
16 According to the multitude of yeeres, thou shalt increase the price thereof,
and according to the fewnesse of yeeres, thou shalt abate the price of it: for
the nomber of fruites doeth he sell vnto thee.
17 Oppresse not ye therefore any man his neighbour, but thou shalt feare thy
God: for I am the Lorde your God.
18 Wherefore ye shall obey mine ordinances, and keepe my lawes, and do them, and
ye shall dwell in the land in safetie.
19 And the lande shall giue her fruite, and ye shall eate your fill, and dwell
therein in safetie.
20 And if ye shall say, What shall we eate the seuenth yeere, for we shall not
sowe, nor gather in our increase?
21 I will sende my blessing vpon you in the sixt yeere, and it shall bring
foorth fruite for three yeeres.
22 And ye shall sowe the eight yeere, & eate of the olde fruite vntill the ninth
yeere: vntill the fruite thereof come, ye shall eate the olde.
23 Also the lande shall not be solde to be cut off from the familie: for the
land is mine, and ye be but strangers and soiourners with me.
24 Therefore in all the land of your possession ye shall graunt a redemption for
the lande.
25 If thy brother be impouerished, and sell his possession, then his redeemer
shall come, euen his neere kinsman, and bye out that which his brother solde.
26 And if he haue no redeemer, but hath gotten and founde to bye it out,
27 Then shal he count the yeeres of his sale, & restore the ouerplus to the man,
to whome he solde it: so shall he returne to his possession.
28 But if he can not get sufficient to restore to him, then that which is solde,
shall remaine in the hande of him that hath bought it, vntill the yere of the
Iubile: and in the Iubile it shal come out, and he shall returne vnto his
possession.
29 Likewise if a man sell a dwelling house in a walled citie, he may bye it out
againe within a whole yeere after it is solde: within a yeere may he bye it out.
30 But if it be not bought out within ye space of a ful yeere, then the house
that is in the walled citie, shalbe stablished, as cut off from the familie, to
him that bought it, throughout his generations: it shall not goe out in the
Iubile.
31 But the houses of villages, which haue no walles round about them, shalbe
esteemed as the fielde of the countrey: they may be bought out againe, and shall
goe out in the Iubile.
32 Notwithstanding, the cities of the Leuites, and the houses of the cities of
their possession, may the Leuites redeeme at all seasons.
33 And if a man purchase of the Leuites, the house that was solde, and the citie
of their possession shall goe out in the Iubile: for the houses of the cities of
the Leuites are their possession among the children of Israel.
34 But the fielde of the suburbes of their cities, shall not be solde: for it is
their perpetuall possession.
35 Moreouer, if thy brother be impouerished, and fallen in decay with thee, thou
shalt relieue him, and as a stranger and soiourner, so shall he liue with thee.
36 Thou shalt take no vsurie of him, nor vantage, but thou shalt feare thy God,
that thy brother may liue with thee.
37 Thou shalt not giue him thy money to vsurie, nor lende him thy vitailes for
increase.
38 I am the Lorde your God, which haue brought you out of the lande of Egypt, to
giue you the lande of Canaan, and to be your God.
39 If thy brother also that dwelleth by thee, be impouerished, and be sold vnto
thee, thou shalt not compel him to serue as a bond seruant,
40 But as an hired seruant, and as a soiourner he shalbe with thee: he shall
serue thee vnto the yeere of the Iubile.
41 Then shall he depart from thee, both hee, and his children with him, and
shall returne vnto his familie, and vnto the possession of his fathers shall he
returne:
42 For they are my seruants, whom I brought out of the lande of Egypt: they
shall not be solde as bondmen are solde.
43 Thou shalt not rule ouer him cruelly, but shalt feare thy God.
44 Thy bond seruant also, & thy bond maid, which thou shalt haue, shalbe of the
heathen that are rounde about you: of them shall ye bye seruants and maydes.
45 And moreouer of the children of the stragers, that are soiourners among you,
of them shall ye bye, and of their families that are with you, which they begate
in your lande: these shall be your possession.
46 So ye shall take them as inheritance for your children after you, to possesse
them by inheritance, ye shall vse their labours for euer: but ouer your brethren
the children of Israel ye shall not rule one ouer another with crueltie.
47 If a soiourner or a stranger dwelling by thee get riches, & thy brother by
him be impouerished, and sell him selfe vnto the stranger or soiourner dwelling
by thee, or to the stocke of the strangers familie,
48 After that he is solde, he may be bought out: one of his brethren may bye him
out,
49 Or his vncle, or his vncles sonne may bye him out, or any of the kindred of
his flesh among his familie, may redeeme him: either if he can get so much, he
may bye him selfe out.
50 Then he shall recken with his byer from the yeere that he was solde to him,
vnto the yere of Iubile: and the money of his sale shalbe according to the
number of yeeres: according to the time of an hyred seruant shall he be with
him.
51 If there be many yeeres behind, according to them he shall giue againe for
his deliuerance, of the money that he was bought for.
52 If there remaine but fewe yeeres vnto the yeere of Iubile, then he shall
count with him, and according to his yeeres giue againe for his redemption.
53 He shalbe with him yeere by yeere as an hired seruant: he shall not rule
cruelly ouer him in thy sight.
54 And if he be not redeemed thus, he shal go out in the yeere of Iubile, he,
and his children with him.
55 For vnto me the children of Israel are seruants: they are my seruants, who I
haue brought out of the land of Egypt: I am ye Lord your God.

Chapter 26

1 Ye shall make you none idoles nor grauen image, neither reare you vp any
pillar, neither shal ye set any image of stone in your land to bow downe to it:
for I am the Lord your God.
2 Ye shall keepe my Sabbaths, and reuerence my Sanctuarie: I am the Lorde.
3 If ye walke in mine ordinances, and keepe my commandements, and doe them,
4 I will then sende you raine in due season, and the land shal yelde her
increase, and the trees of the fielde shall giue her fruite.
5 And your threshing shall reache vnto the vintage, and the vintage shall reache
vnto sowing time, and you shall eate your bread in plenteousnesse, and dwell in
your land safely.
6 And I will sende peace in the land, and ye shall sleepe and none shal make you
afraid: also I will rid euill beastes out of the lande, and the sworde shall not
go through your lande.
7 Also ye shall chase your enemies, and they shall fall before you vpon the
sworde.
8 And fiue of you shall chase an hundreth, and an hundreth of you shall put ten
thousande to flight, and your enemies shall fall before you vpon the sworde.
9 For I will haue respect vnto you, and make you encrease, and multiplie you,
and establish my couenant with you.
10 Ye shall eate also olde store, and cary out olde because of the newe.
11 And I will set my Tabernacle among you, and my soule shall not lothe you.
12 Also I will walke among you, and I wil be your God, and ye shalbe my people.
13 I am the Lorde your God which haue brought you out of the lande of Egypt,
that yee should not be their bondmen, & I haue broken ye bonds of your yoke, &
made you goe vpright.
14 But if ye will not obey me, nor do all these commandements,
15 And if ye shall despise mine ordinances, either if your soule abhorre my
lawes, so that yee will not do all my commandements, but breake my couenant,
16 Then wil I also do this vnto you, I wil appoint ouer you fearefulnes, a
consumption, and the burning ague to consume the eyes, and make the heart
heauie, and you shall sowe your seede in vaine: for your enemies shall eate it:
17 And I will set my face against you, and ye shal fal before your enemies, &
they that hate you, shall raigne ouer you, and yee shall flee when none pursueth
you.
18 And if ye wil not for these things obey me, then wil I punish you seuen times
more, according to your sinnes,
19 And I wil breake the pride of your power, and I will make your heauen as
yron, and your earth as brasse:
20 And your strength shalbe spent in vaine: neither shall your lande giue her
increase, neither shall the trees of the land giue their fruite.
21 And if ye walke stubburnly against me, and will not obey mee, I will then
bring seuen times mo plagues vpon you, according to your sinnes.
22 I will also sende wilde beastes vpon you, which shall spoyle you, and destroy
your cattell, & make you fewe in number: so your hye waies shalbe desolate.
23 Yet if by these ye will not be reformed by me, but walke stubburnly against
me,
24 Then wil I also walke stubburnly against you, and I will smite you yet seuen
times for your sinnes:
25 And I wil send a sword vpon you, that shal auenge the quarel of my couenant:
and when ye are gathered in your cities, I wil send the pestilence among you,
and ye shall be deliuered into the hand of the enemie.
26 When I shall breake the staffe of your bread, then ten women shal bake your
breade in one ouen, & they shal deliuer your bread againe by weight, and ye
shall eate, but not be satisfied.
27 Yet if ye will not for this obey mee, but walke against me stubburnly,
28 Then will I walke stubburnly in mine anger against you, and I will also
chastice you seuen times more according to your sinnes.
29 And ye shall eate ye flesh of your sonnes, & the flesh of your daughters
shall ye deuoure.
30 I will also destroy your hye places, & cut away your images, and cast your
carkeises vpon the bodies of your idoles, and my soule shall abhorre you.
31 And I will make your cities desolate, and bring your Sanctuarie vnto nought,
and will not smell the sauour of your sweete odours.
32 I will also bring the land vnto a wildernes, and your enemies, which dwell
therein, shalbe astonished thereat.
33 Also I wil scatter you among the heathen, and will drawe out a sworde after
you, & your land shalbe waste, & your cities shalbe desolate.
34 Then shall the land inioy her Sabbaths, as long as it lieth voide, and yee
shalbe in your enemies land: then shall the land rest, and enioy her Sabbaths.
35 All the dayes that it lieth voide, it shal rest, because it did not rest in
your Sabbaths, when ye dwelt vpon it.
36 And vpon them that are left of you, I will send euen a faintnes into their
hearts in ye land of their enemies, & the sounde of a leafeshaken shal chase
them, and they shall flee as fleeing from a sword, and they shall fall, no man
pursuing them.
37 They shall fall also one vpon another, as before a sword, though none pursue
them, and ye shall not be able to stand before your enemies:
38 And ye shall perish among the heathen, & the land of your enemies shall eate
you vp.
39 And they that are left of you, shall pine away for their iniquitie, in your
enemies landes, and for the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away
with them also.
40 Then they shall confesse their iniquitie, & the wickednes of their fathers
for their trespasse, which they haue trespassed against mee, and also because
they haue walked stubburnly against me.
41 Therefore I wil walke stubburnly against them, and bring them into the land
of their enemies: so then their vncircumcised hearts shalbe humbled, and then
they shalt willingly beare the punishment of their iniquitie.
42 Then I will remember my couenant with Iaakob, and my couenant also with
Izhak, and also my couenant with Abraham will I remember, and will remember the
land.
43 The land also in the meane season shalbe left of them, & shall enioye her
Sabbaths while she lieth waste without them, but they shall willingly suffer the
punishment of their iniquitie, because they despised my lawes, and because their
soule abhorred mine ordinances.
44 Yet notwithstanding this, when they shalbe in the lande of their enemies, I
wil not cast them away, neither will I abhorre them, to destroy them vtterly,
nor to breake my couenant with them: for I am the Lord their God:
45 But I will remember for them the couenant of olde when I brought them out of
ye land of Egypt in the sight of the heathen that I might be their God: I am the
Lorde.
46 These are the ordinances, and the iudgements, and the lawes, which the Lorde
made betweene him, and the children of Israel in mount Sinai, by the hand of
Moses.

Chapter 27

1 Moreouer the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, If any man shall make a
vowe of a person vnto the Lord, by thy estimation,
3 Then thy estimation shall bee thus: a male from twentie yeere olde vnto sixty
yeere olde shalbe by thy estimation euen fifty shekels of siluer, after the
shekel of the Sanctuarie.
4 But if it be a female, then thy valuation shal be thirtie shekels.
5 And from fiue yere old to twentie yere olde thy valuation shall be for the
male twentie shekels, and for the female ten shekels.
6 But fro a moneth old vnto fiue yere old, thy price of the male shall bee fiue
shekels of siluer, and thy price of the female, three shekels of siluer.
7 And from sixty yeere olde and aboue, if he be a male, then thy price shalbe
fifteene shekels, and for the female ten shekels.
8 But if he be poorer then thou hast esteemed him, then shall hee present
himselfe before the Priest, & the Priest shal value him, according to the
abilitie of him that vowed, so shall the Priest value him.
9 And if it be a beast, whereof men bring an offering vnto the Lorde, all that
one giueth of such vnto the Lorde, shalbe holy.
10 He shall not alter it nor change it, a good for a badde, nor a badde for a
good: and if hee change beast for beast, then both this and that, which was
changed for it, shall be holy.
11 And if it be any vncleane beast, of which men do not offer a sacrifice vnto
the Lorde, hee shall then present the beast before the Priest.
12 And the Priest shall value it, whether it be good or bad: and as thou valuest
it, which art the Priest, so shall it bee.
13 But if he will bye it againe, then hee shall giue the fift part of it more,
aboue thy valuation.
14 Also whe a man shall dedicate his house to be holy vnto the Lorde, then the
Priest shall value it, whether it be good or bad, and as ye Priest shall prise
it, so shall the value be.
15 But if he that sanctified it, will redeeme his house, then hee shall giue
thereto the fift part of money more then thy estimation, & it shalbe his.
16 If also a man dedicate to the Lorde any grounde of his inheritance, then
shalt thou esteeme it according to the seede therof: an Homer of barlie seede
shalbe at fiftie shekels of siluer.
17 If he dedicate his field immediately from the yeere of Iubile, it shall bee
worth as thou doest esteeme it.
18 But if hee dedicate his fielde after the Iubile, then the Priest shall recken
him the money according to ye yeeres that remaine vnto the yere of Iubile, and
it shalbe abated by thy estimation.
19 And if he that dedicateth it, will redeeme the fielde, then he shall put the
fift parte of the price, that thou esteemedst it at, thereunto, and it shall
remaine his.
20 And if he will not redeeme the fielde, but the Priest sell the fielde to
another man, it shalbe redeemed no more.
21 But the field shalbe holy to the Lord, whe it goeth out in the Iubile, as a
fielde separate from common vses: the possession thereof shall be the Priests.
22 If a man also dedicate vnto ye Lord a fielde which he hath bought, which is
not of the groud of his inheritance,
23 Then the Priest shall set the price to him, as thou esteemest it, vnto the
yeere of Iubile, & he shall giue thy price the same day, as a thing holy vnto
the Lord.
24 But in the yeere of Iubile, the fielde shall returne vnto him, of whome it
was bought: to him, I say, whose inheritance the land was.
25 And all thy valuation shall bee according to the shekel of the Sanctuarie: a
shekel conteyneth twenty gerahs.
26 Notwithstanding the first borne of the beastes, because it is the Lordes
first borne, none shall dedicate such, be it bullocke, or sheepe; for it is the
Lords.
27 But if it be an vncleane beast, then he shall redeeme it by thy valuation,
and giue the fift part more thereto: & if it be not redeemed, then it shalbe
solde, according to thy estimation.
28 Notwithstanding, nothing separate from the common vse that a man doeth
separate vnto the Lord of all that he hath (whether it bee man or beast, or
lande of his inheritance) may be solde nor redeemed: for euery thing separate
from the common vse is most holy vnto the Lorde.
29 Nothing separate from the common vse, which shall be separate from man,
shalbe redeemed, but dye the death.
30 Also all the tithe of the lande both of the seede of the ground, and of the
fruite of the trees is the Lords: it is holy to the Lorde.
31 But if a man will redeeme any of his tithe, he shal adde the fift part
thereto.
32 And euery tithe of bullock, and of sheepe, and of all that goeth vnder the
rod, the tenth shalbe holy vnto the Lord.
33 He shal not looke if it be good or bad, neither shall he change it: els if he
change it, both it, and that it was changed withall, shalbe holy, and it shall
not be redeemed.
34 These are the commaundements which the Lord commaunded by Moses vnto the
children of Israel in mount Sinai.


Numbers

Chapter 1

1 The Lorde spake againe vnto Moses in the wildernesse of Sinai, in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, in the first day of the second moneth, in the
second yere after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying,
2 Take ye the summe of all the Congregation of the children of Israel, after
their families, and housholdes of their fathers with the nomber of their names:
to wit, all the males, man by man:
3 From twentie yere olde and aboue, all that go forth to the warre in Israel,
thou and Aaron shall number them, throughout their armies.
4 And with you shalbe men of euery tribe, such as are the heads of the house of
their fathers.
5 And these are the names of the men that shall stand with you, of the tribe of
Reuben, Elizur, the sonne of Shedeur:
6 Of Simeon, Shelumiel the sonne of Zurishaddai:
7 Of Iudah, Nahshon the sonne of Amminadab:
8 Of Issachar, Nethaneel, the sonne of Zuar:
9 Of Zebulun, Eliab, the sonne of Helon:
10 Of the children of Ioseph: of Ephraim, Elishama the sonne of Ammihud: of
Manasseh, Gamliel, the sonne of Pedahzur:
11 Of Beiamin, Abida the sonne of Gideoni:
12 Of Dan, Ahiezer, the sonne of Ammishaddai:
13 Of Asher, Pagiel, the sonne of Ocran:
14 Of Gad, Eliasaph, the sonne of Deuel:
15 Of Naphtali, Ahira the sonne of Enan.
16 These were famous in the Congregation, princes of the tribes of their
fathers, and heads ouer thousands in Israel.
17 The Moses and Aaron tooke these men which are expressed by their names.
18 And they called all the Congregation together, in the first day of the second
moneth, who declared their kindreds by their families, and by the houses of
their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie yere olde
and aboue, man by man.
19 As the Lord had commanded Moses, so he nombred them in the wildernesse of
Sinai.
20 So were the sonnes of Reuben Israels eldest sonne by their generations, by
their families, and by the houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of
their names, man by man euery male from twentie yere olde and aboue, as many as
went forth to warre:
21 The nomber of them, I say, of the tribe of Reuben, was sixe and fourtie
thousande, and fiue hundreth.
22 Of the sonnes of Simeon by their generatios, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, the summe therof by the nomber of their names, man by
man, euery male fro twentie yeere olde and aboue, all that went forth to warre:
23 The summe of them, I say, of the tribe of Simeon was nine and fiftie
thousande, and three hundreth.
24 Of the sonnes of Gad by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yere olde and aboue, all that went forth to warre:
25 The number of them, I say, of the tribe of Gad was fiue and fourtie thousand,
and six hundreth and fiftie.
26 Of the sonnes of Iudah by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yere olde and aboue, all that went forth to warre:
27 The nomber of them, I say, of the tribe of Iudah was three score and
fourteene thousande, and sixe hundreth.
28 Of the sonnes of Issachar by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went forth to warre:
29 The nomber of them also of the tribe of Issachar was foure and fiftie
thousande and foure hundreth.
30 Of the sonnes of Zebulun by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the number of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went foorth to warre:
31 The nomber of them also of the tribe of Zebulun was seuen and fiftie thousand
and foure hundreth.
32 Of the sonnes of Ioseph, namely of the sonnes of Ephraim by their
generations, by their families, and by the houses of their fathers, according to
the nomber of their names, from twentie yeere olde and aboue, all that went
foorth to warre:
33 The nomber of them also of the tribe of Ephraim was fourtie thousande & fiue
hundreth.
34 Of the sonnes of Manasseh by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went foorth to warre:
35 The nober of the also of ye tribe of Manasseh was two & thirtie thousand &
two hundreth.
36 Of the sonnes of Beniamin by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went foorth to warre:
37 The nomber of them also of the tribe of Beniamin was fiue and thirtie
thousande and foure hundreth.
38 Of the sonnes of Dan by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went foorth to warre:
39 The nomber of the also of ye tribe of Dan was three score & two thousand &
seue hudreth.
40 Of the sonnes of Asher by their generations, by their families, and by the
houses of their fathers, according to the number of their names, from twentie
yeere olde and aboue, all that went foorth to warre:
41 The nomber of them also of ye tribe of Asher was one & fourtie thousand &
fiue hudreth.
42 Of the children of Naphtali, by their generations, by their families, and by
the houses of their fathers, according to the nomber of their names, from
twentie yeere olde and aboue, all that went to the warre:
43 The nomber of them also of the tribe of Naphtali, was three and fiftie
thousand, & foure hundreth.
44 These are the summes which Moses, and Aaron nombred, and the Princes of
Israel, the twelue men, which were euery one for the house of their fathers.
45 So this was all the summe of the sonnes of Israel, by the houses of their
fathers, from twenty yeere olde and aboue, all that went to the warre in Israel,
46 And all they were in nomber sixe hudreth and three thousande, fiue hundreth
and fiftie.
47 But the Leuites, after the tribes of their fathers were not nombred among
them.
48 For the Lord had spoken vnto Moses, and said,
49 Onely thou shalt not number the tribe of Leui, neither take the summe of them
among the children of Israel:
50 But thou shalt appoynt the Leuites ouer the Tabernacle of the Testimonie, &
ouer all the instruments thereof, and ouer all things that belong to it: they
shall beare the Tabernacle, and all the instruments thereof, & shall minister in
it, and shall dwell round about the Tabernacle.
51 And when the Tabernacle goeth forth, the Leuites shall take it downe: and
when the Tabernacle is to be pitched, ye Leuites shall set it vp: for the
stranger that commeth nere, shalbe slaine.
52 Also the children of Israel shal pitch their tentes, euery man in his campe,
and euery man vnder his standerd throughout their armies.
53 But the Leuites shall pitch rounde about the Tabernacle of the Testimonie,
least vengeance come vpon the Congregation of the children of Israel, and the
Leuites shall take the charge of the Tabernacle of the Testimonie.
54 So the children of Israel did according to all that ye Lord had comanded
Moses: so did they.

Chapter 2

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, and to Aaron, saying,
2 Euery man of the children of Israel shall campe by his standerd, and vnder the
ensigne of their fathers house: farre off about the Tabernacle of the
Congregation shall they pitch.
3 On the East side towarde the rising of the sunne, shall they of the standerd
of the hoste of Iudah pitch according to their armies: and Nahshon the sonne of
Amminadab shalbe captaine of the sonnes of Iudah.
4 And his hoste and the nomber of the were seuentie and foure thousande and sixe
hundreth.
5 Next vnto him shall they of the tribe of Issachar pitch, and Nethaneel the
sonne of Zuar shalbe the captaine of the sonnes of Issachar:
6 And his hoste, & the nomber thereof were foure and fiftie thousand, and foure
hundreth.
7 Then the tribe of Zebulun, and Eliab the sonne of Helon, captaine ouer the
sonnes of Zebulun:
8 And his hoste, and the nomber thereof seuen and fiftie thousand and foure
hundreth:
9 The whole nomber of the hoste of Iudah are an hundreth fourescore and sixe
thousande, and foure hundreth according to their armies: they shall first set
foorth.
10 On the South side shalbe ye standerd of the host of Reuben according to their
armies, & the captaine ouer the sonnes of Reuben shalbe Elizur the sonne of
Shedeur.
11 And his host, and the nomber thereof sixe and fourty thousand and fiue
hundreth.
12 And by him shal the tribe of Simeon pitch, and the captaiue ouer the sonnes
of Simeon shall be Shelumiel the sonne of Zurishaddai:
13 And his hoste, and the nomber of them, nine and fiftie thousand and three
hundreth.
14 And the tribe of Gad, and the captaine ouer the sonnes of Gad shall be
Eliasaph the sonne of Deuel:
15 And his host and the nomber of the were fiue and fourtye thousande, sixe
hundreth and fiftie.
16 All the nomber of the campe of Reuben were an hundreth and one and fiftie
thousande, and foure hundreth and fiftie according to their armies, and they
shall set foorth in the seconde place.
17 Then the Tabernacle of the Congregation shall goe with the host of the
Leuites, in the mids of the campe as they haue pitched, so shall they goe
forwarde, euery man in his order according to their standerds.
18 The standerd of the campe of Ephraim shalbe toward the west according to
their armies: and ye captaine ouer the sonnes of Ephraim shall be Elishama the
sonne of Ammihud:
19 And his host and the nomber of the were fortie thousand and fiue hundreth.
20 And by him shalbe the tribe of Manasseh, and the captaine ouer the sonnes of
Manasseh shalbe Gamliel the sonne of Pedahzur:
21 And his hoste and the nomber of them were two and thirtie thousand and two
hundreth.
22 And the tribe of Beniamin, and ye captaine ouer the sonnes of Beniamin shalbe
Abidan the sonne of Gideoni:
23 And his host, and the nomber of the were fiue and thirtie thousand and foure
hundreth.
24 All the nomber of the campe of Ephraim were an hundreth and eight thousande
and one hundreth according to their armies, and they shal go in the third place.
25 The standerd of the host of Dan shalbe toward the North according to their
armies: and the captaine ouer the children of Dan shall be Ahiezer the sonne of
Ammishaddai:
26 And his host & the number of them were two and threescore thousand and seue
hundreth.
27 And by him shal the tribe of Asher pitch, and the captaine ouer the sonnes of
Asher shalbe Pagiel the sonne of Ocran.
28 And his host and the nomber of them were one and fourtie thousand and fiue
hundreth.
29 Then the tribe of Naphtali, and the captaine ouer the children of Naphtali
shall be Ahira the sonne of Enan:
30 And his host and the nomber of them were three and fiftie thousand and foure
hundreth.
31 All the nomber of the host of Dan was an hundreth and seuen and fiftie
thousand and sixe hundreth: they shall goe hinmost with their standerdes.
32 These are the summes of the childre of Israel by ye houses of their fathers,
all the nomber of ye host, according to their armies, six hundreth and three
thousand, fiue hundreth and fiftie.
33 But the Leuites were not nombred among the children of Israel, as the Lord
had commanded Moses.
34 And the children of Israel did according to all that the Lord had commanded
Moses: so they pitched according to their standards, and so they iourneyed euery
one with his families, according to the houses of their fathers.

Chapter 3

1 These also were the generations of Aaron & Moses, in the day that the Lorde
spake with Moses in mount Sinai.
2 So these are the names of the sonnes of Aaron, Nadab the first borne, and
Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.
3 These are the names of the sonnes of Aaron the anoynted Priests, whom Moses
did consecrate to minister in the Priests office.
4 And Nadab and Abihu died before the Lord, when they offred strange fire before
the Lord in the wildernesse of Sinai, and had no children: but Eleazar and
Ithamar serued in ye Priestes office in the sight of Aaron their father.
5 Then the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
6 Bring the tribe of Leui, and set the before Aaron the Priest that they may
serue him,
7 And take the charge with him, euen the charge of the whole Congregation before
the Tabernacle of the Congregation to doe the seruice of the Tabernacle.
8 They shall also keepe all the instrumentes of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, and haue the charge of the children of Israel to doe the seruice
of the Tabernacle.
9 And thou shalt giue the Leuites vnto Aaron and to his sonnes: for they are
giuen him freely from among the children of Israel.
10 And thou shalt appoint Aaron & his sonnes to execute their Priestes office:
and the stranger that commeth neere, shalbe slayne.
11 Also the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
12 Beholde, I haue euen taken the Leuites fro among the childre of Israel: for
al the first borne that openeth the matrice among the children of Israel, and
the Leuites shalbe mine,
13 Because all the first borne are mine: for the same day, that I smote all the
first borne in the land of Egypt, I sanctified vnto me all the first borne in
Israel, both man and beast: mine they shalbe: I am the Lord.
14 Moreouer, the Lord spake vnto Moses in the wildernesse of Sinai, saying,
15 Nomber the children of Leui after the houses of their fathers, in their
families: euery male from a moneth olde and aboue shalt thou nomber.
16 Then Moses nombred them according to the word of the Lord, as he was
commanded.
17 And these are the sonnes of Leui by their names, Gershon, and Kohath, and
Merari.
18 Also these are the names of the sonnes of Gershon by their families: Libni
and Shimei.
19 The sonnes also of Kohath by their families: Amram, and Izehar, Hebron, and
Vzziel.
20 And the sonnes of Merari by their families: Mahli and Mushi. These are the
families of Leui, according to the houses of their fathers.
21 Of Gershon came the familie of the Libnites, and the familie of the
Shimeites: these are the families of the Gershonites.
22 The summe whereof ( after the nomber of all the males from a moneth olde and
aboue) was counted seuen thousand and fiue hundreth.
23 The families of the Gershonites shall pitch behind the Tabernacle westward.
24 The captaine and auncient of the house of the Gershonites shalbe Eliasaph the
sonne of Lael.
25 And the charge of the sonnes of Gershon in the Tabernacle of the Congregation
shall be the Tabernacle, and the pauilion, the couering thereof, and the vaile
of the dore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
26 And the hanging of the court, & the vaile of the doore of the court, which is
neere the Tabernacle, and neere ye Altar round about, and the cordes of it for
all the seruice thereof.
27 And of Kohath came the familie of the Amramites, and the familie of the
Izeharites, and the familie of the Hebronites, and the familie of the
Vzzielites: these are the families of the Kohathites.
28 The nomber of all the males from a moneth olde and aboue was eight thousand
and sixe hundreth, hauing the charge of the Sanctuarie.
29 The families of the sonnes of Kohath shall pitch on the Southside of the
Tabernacle.
30 The captaine and auncient of the house, & families of the Kohathites shall be
Elizaphan the sonne of Vzziel:
31 And their charge shalbe the Arke, and the Table, & the Candlesticke, & the
altars, and the instruments of the Sanctuarie that they minister with, and the
vaile, and all that serueth thereto.
32 And Eleazar the sonne of Aaron the Priest shalbe chiefe captaine of the
Leuites, hauing the ouersight of them that haue the charge of the Sanctuarie.
33 Of Merari came the familie of the Mahlites, and the familie of the Mushites:
these are the families of Merari.
34 And the summe of them, according to the nomber of all the males, from a
moneth olde and aboue was sixe thousand and two hundreth.
35 The captaine and the ancient of the house of the families of Merari shalbe
Zuriel the sonne of Abihail: they shall pitche on the Northside of the
Tabernacle.
36 And in ye charge and custodie of the sonnes of Merari shall be the boardes of
the Tabernacle, and the barres thereof, and his pillars, and his sockets, and al
the instruments therof, and al that serueth thereto,
37 With the pillars of the court round about, with their sockets, and their pins
& their coardes.
38 Also on the forefront of the Tabernacle toward the East, before the
Tabernacle, I say, of the Congregation Eastwarde shal Moses and Aaron and his
sonnes pitch, hauing the charge of the Sanctuarie, and the charge of the
children of Israel: but the stranger that commeth neere, shall be slayne.
39 The wholesumme of ye Leuites, which Moses and Aaron nombred at the
commaundement of the Lord throughout their families, euen al the males from a
moneth olde & aboue, was two and twentie thousand.
40 And the Lord said vnto Moses, Nomber all the first borne that are Males among
the children of Israel, from a moneth old and aboue, and take the nomber of
their names.
41 And thou shalt take ye Leuites to me for all the first borne of the children
of Israel (I am the Lorde) and the cattell of the Leuites for all the first
borne of the cattell of the children of Israel.
42 And Moses nombred, as the Lord commanded him, all the first borne of the
children of Israel.
43 And all the first borne males rehearsed by name (from a moneth olde and
aboue) according to their nomber were two & twentie thousand, two hundreth
seuentie and three.
44 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
45 Take the Leuites for all the first borne of the children of Israel, and the
cattell of the Leuites for their cattel, and the Leuites shalbe mine, (I am the
Lord)
46 And for the redeeming of the two hundreth seuentie and three, (which are moe
then the Leuites) of the first borne of the children of of Israel,
47 Thou shalt also take fiue shekels for euery person: after the weight of the
Sanctuarie shalt thou take it: ye shekel conteineth twenty gerahs.
48 And thou shalt giue the money, wherwith the odde nomber of them is redeemed,
vnto Aaron and to his sonnes.
49 Thus Moses tooke the redemption of the that were redeemed, being mo then the
Leuites:
50 Of the first borne of the children of Israel tooke he the mony: eue a
thousand three hundreth three score and fiue shekels after the shekel of the
Sanctuarie.
51 And Moses gaue the money of them that were redeemed, vnto Aaron and to his
sonnes according to the word of the Lord, as the Lord had commanded Moses.

Chapter 4

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, and to Aaron, saying,
2 Take the summe of the sonnes of Kohath fro among the sonnes of Leui, after
their families, and houses of their fathers,
3 From thirtie yeere olde and aboue, euen vntill fiftie yeere olde, all that
enter into the assemblie to do the worke in the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
4 This shall be the office of the sonnes of Kohath in the Tabernacle of the
Congregatìon about the Holiest of all.
5 When the hoste remoueth, then Aaron and his sonnes shall come and take downe
the couering vaile, and shall couer the Arke of the Testimonie therewith.
6 And they shall put thereon a couering of badgers skinnes, and shall spread
vpon it a cloth altogether of blewe silke, and put to the barres thereof:
7 And vpon ye table of shew bread they shall spread a cloth of blewe silke, and
put thereon the dishes, and the incense cups, and goblets, and couerings to
couer it with, and the bread shall be thereon continually:
8 And they shal spread vpon them a couering of skarlet, and couer the same with
a couering of badgers skinnes, and put to the barres thereof.
9 Then they shall take a cloth of blewe silke, and couer the candlesticke of
light with his lampes and his snuffers, and his snuffedishes, and al the oyle
vessels thereof, which they occupie about it.
10 So they shal put it, and all the instruments thereof in a couering of badgers
skinnes, and put it vpon the barres.
11 Also vpon the golden altar they shall spread a cloth of blewe silke, and
couer it with a couering of badgers skinnes, & put to the barres thereof.
12 And they shall take all the instruments of the ministerie wherewith they
minister in the Sanctuarie, and put them in a cloth of blew silke, & couer the
with a couering of badgers skinnes, and put them on the barres.
13 Also they shall take away the ashes from the altar, and spread a purple cloth
vpon it,
14 And shall put vpon it all the instruments thereof, which they occupie about
it: the censers, the fleshhookes and the besomes, & the basens, euen al the
instruments of the altar and they shal spread vpon it a couering of badgers
skinnes, and put to the barres of it.
15 And when Aaron and his sonnes haue made an ende of couering the Sanctuarie,
and al the instruments of the Sanctuarie, at the remouing of the host, afterward
the sonnes of Kohath shall come to beare it, but they shall not touch any holy
thing, lest they dye. This is the charge of the sonnes of Kohath in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation.
16 And to the office of Eleazar the sonne of Aaron the Priest pertaineth the
oyle for the light, and the sweete incense and the dayly meat offring, and the
anointing oyle, with the ouersight of all the Tabernacle, and of all that
therein is, both in the Sanctuarie and in all the instruments thereof.
17 And the Lord spake vnto Moses and to Aaron, saying,
18 Ye shal not cut off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among
the Leuites:
19 But thus do vnto them, that they may liue and not die, when they come neere
to the most holy things: let Aaron and his sonnes come and appoynt them, euery
one to his office, and to his charge.
20 But let them not goe in, to see when the Sanctuarie is folden vp, lest they
die.
21 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
22 Take also ye summe of the sonnes of Gershon, euery one by the houses of their
fathers throughout their families:
23 From thirtie yere old and aboue, vntil fiftie yere old shalt thou nomber
them, al that enter into the assemblie for to do seruice in the Tabernacle of
the Congregation.
24 This shall be the seruice of the families of the Gershonites, to serue and to
beare.
25 They shall beare the curtaines of the Tabernacle, and the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, his couering, and the couering of badgers skinnes, that is on hie
vpon it, and the vayle of the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation:
26 The curtaines also of the court, & the vaile of the entring in of the gate of
the court, which is neere the Tabernacle & neere the altar round about, with
their cordes, and all the instrumentes for their seruice, and all that is made
for them: so shall they serue.
27 At the commaundement of Aaron and his sonnes shall all the seruice of the
sonnes of ye Gershonites bee done, in all their charges and in all their
seruice, and ye shall appoynt them to keepe all their charges.
28 This is the seruice of the families of the sonnes of the Gershonites in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, and their watch shall be vnder the hande of
Ithamar the sonne of Aaron the Priest.
29 Thou shalt nomber the sonnes of Merari by their families, and by the houses
of their fathers:
30 From thirty yere olde and aboue, euen vnto fiftie yere olde shalt thou nomber
the, all that enter into the assemblie, to doe the seruice of the Tabernacle of
the Congregation.
31 And this is their office and charge according to all their seruice in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation: the boardes of the Tabernacle witth the barres
thereof, and his pillars, and his sockets,
32 And the pillars rounde about the court, with their sockets and their pinnes,
& their cords, with all their instruments, euen for all their seruice: and by
name ye shall recken the instruments of their office and charge.
33 This is the seruice of the families of the sonnes of Merari, according to all
their seruice in the Tabernacle of the Congregation vnder the hand of Ithamar
the sonne of Aaron the Priest.
34 Then Moses and Aaron and the princes of the Congregation nombred the sonnes
of the Kohathites, by their families and by the houses of their fathers,
35 From thirtie yeere olde and aboue, euen vnto fiftie yere olde, all that enter
into the assemblie for the seruice of the Tabernacle of ye Congregation.
36 So the nombers of the throughout their families were two thousande, seuen
hundreth and fiftie.
37 These are the nombers of the families of the Kohathites, al that serue in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, which Moses and Aaron did nomber according to
the commandement of the Lord by the hand of Moses.
38 Also the nombers of the sonnes of Gershon throughout their families & houses
of their fathers,
39 From thirtie yere olde and vpwarde, euen vnto fiftie yere olde: all that
enter into the assemblie for the seruice of the Tabernacle of the Cogregation.
40 So the nombers of them by their families, and by the houses of their fathers
were two thousand sixe hundreth and thirtie.
41 These are the nombers of the families of the sonnes of Gershon: of all that
did seruice in the Tabernacle of the Congregation, whom Moses and Aaron did
nomber according to the commandement of the Lord.
42 The nombers also of the families of the sonnes of Merari by their families,
and by the houses of their fathers,
43 From thirtie yeere olde and vpwarde, euen vnto fiftie yeere olde: all that
enter into the assemblie for the seruice of the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
44 So the nombers of them by their families were three thousand, and two
hundreth.
45 These are the summes of ye families of the sonnes of Merari, whom Moses and
Aaron nombred according to the commaundement of the Lord, by the hand of Moses.
46 So all the nombers of the Leuites, which Moses, and Aaron, and the princes of
Israel nombred by their families and by the houses of their fathers,
47 From thirtie yere olde and vpward, euen to fiftie yeere olde, euery one that
came to doe his duetie, office, seruice and charge in the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
48 So the nombers of them were eight thousand, fiue hundreth and foure score.
49 According to the commaundement of the Lord by the hand of Moses did Aaron
nomber them, euery one according to his seruice, and according to his charge.
Thus were they of that tribe nombred, as the Lorde commaunded Moses.

Chapter 5

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Commaund the children of Israel that they put out of the hoste euery leper,
and euery one that hath an issue, and whosoeuer is defiled by the dead.
3 Both male and female shal ye put out: out of the hoste shall yee put them,
that they defile not their tentes among whome I dwell.
4 And the children of Israel did so, and put them out of the host, euen as the
Lord had commanded Moses, so did the children of Israel.
5 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
6 Speake vnto the children of Israel, When a man or woman shall commit any sinne
that men commit, and transgresse against the Lorde, when that person shall
trespasse,
7 Then they shall confesse their sinne which they haue done, and shall restore
the domage thereof with his principall, and put the fift part of it more
thereto, and shall giue it vnto him, against whom he hath trespassed.
8 But if the man haue no kinseman, to whom he shoulde restore the domage, the
domage shal be restored to the Lord for the Priests vse besides the ramme of the
atonement, whereby hee shall make atonement for him.
9 And euery offring of all the holy thinges of the children of Israel, which
they bring vnto the Priest, shalbe his.
10 And euery mans halowed things shall bee his: that is, whatsoeuer any man
giueth the Priest, it shalbe his.
11 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
12 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, If any mans wife turne
to euill, and commit a trespasse against him,
13 So that an other man lie with her fleshly, and it bee hid from the eyes of
her husbande, and kept close, and yet she be defiled, and there be no witnesse
against her, neither she taken with the maner,
14 If he be moued with a ielous minde, so that he is ielous ouer his wife, which
is defiled, or if he haue a ielous minde, so that he is ielous ouer his wife,
which is not defiled,
15 Then shall the man bring his wife to the Priest, and bring her offering with
her, the tenth part of an Ephah of barly meale, but he shal not powre oyle vpon
it, nor put incense thereon: for it is an offring of ielousie, an offring for a
remembrance, calling the sinne to minde:
16 And the Priest shall bring her, and set her before the Lord.
17 Then the Priest shal take the holy water in an earthen vessel, and of the
dust that is in the floore of the Tabernacle, euen the Priest shal take it and
put it into the water.
18 After, the Priest shal set the woman before the Lord, and vncouer the womans
head, and put the offring of the memorial in her hands: it is the ielousie
offering, and the Priest shall haue bitter and cursed water in his hand,
19 And the Priest shall charge her by an oth, and say vnto the woman, If no man
haue lien with thee, neither thou hast turned to vncleannesse from thine
husbande, be free from this bitter and cursed water.
20 But if thou hast turned fro thine husband, and so art defiled, and some man
hath lyen with thee beside thine husband,
21 (Then the Priest shall charge the woman with an oth of cursing, and the
Priest shal say vnto the woman) The Lorde make thee to be accursed, and
detestable for the othe among thy people, and the Lord cause thy thigh to rot,
and thy belly to swell:
22 And that this cursed water may goe into thy bowels, to cause thy belly to
swell, and thy thigh to rot. Then the woman shall answere, Amen, Amen.
23 After, the Priest shal write these curses in a booke, and shall blot them out
with the bitter water,
24 And shal cause the woman to drinke ye bitter and cursed water, and the cursed
water, turned into bitternesse, shal enter into her.
25 Then the Priest shall take the ielousie offring out of the womans hand, and
shal shake the offring before the Lord, and offer it vpon ye altar.
26 And the Priest shal take an handfull of the offring for a memorial thereof,
and burne it vpon the altar, and afterwarde make the woman drinke the water.
27 When yee haue made her drinke the water, (if she bee defiled and haue
trespassed against her husband) then shall the cursed water, turned into
bitternesse, enter into her, and her belly shall swell, and her thigh shall rot,
and the woman shal be accursed among her people.
28 But if the woman bee not defiled, but bee cleane, she shalbe free & shall
conceiue & beare.
29 This is the law of ielousie, when a wife turneth from her husband and is
defiled,
30 Or when a man is moued with a ielous minde being ielous ouer his wife then
shall he bring the woman before the Lord, and the Priest shal do to her
according to al this lawe,
31 And the man shalbe free from sinne, but this woman shall beare her iniquitie.

Chapter 6

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, & say vnto them, When a man or a woman
doeth separate themselues to vowe a vowe of a Nazarite to separate himselfe vnto
the Lord,
3 He shall absteine fro wine & strong drinke, and shal drinke no sowre wine nor
sowre drinke, nor shall drinke any licour of grapes, neither shal eate fresh
grapes nor dryed.
4 As long as his abstinence endureth, shall hee eat nothing that is made of the
wine of the vine, neither the kernels, nor the huske.
5 While hee is separate by his vowe, the rasor shall not come vpon his head,
vntill the dayes be out, in the which he separateth him selfe vnto the Lord, he
shalbe holy, and shall let the lockes of the heare of his head growe.
6 During the time that he separateth himselfe vnto the Lord, he shall come at no
dead body:
7 Hee shall not make himselfe vncleane at the death of his father, or mother,
brother, or sister: for the consecration of his God is vpon his head.
8 All the dayes of his separation he shalbe holy to the Lord.
9 And if any dye suddenly by him, or hee beware, then the head of his
consecration shall be defiled, and he shall shaue his head in the day of his
clensing: in the seuenth day he shall shaue it.
10 And in the eight day hee shall bring two turtles, or two yong pigeons to the
Priest, at the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
11 Then the Priest shall prepare the one for a sinne offering, and the other for
a burnt offering, and shall make an atonement for him, because he sinned by the
dead: so shall he halowe his head the same day,
12 And he shall consecrate vnto the Lorde the dayes of his separation, and shal
bring a lambe of a yeere olde for a trespasse offering, and the first dayes
shalbe voide: for his consecration was defiled.
13 This then is the lawe of the Nazarite: When the time of his consecration is
out, he shall come to the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
14 And hee shall bring his offering vnto the Lorde, an hee lambe of a yeere olde
without blemish for a burnt offering, and a shee lambe of a yere olde without
blemish for a sinne offring, and a ramme without blemish for peace offrings,
15 And a basket of vnleauened bread, of cakes of fine floure, mingled with oyle,
and wafers of vnleauened bread anointed with oile, with their meate offring, and
their drinke offrings:
16 The which the Priest shal bring before the Lorde, and make his sinne offering
and his burnt offering.
17 He shal prepare also the ram for a peace offring vnto the Lorde, with the
basket of vnleauened bread, and the Priest shal make his meate offring, and his
drinke offring.
18 And the Nazarite shall shaue the head of his consecration at the doore of the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, & shall take the heare of the head of his
consecration, and put it in the fire, which is vnder the peace offring.
19 Then the Priest shall take ye sodden shoulder of the ramme, and an vnleauened
cake out of the basket, and a wafer vnleauened, and put them vpon the hands of
the Nazarite, after he hath shauen his consecration.
20 And the Priest shal shake them to & fro before the Lorde: this is an holy
thing for the Priest besides the shaken breast, and besides the heaue shoulder:
so afterwarde the Nazarite may drinke wine.
21 This is the Lawe of the Nazarite, which he hath vowed, and of his offering
vnto the Lord for his consecration, besides that that hee is able to bring:
according to the vowe which he vowed, so shall he do after the lawe of his
consecration.
22 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
23 Speake vnto Aaron and to his sonnes, saying, Thus shal ye blesse the childre
of Israel, and say vnto them,
24 The Lord blesse thee, and keepe thee,
25 The Lorde make his face shine vpon thee, and be merciful vnto thee,
26 The Lord lift vp his coutenance vpon thee, and giue thee peace.
27 So they shal put my Name vpo the children of Israel, and I wil blesse them.

Chapter 7

1 Nowe when Moses had finished the setting vp of the Tabernacle, and anointed it
& sanctified it, and all the instrumentes thereof, and the altar with al the
instruments thereof, and had anoynted them and sanctified them,
2 Then the princes of Israel, heads ouer the houses of their fathers (they were
the princes of the tribes, who were ouer them that were nombred) offred,
3 And brought their offring before the Lord, sixe couered charets, and twelue
oxen: one charet for two princes, and for euery one an oxe, and they offred them
before the Tabernacle.
4 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
5 Take these of them, that they may be to doe the seruice of the Tabernacle of
the Congregation, and thou shalt giue them vnto the Leuites, to euery man
according vnto his office.
6 So Moses tooke the charets and the oxen, and gaue them vnto the Leuites:
7 Two charets and foure oxen hee gaue to the sonnes of Gershon, according vnto
their office.
8 And foure charets and eight oxen hee gaue to the sonnes of Merari according
vnto their office, vnder the hand of Ithamar the sonne of Aaron the Priest.
9 But to the sonnes of Kohath he gaue none, because the charge of the Sanctuarie
belonged to them, which they did beare vpon their shoulders.
10 The princes also offered in the dedication for the altar in the day that it
was anoynted: then the princes offered their offering before the altar.
11 And the Lord sayd vnto Moses, One prince one day, and an other prince an
other day shal offer their offring, for the dedication of the altar.
12 So then on the first day did Nahshon the sonne of Amminadab of ye tribe of
Iudah offer his offring.
13 And his offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels
weight, a siluer boule of seuenty shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie,
both ful of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
14 An incense cup of gold of tenne shekels, ful of incense,
15 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
16 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
17 And for peace offrings, two bullockes, fiue rams, fiue hee goates, and fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Nahshon the sonne of Amminadab.
18 The second day Nethaneel, the sonne of Zuar, prince of the tribe of Issachar
did offer:
19 Who offred for his offring a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie
shekels weight, a siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the
Sanctuarie, both ful of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meat offring,
20 An incense cup of gold of ten shekels, ful of incense,
21 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
22 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
23 And for peace offrings, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Nethaneel the sonne of Zuar.
24 The third day Eliab the sonne of Helon prince of the children of Zebulun
offred.
25 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirty shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both ful
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
26 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, ful of incense,
27 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
28 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
29 And for peace offrings, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offering of Eliab the sonne of Helon.
30 The fourth day Elizur ye sonne of Shedeur prince of the children of Reuben
offred.
31 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuary, both ful of
fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
32 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
33 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yere olde for a burnt offring,
34 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
35 And for a peace offring, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, and
fiue lambes of a yere olde: this was the offering of Elizur the sonne of
Shedeur.
36 The fifth day Shelumiel the sonne of Zurishaddai, prince of the children of
Simeon offered.
37 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuary, both ful of
fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
38 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
39 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
40 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
41 And for a peace offring, two bullocks, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yere old: this was the offering of Shelumiel the sonne of
Zurishaddai.
42 The sixt day Eliasaph the sonne of Deuel prince of the children of Gad
offred.
43 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both ful
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
44 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
45 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yere olde, for a burnt offring,
46 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
47 And for a peace offering, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yere olde: this was the offring of Eliasaph the sonne of Deuel.
48 The seuenth day Elishama the sonne of Ammiud prince of the children of
Ephraim offered.
49 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuary, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offering,
50 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
51 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
52 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
53 And for a peace offring, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Elishama the sonne of Ammiud.
54 The eight day offred Gamliel the sonne of Pedazur, prince of the children of
Manasseh.
55 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
56 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
57 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
58 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
59 And for a peace offring, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Gamliel the sonne of Pedazur.
60 The ninth day Abidan the sonne of Gideoni prince of the children of Beniamin
offered.
61 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
62 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, full of incense,
63 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
64 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
65 And for a peace offring, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Abidan the sonne of Gideoni.
66 The tenth day Ahiezer the sonne of Ammishaddai, prince of the children of Dan
offred.
67 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
68 A golden incense cup of ten shekels full of incense,
69 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yeere olde for a burnt offring,
70 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
71 And for a peace offring, two bullocks, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Ahiezer the sonne of
Ammishaddai.
72 The eleuenth day Pagiel the sonne of Ocran, prince of the children of Asher
offred.
73 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
74 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, ful of incense,
75 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yere olde for a burnt offring,
76 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
77 And for a peace offring, two bullockes, fiue rams, fiue he goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offring of Pagiel the sonne of Ocran.
78 The twelfth day Ahira the sonne of Enan, prince of the children of Naphtali
offred,
79 His offring was a siluer charger of an hundreth and thirtie shekels weight, a
siluer boule of seuentie shekels, after the shekel of the Sanctuarie, both full
of fine floure, mingled with oyle, for a meate offring,
80 A golden incense cup of ten shekels, ful of incense,
81 A yong bullocke, a ram, a lambe of a yere olde for a burnt offring,
82 An hee goate for a sinne offring,
83 And for peace offerings, two bullockes, fiue rammes, fiue hee goates, fiue
lambes of a yeere olde: this was the offering of Ahira the sonne of Enan.
84 This was the dedication of the Altar by the princes of Israel, whe it was
anointed: twelue chargers of siluer, twelue siluer boules, twelue incense cuppes
of golde,
85 Euery charger, conteining an hundreth and thirtie shekels of siluer, and
euery boule seuentie: all the siluer vessell conteined two thousande and foure
hundreth shekels, after the shekell of the Sanctuarie.
86 Twelue incense cups of gold ful of incense, conteining ten shekels euery cup,
after the shekell of the Sanctuarie: all the gold of the incense cups was an
hundreth and twentie shekels.
87 All the bullockes for the burnt offering were twelue bullocks, the rams
twelue, the lambs of a yeere olde twelue, with their meate offrings, and twelue
hee goates for a sinne offring.
88 And all the bullocks for the peace offrings were foure and twentie bullockes,
the rammes sixtie, the hee goates sixtie, the lambes of a yeere olde sixtie:
this was the dedication of the Altar, after that it was anointed.
89 And when Moses went into the Tabernacle of the Congregation, to speake with
God, he heard the voyce of one speaking vnto him from the Merciseat, that was
vpon the Arke of the Testimonie betweene the two Cherubims, and he spake to him.

Chapter 8

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto Aaron, and say vnto him, When thou lightest the lampes, the seuen
lampes shall giue light towarde the forefront of the Candlesticke.
3 And Aaron did so, lighting the lampes thereof towarde ye forefront of the
Candlesticke, as the Lorde had commanded Moses.
4 And this was the worke of the Candlesticke, euen of golde beaten out with the
hammer, both the shafte, and the flowres thereof was beaten out with the hammer:
according to the paterne, which the Lord had shewed Moses, so made he the
Candlesticke.
5 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
6 Take the Leuites from among the children of Israel, and purifie them.
7 And thus shalt thou doe vnto them, when thou purifiest them, Sprinckle water
of purification vpon them, & let them shaue all their flesh, and wash their
clothes: so they shalbe cleane.
8 Then they shal take a yong bullocke with his meate offring of fine floure,
mingled with oyle, and another yong bullocke shalt thou take for a sinne
offring.
9 Then thou shalt bring the Leuites before the Tabernacle of the Congregation, &
asseble all the Congregation of the children of Israel.
10 Thou shalt bring the Leuites also before the Lorde, and the children of
Israel shall put their handes vpon the Leuites.
11 And Aaron shall offer the Leuites before the Lord, as a shake offring of ye
childre of Israel, that they may execute the seruice of the Lorde.
12 And the Leuites shall put their handes vpon the heades of the bullockes, and
make thou the one a sinne offring, and the other a burnt offring vnto the Lorde,
that thou mayest make an atonement for the Leuites.
13 And thou shalt set the Leuites before Aaron and before his sonnes, & offer
the as a shake offring to the Lorde.
14 Thus thou shalt separate the Leuites from among the children of Israel, and
the Leuites shal be mine.
15 And afterwarde shall the Leuites goe in, to serue in the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, and thou shalt purifie them and offer them, as a shake offering.
16 For they are freely giuen vnto me from among the children of Israel, for such
as open any wombe: for all the first borne of the children of Israel haue I
taken them vnto me.
17 For all the first borne of the children of Israel are mine, both of man and
of beast: since the day that I smote euery first borne in the land of Egypt, I
sanctified them for my selfe.
18 And I haue taken the Leuites for all the first borne of the children of
Israel,
19 And haue giuen the Leuites as a gift vnto Aaron, and to his sonnes from among
the children of Israel, to do the seruice of the children of Israel in the
Tabernacle of the Congregation, and to make an atonement for the children of
Israel, that there be no plague among the children of Israel, when the children
of Israel come neere vnto the Sanctuarie.
20 Then Moses and Aaron and all the Cogregation of the children of Israel did
with the Leuites, according vnto all that the Lorde had commanded Moses
concerning the Leuites: so did the children of Israel vnto them.
21 So the Leuites were purified, and washed their clothes, and Aaron offred them
as a shake offring before the Lord, and Aaron made an atonement for them, to
purifie them.
22 And after that, went the Leuites in to doe their seruice in the Tabernacle of
the Congregation, before Aaron and before his sonnes: as the Lorde had
commaunded Moses concerning the Leuites, so they did vnto them.
23 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
24 This also belongeth to the Leuites: from fiue and twentie yeere olde and
vpwarde, they shall goe in, to execute their office in the seruice of the
Tabernacle of the Congregation.
25 And after the age of fiftie yeere, they shall cease from executing the
office, and shall serue no more:
26 But they shal minister with their brethre in the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, to keepe things committed to their charge, but they shall doe no
seruice: thus shalt thou doe vnto the Leuites touching their charges.

Chapter 9

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses in the wildernes of Sinai, in the first moneth
of the second yeere, after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying,
2 The children of Israel shall also celebrate the Passeouer at ye time appointed
thereunto.
3 In the fourtenth day of this moneth at euen, ye shall keepe it in his due
season: according to all the ordinances of it, and according to all the
ceremonies thereof shall ye keepe it.
4 Then Moses spake vnto the children of Israel, to celebrate the Passeouer.
5 And they kept the Passeouer in the fouretenth day of the first moneth at euen
in the wildernesse of Sinai: according to all that the Lord had comanded Moses,
so did ye children of Israel.
6 And certaine men were defiled by a dead man, that they might not keepe the
Passeouer the same day: and they came before Moses & before Aaron the same day.
7 And those men said vnto him, We are defiled by a dead man: wherefore are wee
kept backe that we may not offer an offering vnto the Lorde in the time
thereunto appointed among the children of Israel?
8 Then Moses saide vnto them, Stande still, and I will heare what the Lorde will
commande concerning you.
9 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
10 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say, If any amog you, or of your
posteritie shalbe vncleane by ye reason of a corps, or be in a log iourney, he
shall keepe the Passeouer vnto ye Lord.
11 In the fourtenth day of the second moneth at euen they shall keepe it: with
vnleauened bread and sowre herbes shall they eate it.
12 They shall leaue none of it vnto the morning, nor breake any bone of it:
according to all the ordinance of the Passeouer shall they keepe it.
13 But the man that is cleane and is not in a iourney, and is negligent to keepe
the Passeouer, the same person shalbe cut off from his people: because he
brought not the offring of the Lorde in his due season, that man shall beare his
sinne.
14 And if a stranger dwell among you, and wil keepe the Passeouer vnto the Lord,
as the ordinance of the Passeouer, & as the maner thereof is, so shall he do: ye
shall haue one lawe both for the stranger, and for him that was borne in the
same lande.
15 And when the Tabernacle was reared vp, a cloude couered the Tabernacle,
namely the Tabernacle of the Testimonie: and at euen there was vpon the
Tabernacle, as the appearance of fire vntill the morning.
16 So it was always: the cloude couered it by day, and the appearance of fire by
night.
17 And when the cloude was taken vp from the Tabernacle, then afterwarde the
children of Israel iourneyed: and in the place where the cloude abode, there the
children of Israel pitched their tents.
18 At the commaundement of the Lorde the children of Israel iourneyed, and at
the comandement of the Lorde they pitched: as long as the cloude abode vpon the
Tabernacle, they lay still.
19 And when the cloude taryed stil vpon the Tabernacle a long time, the childre
of Israel kept the watch of the Lorde, and iourneyed not.
20 So when the cloud abode a few dayes vpon the Tabernacle, they abode in their
tents according to the comandement of ye Lord: for they iourneyed at the
commandement of the Lorde.
21 And though the cloud abode vpo the Tabernacle from euen vnto the morning, yet
if the cloude was taken vp in the morning, then they iourneyed: whether by daye
or by night the cloude was taken vp, then they iourneyed.
22 Or if the cloude taryed two dayes or a moneth, or a yeere vpon the
Tabernacle, abiding thereon, the children of Israel abode still, and iourneyed
not: but when it was taken vp, they iourneyed.
23 At the commandement of the Lord they pitched, and at the commandement of the
Lorde they iourneyed, keeping the watch of the Lorde at the commaundement of the
Lorde by the hand of Moses.

Chapter 10

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Make thee two trumpets of siluer: of an whole piece shalt thou make the, that
thou mayest vse them for the assembling of the Congregation, and for the
departure of the campe.
3 And when they shall blowe with them, all the Congregation shall assemble to
thee before the doore of the Tabernacle of the Cogregation.
4 But if they blowe with one, then the princes, or heades ouer the thousandes of
Israel shall come vnto thee.
5 But if ye blow an alarme, then the campe of the that pitch on the East part,
shal go forward.
6 If ye blowe an alarme the second time, then the hoste of them that lie on the
Southside shal march: for they shal blowe an alarme when they remoue.
7 But in assembling the Congregation, ye shall blowe without an alarme.
8 And the sonnes of Aaron the Priest shall blowe the trumpets, and ye shall haue
them as a lawe for euer in your generations.
9 And when ye goe to warre in your lande against the enemie that vexeth you, ye
shall blowe an alarme with the trumpets, and ye shall bee remembred before the
Lorde your God, and shalbe saued from your enemies.
10 Also in the day of your gladnesse, and in your feast dayes, & in the
beginning of your moneths, ye shal also blow the trumpets ouer your burnt
sacrifices, and ouer your peace offrings, that they may be a remembrance for you
before your God: I am the Lorde your God.
11 And in the seconde yeere, in the seconde moneth, and in the twentieth day of
the moneth the cloude was taken vp from the Tabernacle of the Testimonie.
12 And ye children of Israel departed on their iourneys out of the desart of
Sinai, & the cloud rested in the wildernesse of Paran.
13 So they first tooke their iourney at the comandement of the Lord, by ye hand
of Moses.
14 In the first place went the standerd of the hoste of the children of Iudah,
according to their armies: and Nahshon the sonne of Amminabad was ouer his band.
15 And ouer the band of the tribe of the children of Issachar was Nethaneel ye
sonne of Zuar.
16 And ouer the band of the tribe of the children of Zebulun was Eliab the sonne
of Helon.
17 When the Tabernacle was taken downe, then the sonnes of Gershon, and the
sonnes of Merari went forward bearing the Tabernacle.
18 After, departed the standerd of the hoste of Reuben, according to their
armies, and ouer his band was Elizur the sonne of Shedeur.
19 And ouer the band of the tribe of ye children of Simeon was Shelumiel the
sonne of Shurishaddai.
20 And ouer the bande of the tribe of ye children of Gad was Eliasaph the sonne
of Deuel.
21 The Kohathites also went forward and bare the Sanctuarie, and the former did
set vp the Tabernacle against they came.
22 Then the standerd of the hoste of the children of Ephraim went forward
according to their armies, and ouer his bande was Elishama the sonne of Ammiud.
23 And ouer the band of the tribe of ye sonnes of Manasseh was Gamliel the sonne
of Pedazur.
24 And ouer the band of ye tribe of the sonnes of Beniamin was Abidan the sonne
of Gideoni.
25 Last, the standerd of the hoste of the children of Dan marched, gathering all
ye hostes according to their armies: and ouer his bande was Ahiezer the sonne of
Ammishaddai.
26 And ouer the bande of the tribe of the children of Asher was Pagiel the sonne
of Ocran.
27 And ouer the bande of the tribe of the children of Naphtali was Ahira ye
sonne of Enan.
28 These were the remouings of the children of Israel according to their armies,
whe they marched.
29 After, Moses said vnto Hobab ye sonne of Reuel the Midianite, ye father in
law of Moses, We go into the place, of which ye Lord said, I will giue it you:
Come thou with vs, & we wil doe thee good: for ye Lord hath promised good vnto
Israel.
30 And he answered him, I will not goe: but I will depart to mine owne countrey,
and to my kindred.
31 Then he sayd, I pray thee, leaue vs not: for thou knowest our camping places
in the wildernesse: therefore thou mayest be our guide.
32 And if thou go with vs, what goodnes the Lord shall shew vnto vs, the same
will we shewe vnto thee.
33 So they departed from the mount of the Lorde, three dayes iourney: and the
Arke of the couenant of the Lorde went before them in the three dayes iourney,
to searche out a resting place for them.
34 And the cloude of the Lord was vpon the by day, when they went out of the
campe.
35 And when the Arke went forwarde, Moses saide, Rise vp, Lord, & let thine
enemies bee scattered, & let them that hate thee, flee before thee.
36 And when it rested, hee sayde, Returne, O Lord, to the many thousands of
Israel.

Chapter 11

1 Vvhen the people became murmurers, it displeased the Lorde: and the Lorde
heard it, therefore his wrath was kindled, and the fire of the Lorde burnt among
them, and consumed the vtmost parte of the hoste.
2 Then the people cryed vnto Moses: and when Moses praied vnto the Lorde, the
fire was quenched.
3 And he called the name of that place Taberah, because the fire of the Lorde
burnt among them.
4 And a nomber of people that was amog them, fell a lusting, and turned away,
and the children of Israel also wept, and saide, Who shall giue vs flesh to
eate?
5 We remember the fish which we did eat in Egypt for nought, the cucumbers, &
the pepons, and the leekes, and the onions, and the garleke.
6 But now our soule is dryed away, we can see nothing but this Man.
7 (The Man also was as coriander seede, and his colour like the colour of
bdelium.
8 The people went about and gathered it, and ground it in milles, or beat it in
morters, and baked it in a cauldron, and made cakes of it, and the taste of it
was like vnto the taste of fresh oyle.
9 And when the dewe fell downe vpon the hoste in the night, the Man fell with
it)
10 Then Moses heard the people weepe throughout their families, euery man in the
doore of his tent, and the wrath of the Lord was grieuously kindled: also Moses
was grieued.
11 And Moses saide vnto the Lorde, Wherefore hast thou vexed thy seruant? And
why haue I not found fauour in thy sight, seeing thou hast put the charge of al
this people vpon mee?
12 Haue I conceiued al this people? Or haue I begotte them, that thou shouldest
say vnto me, Cary them in thy bosome (as a nurse beareth the sucking childe)
vnto the lande, for the which thou swarest vnto their fathers?
13 Where should I haue flesh to giue vnto al this people? For they weepe vnto
me, saying, Giue vs flesh that we may eate.
14 I am not able to beare al this people alone, for it is too heauie for me.
15 Therefore if thou deale thus with mee, I pray thee, if I haue founde fauour
in thy sight, kill me, that I behold not my miserie.
16 Then the Lord said vnto Moses, Gather vnto me seuetie men of ye Elders of
Israel, whome thou knowest, that they are the Elders of the people, and
gouernonrs ouer them, & bring them vnto the Tabernacle of the Congregation, and
let them stand there with thee,
17 And I will come downe, and talke with thee there, and take of the Spirite,
which is vpon thee, and put vpon them, and they shall beare the burthen of the
people with thee: so thou shalt not beare it alone.
18 Furthermore thou shalt saye vnto the people, Bee sanctified against to
morowe, and yee shall eate flesh: for you haue wept in the eares of the Lord,
saying, Who shall giue vs flesh to eate? For we were better in Egypt: therefore
the Lorde will giue you flesh, and ye shall eate.
19 Ye shal not eat one day nor two daies, nor fiue daies, neither ten daies, nor
twentie dayes,
20 But a whole moneth, vntill it come out at your nostrels, and bee lothesome
vnto you, because ye haue contemned the Lorde, which is among you, and haue wept
before him, saying, Why came we hither out of Egypt?
21 And Moses saide, Six hundreth thousande footemen are there of the people,
among whom I am: and thou saiest, I will giue them flesh, that they may eate a
moneth long.
22 Shall the sheepe and the beeues be slaine for them, to finde them? Either
shall all the fish of the sea be gathered together for them to suffice them?
23 And the Lorde saide vnto Moses, Is the Lordes hand shortened? Thou shalt see
now whether my word shal come to passe vnto thee, or no.
24 So Moses went out, and told the people the wordes of the Lorde, and gathered
seuentie men of the Elders of the people, and set them round about the
Tabernacle.
25 Then the Lord came downe in a cloude, and spake vnto him, and tooke of the
Spirit that was vpon him, and put it vpon the seuentie Ancient men: & when the
Spirit rested vpon them, then they prophecied, and did not cease.
26 But there remained two of the men in the hoste: the name of the one was
Eldad, and the name of the other Medad, and the Spirit rested vpon them, (for
they were of them that were written, and went not out vnto the Tabernacle) and
they prophecied in the hoste.
27 Then there ranne a yong man, and tolde Moses, and saide, Eldad and Medad doe
prophesie in the hoste.
28 And Ioshua the sonne of Nun the seruant of Moses one of his yong men answered
& said, My lord Moses, forbid them.
29 But Moses saide vnto him, Enuiest thou for my sake? yea, would God that all
the Lordes people were Prophets, and that the Lord woulde put his Spirit vpon
them.
30 And Moses returned into the hoste, he and the Elders of Israel.
31 Then there went foorth a winde from the Lorde, and brought quailes from the
Sea, and let them fall vpon the campe, a dayes iourney on this side, and a dayes
iourney on the other side, round about the hoste, and they were about two
cubites aboue the earth.
32 Then the people arose, al that day, and all the night, and all the next day,
and gathered the quailes: he that gathered the least, gathered ten Homers full,
and they spred them abroade for their vse round about the hoste.
33 While the flesh was yet betweene their teeth, before it was chewed, euen the
wrath of the Lorde was kindled against the people, and the Lorde smote the
people with an exceeding great plague.
34 So the name of the place was called, Kibroth-hattaauah: for there they buried
the people that fell a lusting.
35 From Kibroth-hattaauah ye people tooke their iourney to Hazeroth, & abode at
Hazeroth.

Chapter 12

1 Afterward Miriam and Aaron spake against Moses, because of the woman of
Ethiopia whome hee had maried (for hee had married a woman of Ethiopia)
2 And they saide, What? hath the Lorde spoken but onely by Moses? hath he not
spoken also by vs? and the Lord heard this.
3 (But Moses was a verie meeke man, aboue all the men that were vpon the earth)
4 And by and by the Lorde sayd vnto Moses, and vnto Aaron, and vnto Miriam, come
out yee three vnto the Tabernacle of the Congregation: and they three came
forth.
5 Then the Lorde came downe in the pillar of the cloude, and stoode in the doore
of the Tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam, & they both came forth.
6 And hee saide, Heare nowe my wordes, If there be a Prophet of the Lord among
you, I will be knowen to him by a vision, and will speake vnto him by dreame.
7 My seruant Moses is not so, who is faithfull in all mine house.
8 Vnto him will I speake mouth to mouth, and by vision, and not in darke wordes,
but hee shall see the similitude of the Lorde. Wherefore then were ye not afraid
to speake against my seruant, euen against Moses?
9 Thus the Lorde was very angrie with them, and departed.
10 Also the cloude departed from the Tabernacle: and beholde, Miriam was leprous
like snowe: and Aaron looked vpon Miriam, and beholde, she was leprous.
11 Then Aaron saide vnto Moses, Alas, my Lord, I beseech thee, lay not the sinne
vpon vs, which we haue foolishly committed and wherein we haue sinned.
12 Let her not, I pray thee, be as one dead, of whome the flesh is halfe
consumed, when he commeth out of his mothers wombe.
13 Then Moses cryed vnto the Lord, saying, O God, I beseech thee, heale her
nowe.
14 And the Lord said vnto Moses, If her father had spit in her face, shoulde she
not haue bene ashamed seuen dayes? let her be shut out of the hoste seuen dayes,
and after she shall bee receiued.
15 So Miriam was shut out of the hoste seuen dayes, and the people remooued not,
till Miriam was brought in againe.
16 (13:1) Then afterwarde the people remooued from Hazeroth, and pitched in the
wildernesse of Paran.

Chapter 13

1 (13:2) And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 (13:3) Sende thou men out to search the lande of Canaan which I giue vnto the
children of Israel: of euery tribe of their fathers shall ye sende a man, such
as are all rulers among them.
3 (13:4) Then Moses sent them out of the wildernesse of Paran at the
commandement of the Lorde: all those men were heades of the children of Israel.
4 (13:5) Also their names are these: of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the sonne
of Zaccur:
5 (13:6) Of the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the sonne of Hori:
6 (13:7) Of the tribe of Iudah, Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh:
7 (13:8) Of the tribe of Issachar, Igal the sonne of Ioseph:
8 (13:9) Of the tribe of Ephraim, Oshea the sone of Nun:
9 (13:10) Of the tribe of Beniamin, Palti the sonne of Raphu:
10 (13:11) Of the tribe of Zebulun, Gaddiel the sone of Sodi:
11 (13:12) Of the tribe of Ioseph, to wit, of the tribe of Manasseh, Gaddi the
sonne of Susi:
12 (13:13) Of the tribe of Dan, Ammiel the sonne of Gemalli:
13 (13:14) Of the tribe of Asher, Sethur the sonne of Michael:
14 (13:15) Of the tribe of Naphtali, Nahbi the sonne of Vophsi:
15 (13:16) Of the tribe of Gad, Geuel the sonne of Machi.
16 (13:17) These are the names of the men, which Moses sent to spie out the
lande: and Moses called ye name of Oshea the sonne of Nun, Iehoshua.
17 (13:18) So Moses sent them to spie out the lande of Canaan, & said vnto them,
Go vp this way toward the South, and go vp into the moutaines,
18 (13:19) And consider the land what it is, and the people that dwel therein,
whether they be strong or weake, either fewe or many,
19 (13:20) Also what the lande is that they dwell in, whether it be good or bad:
and what cities they be, that they dwell in, whether they dwell in tents, or in
walled townes:
20 (13:21) And what the land is: whether it be fat or leane, whether there be
trees therein, or not. And be of good courage, and bring of the fruite of the
lande (for then was the time of the first ripe grapes)
21 (13:22) So they went vp, and searched out the lande, from the wildernesse of
Zin vnto Rehob, to go to Hamath,
22 (13:23) And they ascended toward the South, and came vnto Hebron, where were
Ahiman, Sheshai and Talmai, the sonnes of Anak; Hebron was built seuen yeere
before Zoan in Egypt.
23 (13:24) Then they came to the riuer of Eshcol, and cut downe thence a branch
with one cluster of grapes, and they bare it vpon a barre betwene two, and
brought of the pomegranates and of the figges.
24 (13:25) That place was called the riuer Eshcol, because of the cluster of
grapes, which the children of Israel cut downe thence.
25 (13:26) Then after fourtie dayes, they turned againe from searching of the
land.
26 (13:27) And they went and came to Moses and to Aaron and vnto al the
Congregation of the children of Israel, in the wildernesse of Paran, to Kadesh,
and brought to the, and to all the Congregation tydings, and shewed them the
fruite of the lande.
27 (13:28) And they tolde him, and saide, We came vnto the land whither thou
hast sent vs, and surely it floweth with milke and honie: and here is of the
fruite of it.
28 (13:29) Neuerthelesse the people be strong that dwell in the land, and the
cities are walled and exceeding great: and moreouer, we sawe the sonnes of Anak
there.
29 (13:30) The Amalekites dwell in the South countrey, and the Hittites, and the
Iebusites, & the Amorites dwell in the mountaines, & the Canaanites dwell by the
sea, & by the coast of Iorden.
30 (13:31) Then Caleb stilled the people before Moses, & saide, Let vs go vp at
once, and possesse it: for vndoubtedly we shall ouercome it.
31 (13:32) But the men, that went vp with him, saide, we be not able to goe vp
against the people: for they are stronger then we.
32 (13:33) So they brought vp an euill report of the land which they had
searched for the children of Israel, saying, The lande which we haue gone
through to search it out, is a land that eateth vp the inhabitants thereof: for
all the people that we sawe in it, are men of great stature.
33 (13:34) For there we sawe gyants, the sonnes of Anak, which come of the
gyants, so that we seemed in our sight like grashoppers: and so wee were in
their sight.

Chapter 14

1 Then all ye Congregation lifted vp their voice, & cryed: and the people wept
that night,
2 And all the children of Israel murmured against Moses and Aaron: and the whole
assemblie said vnto them, Would God we had died in the land of Egypt, or in this
wildernesse: would God we were dead.
3 Wherefore nowe hath the Lorde brought vs into this lande to fall vpon the
sworde? Our wiues, and our children shall be a pray: were it not better for vs
to returne into Egypt?
4 And they said one to another, Let vs make a Captaine and returne into Egypt.
5 Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before all the assemblie of the
Congregation of the children of Israel.
6 And Ioshua the sonne of Nun, and Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh two of them that
searched the lande, rent their clothes,
7 And spake vnto all the assemblie of the childre of Israel, saying, The land
which we walked through to search it, is a very good lande.
8 If the Lorde loue vs, he will bring vs into this land, and giue it vs, which
is a land that floweth with milke and honie.
9 But rebell not ye against the Lord, neither feare ye the people of the land:
for they are but bread for vs: their shielde is departed from the, and the Lorde
is with vs, feare them not.
10 And all the multitude saide, Stone them with stones: but the glory of the
Lord appeared in the Tabernacle of the Congregation, before all the children of
Israel.
11 And the Lord said vnto Moses, How long will this people prouoke me, and howe
long will it be, yer they beleeue me, for al the signes which I haue shewed
among them?
12 I will smite them with the pestilence and destroy them, and will make thee a
greater nation and mightier then they.
13 But Moses saide vnto the Lorde, When the Egyptians shall heare it, (for thou
broughtest this people by thy power from among them)
14 Then they shall say to the inhabitants of this land, (for they haue heard
that thou, Lorde, art among this people, and that thou, Lorde, art seene face to
face, and that thy cloude standeth ouer them, and that thou goest before them by
day time in a pillar of a cloude, and in a pillar of fire by night)
15 That thou wilt kill this people as one man: so the heathen which haue heard
the fame of thee, shall thus say,
16 Because the Lord was not able to bring this people into the lande, which he
sware vnto them, therefore hath he slaine them in the wildernesse.
17 And now, I beseech thee, let the power of my Lorde be great, according as
thou hast spoken, saying,
18 The Lord is slowe to anger, and of great mercie, and forgiuing iniquitie, and
sinne, but not making the wicked innocent, and visiting the wickednes of the
fathers vpon the children, in the thirde and fourth generation:
19 Be mercifull, I beseech thee, vnto the iniquitie of this people, according to
thy great mercie, and as thou hast forgiuen this people from Egypt, euen vntill
nowe.
20 And the Lord said, I haue forgiuen it, according to thy request.
21 Notwithstanding, as I liue, all the earth shall be filled with the glory of
the Lord.
22 For all those men which haue seene my glory, and my miracles which I did in
Egypt, and in the wildernes, and haue tempted me this ten times, and haue not
obeyed my voyce,
23 Certainely they shall not see the lande, whereof I sware vnto their fathers:
neither shall any that prouoke me, see it.
24 But my seruant Caleb, because he had another spirite, and hath followed me
stil, euen him will I bring into the lande, whither he went, and his seede shall
inherite it.
25 Nowe the Amalekites and the Canaanites remaine in the valley: wherefore turne
backe to morowe, and get you into the wildernesse, by the way of the red Sea.
26 After, the Lorde spake vnto Moses and to Aaron, saying,
27 How long shall I suffer this wicked multitude to murmure against me? I haue
heard the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they murmure against me.
28 Tell them, As I liue (saith the Lorde) I wil surely do vnto you, euen as ye
haue spoken in mine eares.
29 Your carkeises shall fall in this wildernes, and all you that were counted
through all your nombers, from twentie yeere olde and aboue, which haue murmured
against me,
30 Ye shall not doubtles come into the land, for the which I lifted vp mine
hande, to make you dwell therein, saue Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh, and Ioshua
the sonne of Nun.
31 But your children, (which ye said shoulde be a pray) them will I bring in,
and they shall knowe the lande which ye haue refused:
32 But euen your carkeises shall fall in this wildernes,
33 And your children shall wander in the wildernesse, fourtie yeeres, and shall
beare your whoredomes, vntill your carkeises be wasted in the wildernesse.
34 After the nuber of the dayes, in the which ye searched out the lande, euen
fourtie dayes, euery day for a yeere, shall ye beare your iniquity, for fourtie
yeeres, & ye shall feele my breach of promise.
35 I the Lord haue said, Certainely I will doe so to all this wicked company,
that are gathered together against me: for in this wildernesse they shall be
consumed, and there they shall die.
36 And the men which Moses had sent to search the land (which, when they came
againe, made all the people to murmure against him, and brought vp a slander
vpon the lande)
37 Euen those men that did bring vp that vile slander vpon the land, shall die
by a plague before the Lorde.
38 But Ioshua the sonne of Nun, and Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh, of those men
that went to search the land, shall liue.
39 Then Moses tolde these sayings vnto all the children of Israel, and the
people sorowed greatly.
40 And they rose vp earely in the morning, and gate them vp into the toppe of
the mountaine, saying, Loe, we be readie, to goe vp to the place which the Lorde
hath promised: for wee haue sinned.
41 But Moses said, Wherefore transgresse yee thus the commandement of the Lorde?
it will not so come well to passe.
42 Goe not vp (for the Lorde is not among you) lest ye be ouerthrowe before your
enemies.
43 For the Amalekites & the Canaanites are there before you, and ye shall fall
by the sworde: for in as much as ye are turned away from the Lord, the Lord also
will not be with you.
44 Yet they presumed obstinately to goe vp to the top of the mountaine: but the
Arke of the couenant of the Lorde, and Moses departed not out of the campe.
45 Then the Amalekites and the Canaanites, which dwelt in that mountaine, came
downe & smote them, & consumed them vnto Hormah.

Chapter 15

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, Whe ye be come into the
land of your habitations, which I giue vnto you,
3 And will make an offring by fire vnto the Lorde, a burnt offring or a
sacrifice to fulfil a vowe, or a free offring, or in your feastes, to make a
sweete sauour vnto the Lord of the hearde, or of the flocke.
4 Then let him that offreth his offring vnto the Lorde, bring a meate offring of
a tenth deale of fine flowre, mingled with the fourth part of an Hin of oyle.
5 Also thou shalt prepare ye fourth part of an Hin of wine to be powred on a
lambe, appointed for the burnt offring or any offring.
6 And for a ram, thou shalt for a meat offring, prepare two tenth deales of fine
floure, mingled with the third part of an Hin of oyle.
7 And for a drinke ofring, thou shalt offer the third part of an Hin of wine,
for a sweete sauour vnto the Lord.
8 And when thou preparest a bullocke for a burnt offring, or for a sacrifice to
fulfill a vowe or a peace offring to the Lord,
9 Then let him offer with ye bullocke a meate offring of three tenth deales of
fine floure, mingled with halfe an Hin of oyle.
10 And thou shalt bring for a drinke offring halfe an Hin of wine, for an
offring made by fire of a sweete sauour vnto the Lord.
11 Thus shall it be done for a bullocke, or for a ram, or for a lambe, or for a
kid.
12 According to the nomber that yee prepare to offer, so shall yee doe to euery
one according to their nomber.
13 All that are borne of the countrey, shall do these things thus, to offer an
offring made by fire of sweete sauour vnto the Lord.
14 And if a stranger soiourne with you, or whosoeuer bee among you in your
generations, and will make an offring by fire of a sweete sauour vnto the Lord,
as ye do, so hee shall doe.
15 One ordinace shalbe both for you of the Congregation, & also for the stranger
that dwelleth with you, euen an ordinance for euer in your generations: as you
are, so shall the stranger bee before the Lord.
16 One Lawe and one maner shall serue both for you and for the stranger that
soiourneth with you.
17 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
18 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When ye be come into
the lande, to the which I bring you,
19 And when ye shal eate of the bread of the land, ye shall offer an heaue
offring vnto ye Lord.
20 Ye shall offer vp a cake of the first of your dowe for an heaue offring: as
the heaue offring of the barne, so ye shall lift it vp.
21 Of the first of your dowe ye shal giue vnto the Lord an heaue offring in your
generations.
22 And if ye haue erred, and not obserued all these commandements, which the
Lord hath spoken vnto Moses,
23 Euen all that the Lorde hath commanded you by the hand of Moses, from the
first day that the Lord commanded Moses, and hence forward among your
generations:
24 And if so be that ought be committed ignorantly of the Congregation, then all
ye Congregatio shal giue a bullocke for a burnt offring, for a sweete sauour
vnto the Lord, with the meat offring and drinke offring thereto, according to
the maner, and an hee goate for a sinne offring.
25 And the Priest shall make an atonement for al the Congregation of the
children of Israel, and it shalbe forgiuen them: for it is ignorance: and they
shall bring their offring for an offring made by fire vnto the Lord, and their
sinne offering before the Lord for their ignorance.
26 Then it shalbe forgiuen all the Congregation of the children of Israel, & the
stranger that dwelleth among them: for all the people were in ignorance.
27 But if any one person sinne through ignorance, then he shall bring a shee
goate of a yeere olde for a sinne offring.
28 And the Priest shall make an atonement for the ignorant person, when hee
sinneth by ignorance before the Lord, to make reconciliation for him: and it
shalbe forgiuen him.
29 He that is borne among the children of Israel, and the stranger that dwelleth
among them, shall haue both one lawe, who so doth sinne by ignorance.
30 But the person that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be borne in the
land, or a stranger, the same blasphemeth the Lord: therefore that person shalbe
cut off from among his people,
31 Because he hath despised the worde of the Lord, and hath broken his
commandement: that person shalbe vtterly cut off: his iniquitie shalbe vpon him.
32 And while the children of Israel were in the wildernesse, they found a man
that gathered stickes vpon the Sabbath day.
33 And they that found him gathering sticks, brought him vnto Moses and to
Aaron, and vnto all the Congregation,
34 And they put him warde: for it was not declared what should be done vnto him.
35 Then the Lord said vnto Moses, This man shall dye the death: & let al the
multitude stone him with stones without the hoste.
36 And all the Congregation brought him without the hoste, and stoned him with
stones, and he died, as the Lord had commanded Moses.
37 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
38 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and bid them that they make them fringes
vpon the borders of their garments throughout their generations, and put vpon
the fringes of the borders a ryband of blewe silke.
39 And ye shall haue the fringes, that when ye looke vpon them, ye may remember
all the commandemets of the Lord, & do them: & that ye seeke not after your own
heart, nor after your owne eyes, after the which ye go a whoring;
40 That yee may remember and doe all my commandements, and bee holy vnto your
God.
41 I am the Lord your God, which brought you out of the lande of Egypt, to bee
your God: I am the Lord your God.

Chapter 16

1 Nowe Korah the sonne of Izhar, the sonne of Kohath, the sonne of Leui went
apart with Dathan, and Abiram the sonnes of Eliab, & On the sonne of Peleth, the
sonnes of Reuben:
2 And they rose vp against Moses, with certaine of the children of Israel, two
hundreth and fiftie captaines of the assemblie, famous in the Congregation, and
men of renoume,
3 Who gathered themselues together against Moses, and against Aaron, and sayde
vnto them, Ye take too much vpon you, seeing all the Congregation is holie,
euery one of them, and the Lord is among them: wherfore then lift ye your selues
aboue the Congregation of the Lorde?
4 But when Moses heard it, hee fell vpon his face,
5 And spake to Korah and vnto all his companie, saying, To morow the Lord will
shew who is his, and who is holy, and who ought to approche neere vnto him: and
whom he hath chosen, hee will cause to come neere to him.
6 This doe therefore, Take you censers, both Korah, and all his companie,
7 And put fire therein, and put incense in the before the Lord to morowe: and
the man whome the Lord doeth chuse, the same shalbe holie: ye take too much vpon
you, ye sonnes of Leui.
8 Againe Moses saide vnto Korah, Heare, I pray you, ye sonnes of Leui.
9 Seemeth it a smal thing vnto you that the God of Israel hath separated you
from the multitude of Israel, to take you neere to himselfe, to doe the seruice
of the Tabernacle of the Lord, & to stand before the Congregation and to
minister vnto them?
10 He hath also taken thee to him, and all thy brethren the sonnes of Leui with
thee, and seeke ye the office of the Priest also?
11 For which cause, thou, and all thy companie are gathered together against the
Lord: and what is Aaron, that ye murmure against him?
12 And Moses sent to call Dathan, & Abiram the sonnes of Eliab: who answered, We
will not come vp.
13 Is it a small thing that thou hast brought vs out of a lande that floweth
with milke and honie, to kill vs in the wildernesse, except thou make thy selfe
lord and ruler ouer vs also?
14 Also thou hast not brought vs vnto a land that floweth with milke and honie,
neither giuen vs inheritance of fieldes and vineyardes: wilt thou put out the
eyes of these men? we will not come vp.
15 Then Moses waxed verie angry, and saide vnto the Lord, Looke not vnto their
offring: I haue not taken so much as an asse from them, neither haue I hurt any
of them.
16 And Moses said vnto Korah, Bee thou and al thy companie before the Lord: both
thou, they, and Aaron to morowe:
17 And take euery man his censor, and put incense in them, and bring ye euery
man his censor before the Lord, two hundreth and fiftie censors: thou also and
Aaron, euery one his censor.
18 So they tooke euery man his censor, and put fire in them, and laide incense
thereon, and stoode in the doore of the Tabernacle of the Congregation with
Moses and Aaron.
19 And Korah gathered all the multitude against them vnto the doore of the
Tabernacle of the Congregation: then the glorie of the Lorde appeared vnto all
the Congregation.
20 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses and to Aaron, saying,
21 Separate your selues from among this Cogregation, that I may consume them at
once.
22 And they fell vpon their faces and saide, O God the God of the spirits, of
all fleshe, hath not one man onely sinned, and wilt thou bee wroth with all the
Congregation?
23 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
24 Speake vnto the Congregation & say, Get you away from about the Tabernacle of
Korah, Dathan and Abiram.
25 Then Moses rose vp, and went vnto Dathan and Abiram, and the Elders of Israel
followed him.
26 And he spake vnto the Congregation, saying, Depart, I pray you, from the
tentes of these wicked men, and touche nothing of theirs, lest ye perish in all
their sinnes.
27 So they gate them away from the Tabernacle of Korah, Dathan and Abiram on
euerie side: and Dathan, and Abiram came out & stood in the doore of their
tentes with their wiues, and their sonnes, and their little children.
28 And Moses saide, Hereby yee shall knowe that the Lord hath sent me to do all
these works: for I haue not done them of mine owne minde.
29 If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the
visitation of all men, the Lord hath not sent me.
30 But if the Lord make a newe thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallowe
them vp with all that they haue, and they goe downe quicke into ye pit, then ye
shal vnderstand that these men haue prouoked the Lord.
31 And assoone as he had made an ende of speaking all these wordes, euen the
ground claue asunder that was vnder them,
32 And the earth opened her mouth, and swallowed them vp, with their families,
and all the men that were with Korah, and all their goods.
33 So they and all that they had, went down aliue into the pit, and the earth
couered them: so they perished from among the Congregation.
34 And all Israel that were about them, fled at the crie of them: for they said,
Let vs flee, least the earth swalow vs vp.
35 But there came out a fire from the Lorde, and consumed the two hundreth and
fiftie men that offred the incense.
36 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
37 Speake vnto Eleazar, the sonne of Aaron the Priest, that he take vp the
censers out of the burning, and scatter the fire beyond the altar: for they are
halowed,
38 The censers, I say, of these sinners, that destroyed themselues: and let them
make of them broade plates for a couering of the Altar: for they offered them
before the Lorde, therefore they shalbe holy, and they shall be a signe vnto the
children of Israel.
39 Then Eleazar the Priest tooke the brasen censers, which they, that were
burnt, had offred, and made broade plates of them for a couering of the Altar.
40 It is a remembrance vnto the children of Israel, that no stranger which is
not of the seede of Aaron, come neere to offer incense before the Lord, that he
be not like Korah & his copanie, as the Lord said to him by the hand of Moses.
41 But on the morowe all the multitude of the children of Israel murmured
against Moses & against Aaron, saying, Ye haue killed the people of the Lord.
42 And when the Congregation was gathered against Moses and against Aaron, then
they turned their faces toward the Tabernacle of the Congregation: and beholde,
the cloude couered it, and the glory of the Lord appeared.
43 Then Moses and Aaron were come before the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
44 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
45 Get you vp from among this Congregation: for I wil consume them quickly: then
they fell vpon their faces.
46 And Moses said vnto Aaron, Take the censer and put fire therein of the Altar,
and put therein incense, and goe quickly vnto the Congregation, and make an
atonement for them: for there is wrath gone out fro the Lord: the plague is
begunne.
47 Then Aaron tooke as Moses commanded him, and ranne into the middes of the
Congregation, and beholde, the plague was begun among the people, and hee put in
incense, and made an atonement for the people.
48 And when hee stoode betweene the dead, and them that were aliue, the plague
was stayed.
49 So they died of this plague fourtene thousande and seuen hundreth, beside
them that dyed in the conspiracie of Korah.
50 And Aaro went againe vnto Moses before the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, and the plague was stayed.

Chapter 17

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and take of euery one of them a rod, after
the house of their fathers, of all their princes according to the familie of
their fathers, euen twelue rods: and thou shalt write euery mans name vpon his
rod.
3 And write Aarons name vpon the rod of Leui: for euery rodde shalbe for the
head of the house of their fathers.
4 And thou shalt put them in the Tabernacle of the Congregation, before the Arke
of the Testimonie, where I wil declare my selfe to you.
5 And the mans rod, whome I chuse, shall blossome: and I will make cease from
mee the grudgings of the children of Israel, which grudge against you.
6 Then Moses spake vnto the children of Israel, and al their princes gaue him a
rod, one rod for euery Prince, according to the houses of their fathers, euen
twelue rods, and the rod of Aaron was among their roddes.
7 And Moses layde the rods before the Lord in the Tabernacle of the Testimonie.
8 And when Moses on the morow went into the Tabernacle of the Testimonie,
beholde, the rod of Aaron for the house of Leui was budded, and brought forth
buddes, & brought forth blossoms, and bare ripe almondes.
9 Then Moses brought out all the rods from before the Lorde vnto all the
children of Israel: and they looked vpon them, & tooke euery man his rodde.
10 After, the Lord said vnto Moses, Bring Aarons rod againe before the
Testimonie to bee kept for a token to the rebellious children, and thou shalt
cause their murmurings to cease from me, that they dye not.
11 So Moses did as the Lord had commanded him: so did he.
12 And the children of Israel spake vnto Moses, saying, Behold, we are dead, we
perish, we are all lost:
13 Whosoeuer commeth neere, or approcheth to the Tabernacle of the Lorde, shal
dye: shal we be consumed and dye?

Chapter 18

1 And the Lord sayd vnto Aaron, Thou, and thy sonnes and thy fathers house with
thee, shall beare the iniquitie of the Sanctuarie: both thou and thy sonnes with
thee shal beare the iniquitie of your Priestes office.
2 And bring also with thee thy brethren of the tribe of Leui of ye familie of
thy father, which shalbe ioyned with thee, and minister vnto thee: but thou, and
thy sonnes with thee shall minister before the Tabernacle of the Testimonie:
3 And they shal keepe thy charge, euen the charge of all the Tabernacle: but
they shall not come neere the instruments of the Sanctuary, nor to the altar,
lest they die, both they and you:
4 And they shalbe ioyned with thee, & keepe the charge of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation for all the seruice of the Tabernacle: and no stranger shal come
neere vnto you:
5 Therefore shall ye keepe the charge of the Sanctuarie, and the charge of the
altar: so there shall fall no more wrath vpon the children of Israel.
6 For lo, I haue taken your brethren the Leuites from among the children of
Israel, which as a gift of yours, are giuen vnto the Lord, to do the seruice of
the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
7 But thou, and thy sonnes with thee shall keepe your Priestes office for all
things of the altar, and within the vaile: therefore shal ye serue: for I haue
made your Priestes office an office of seruice: therefore the stranger that
cometh neere, shalbe slayne.
8 Againe the Lord spake vnto Aaron, Behold, I haue giuen thee the keeping of
mine offrings, of all the hallowed things of the children of Israel: vnto thee I
haue giuen them for the anoyntings sake, and to thy sonnes, for a perpetuall
ordinance.
9 This shalbe thine of the most holy things, reserued from the fire: all their
offering of all their meate offring, and of all their sinne offring, and of all
their trespasse offring, which they bring vnto me, that shalbe most holy vnto
thee, and to thy sonnes.
10 In the most holy place shalt thou eate it: euery male shal eate of it: it is
holy vnto thee.
11 This also shalbe thine: the heaue offering of their gift, with all the shake
offerings of the children of Israel: I haue giuen them vnto thee and to thy
sonnes and to thy daughters with thee, to be a duetie for euer al the cleane in
thine house shal eate of it.
12 All the fat of the oyle, and all the fat of the wine, and of the wheate,
which they shal offer vnto the Lord for their first fruites, I haue giuen them
vnto thee.
13 And the first ripe of al that is in their land, which they shal bring vnto
Lord, shalbe thine: all the cleane in thine house shal eate of it.
14 Euery thing separate from the common vse in Israel, shalbe thine.
15 All that first openeth the matrice of any flesh, which they shal offer vnto
the Lord, of man or beast, shalbe thine: but the first borne of man shalt thou
redeeme, and the first borne of the vncleane beast shalt thou redeeme.
16 And those that are to bee redeemed, shalt thou redeeme from the age of a
moneth, according to thy estimation, for the money of fiue shekels, after the
shekel of the Sanctuarie, which is twentie gerahs.
17 But the first borne of a kowe, or the first borne of a sheepe, or the first
borne of a goate shalt thou not redeeme: for they are holy: thou shalt sprinkle
their blood at the altar, and thou shalt burne their fat: it is a sacrifice made
by fire for a sweete sauour vnto the Lord.
18 And the flesh of them shalbe thine, as the shake breast, and as the right
shoulder shalbe thine.
19 All the heaue offrings of the holy things which the children of Israel shal
offer vnto the Lorde, haue I giuen thee, and thy sonnes, and thy daughters with
thee, to be a duetie for euer: it is a perpetual couenant of salt before the
Lord, to thee, and to thy seede with thee.
20 And the Lorde sayde vnto Aaron, Thou shalt haue none inheritance in their
lande, neyther shalt thou haue any parte among them: I am thy part & thine
inheritance among the children of Israel.
21 For beholde, I haue giuen the children of Leui all the tenth in Israel for an
inheritance, for their seruice which they serue in the Tabernacle of the
Congregation.
22 Neyther shal the children of Israel any more come neere the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, lest they susteine sinne, and die.
23 But the Leuites shal do the seruice in the Tabernacle of the Congregation,
and they shal beare their sinne: it is a law for euer in your generations, that
among the children of Israel they possesse none inheritance.
24 For the tythes of the children of Israel, which they shal offer as an offring
vnto the Lord, I haue giuen the Leuites for an inheritance: therfore I haue said
vnto them, Among the children of Israel ye shal possesse none inheritance.
25 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
26 Speake also vnto the Leuites and say vnto them, When ye shal take of the
children of Israel the tithes, which I haue giuen you of them for your
inheritance, then shal ye take an heaue offring of that same for the Lorde, euen
the tenth part of the tithe.
27 And your heaue offering shalbe reckened vnto you, as the corne of the barne,
or as the abundance of the wine presse.
28 So ye shal also offer an heaue offring vnto the Lorde of all your tithes,
which ye shal receiue of the children of Israel, and ye shal giue thereof the
Lords heaue offring to Aaron the Priest.
29 Ye shal offer of all your gifts al the Lords heaue offrings: of all the fat
of the same shall ye offer the holy things thereof.
30 Therefore thou shalt say vnto them, When ye haue offred the fat thereof, then
it shalbe couted vnto the Leuites, as the encrease of the corne floore, or as
the encrease of the wine presse.
31 And ye shal eate it in al places, ye, & your housholdes: for it is your wages
for your seruice in the Tabernacle of the Congregation.
32 And ye shal beare no sinne by the reason of it, when ye haue offred the fatte
of it: neither shal ye pollute the holy things of the children of Israel, lest
ye die.

Chapter 19

1 And the Lorde spake to Moses, and to Aaron, saying,
2 This is the ordinance of the lawe, which the Lorde hath commanded, saying,
Speake vnto the children of Israel that they bring thee a red kowe without
blemish, wherein is no spot, vpon the which neuer came yoke.
3 And ye shal giue her vnto Eleazar ye Priest, that hee may bring her without
the hoste, and cause her to be slaine before his face.
4 Then shall Eleazar the Priest take of her blood with his finger, and sprinkle
it before the Tabernacle of the Congregation seuen times,
5 And cause the kow to be burnt in his sight: with her skinne, and her flesh,
and her blood, & her doung shal he burne her.
6 Then shal the Priest take cedar wood, and hyssope & skarlet lace, and cast
them in the mids of the fire where the kow burneth.
7 Then shal the Priest wash his clothes, and he shal wash his flesh in water,
and then come into the hoste, and the Priest shalbe vncleane vnto the euen.
8 Also he that burneth her, shall wash his clothes in water, and wash his flesh
in water, and be vncleane vntill euen.
9 And a man, that is cleane, shal take vp the ashes of the kow, & put them
without the hoste in a cleane place: and it shalbe kept for the Congregation of
the children of Israel for a sprinkling water: it is a sinne offring.
10 Therefore he that gathereth the ashes of the kowe, shal wash his clothes, and
remaine vncleane vntil euen: and it shalbe vnto the children of Israel, and vnto
the stranger that dwelleth among them, a statute for euer.
11 Hee that toucheth the dead body of any man, shalbe vncleane euen seuen dayes.
12 Hee shall purifie himselfe therewith the third day, and the seuenth day he
shall be cleane: but if he purifie not himselfe the thirde day, then the seuenth
day he shall not be cleane.
13 Whosoeuer toucheth ye corps of any man that is dead, and purgeth not
himselfe, defileth the Tabernacle of the Lord, and that person shall be cut off
from Israel, because the sprinkling water was not sprinkled vpon him: he shall
be vncleane, and his vncleannesse shall remaine still vpon him.
14 This is the law, Whe a man dieth in a tent, all that come into the tent, and
all that is in the tent, shalbe vncleane seuen dayes,
15 And all the vessels that bee open, which haue no couering fastened vpon them,
shall be vncleane.
16 Also whosoeuer toucheth one that is slaine with a sworde in the fielde, or a
dead person, or a bone of a dead man, or a graue, shall be vncleane seuen dayes.
17 Therfore for an vncleane person they shall take of the burnt ashes of the
sinne offring, and pure water shalbe put thereto in a vessel.
18 And a cleane person shal take hyssope & dip it in the water, and sprinkle it
vpon the tent, and vpon all the vessels, and on the persons that were therein,
and vpon him that touched ye bone, or the slayne, or the dead, or the graue.
19 And the cleane person shall sprinkle vpon the vncleane the third day, and the
seuenth day, and hee shall purifie him selfe the seuenth day, and wash his
clothes, and wash himself in water, and shalbe cleane at euen.
20 But the man that is vncleane and purifieth not himselfe, that person shalbe
cut off fro among the Congregation, because hee hath defiled the Sanctuarie of
the Lorde: and the sprinkling water hath not bene sprinkled vpon him: therefore
shall he be vncleane.
21 And it shalbe a perpetual lawe vnto them, that he that sprinkleth the
sprinkling water, shall wash his clothes: also hee that toucheth the sprinkling
water, shalbe vncleane vntill euen.
22 And whatsoeuer the vncleane person toucheth, shall be vncleane: and the
person that toucheth him, shalbe vncleane vntill the euen.

Chapter 20

1 Then the children of Israel came with ye whole Congregation to the desert of
Zin in the first moneth, and the people abode at Cadesh: where Miriam died, and
was buried there.
2 But there was no water for the Congregation, and they assembled them selues
against Moses and against Aaron.
3 And the people chode with Moses, & spake, saying, Would God we had perished,
when our brethren died before the Lord.
4 Why haue ye thus brought the Congregation of the Lorde vnto his wildernesse,
that both we, and our cattell should die there?
5 Wherefore nowe haue yee made vs to come vp from Egypt, to bring vs into this
miserable place, which is no place of seede, nor figges, nor vines, nor
pomegranates? Neither is there any water to drinke.
6 Then Moses and Aaron went from the assemblie vnto the doore of the Tabernacle
of the Congregation, and fell vpon their faces: and the glory of the Lord
appeared vnto them.
7 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
8 Take the rod, and gather thou & thy brother Aaron the Congregation together, &
speake yee vnto the rocke before their eyes, and it shall giue foorth his water,
and thou shalt bring them water out of the rocke: so thou shalt giue the
Congregation, and their beastes drinke.
9 Then Moses tooke the rod from before the Lord, as he had commanded him.
10 And Moses and Aaron gathered the Congregation together before the rocke, and
Moses sayd vnto them, Heare nowe, ye rebels: shall we bring you water out of
this rocke?
11 Then Moses lift vp his hande, and with his rod he smote the rocke twise, and
the water came out aboundantly: so the Congregation, and their beastes dranke.
12 Againe the Lorde spake vnto Moses, and to Aaron, Because ye beleeued me not,
to sanctifie mee in the presence of the children of Israel, therefore ye shall
not bring this Congregation into the land which I haue giuen them.
13 This is the water of Meribah, because the children of Israel stroue with the
Lorde, and hee was sanctified in them.
14 Then Moses sent messengers from Kadesh vnto the king of Edom, saying, Thus
sayth thy brother Israel, Thou knowest all the trauaile that we haue had,
15 How our fathers went downe into Egypt, and we dwelt in Egypt a long time,
where the Egyptians handled vs euill and our fathers.
16 But when we cried vnto the Lord, he heard our voyce, and sent an Angel, and
hath brought vs out of Egypt, and beholde, wee are in the citie Kadesh, in thine
vtmost border.
17 I pray thee that we may passe through thy countrey: we will not goe through
the fieldes nor the vineyardes, neither will we drinke of the water of the
welles: we will goe by the kings way, and neither turne vnto the right hand nor
to the left, vntill we be past thy borders.
18 And Edom answered him, Thou shalt not passe by mee, least I come out against
thee with the sword.
19 Then the children of Israel said vnto him, We will goe vp by the hie way: and
if I and my cattell drinke of thy water, I will then pay for it: I will onely
(without any harme) goe through on my feete.
20 Hee answered againe, Thou shalt not goe through. The Edom came out against
him with much people, and with a mightie power.
21 Thus Edom denyed to giue Israel passage through his countrey: wherefore
Israel turned away from him.
22 And when the children of Israel with al the Congregation departed from
Kadesh, they came vnto the mount Hor.
23 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses and to Aaron in the mount Hor neere the coast
of the land of Edom, saying,
24 Aaron shall be gathered vnto his people: for hee shall not enter into the
lande, which I haue giuen vnto the children of Israel, because ye disobeyed my
commaundement at the water of Meribah.
25 Take Aaron and Eleazar his sonne, and bring them vp into the mount Hor,
26 And cause Aaron to put off his garmentes and put them vpon Eleazar his sonne:
for Aaron shall be gathered to his fathers, and shall die there.
27 And Moses did as the Lord had commanded: and they went vp into the mount Hor,
in the sight of all the Congregation.
28 And Moses put off Aarons clothes, & put them vpon Eleazar his sonne: so Aaron
dyed there in the top of the mount: and Moses and Eleazar came downe from off
the mount.
29 When al the Congregation sawe that Aaron was dead, al the house of Israel
wept for Aaron thirtie dayes.

Chapter 21

1 When King Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt toward the South, heard tel that
Israel came by the way of the spies, then fought hee against Israel, and tooke
of them prysoners.
2 So Israel vowed a vowe vnto the Lord, and said, If thou wilt deliuer and giue
this people into mine hand, then I wil vtterly destroy their cities.
3 And the Lord heard the voyce of Israel, and deliuered them the Canaanites: and
they vtterly destroied them and their cities, and called ye name of the place
Hormah.
4 After, they departed from the mount Hor by the way of the red Sea, to compasse
the land of Edom: and the people were sore grieued because of the way.
5 And the people spake against God and against Moses, saying, Wherefore haue ye
brought vs out of Egypt, to die in the wildernesse? for here is neither bread
nor water, & our soule lotheth this light bread.
6 Wherefore the Lorde sent fierie serpents among ye people, which stung the
people: so that many of the people of Israel died.
7 Therefore the people came to Moses & said, We haue sinned: for wee haue spoken
against the Lord, and against thee: pray to the Lorde, that he take away the
serpents from vs: and Moses prayed for the people.
8 And the Lord said vnto Moses, Make thee a fiery serpent, and set it vp for a
signe, that as many as are bitten, may looke vpon it, and liue.
9 So Moses made a serpent of brasse, and set it vp for a signe: and when a
serpent had bitten a man, then he looked to the serpent of brasse, and liued.
10 And ye children of Israel departed thence, and pitched in Oboth.
11 And they departed from Oboth, & pitched in lie-abarim, in the wildernesse,
which is before Moab on the Eastside.
12 They remoued thence, and pitched vpon the riuer of Zared.
13 Thence they departed, & pitched on the other side of Arnon, which is in the
wildernesse, and commeth out of the coasts of the Amorites: (for Arnon is the
border of Moab, betweene the Moabites and the Amorites)
14 Wherefore it shall be spoken in the booke of the battels of the Lorde, what
thing he did in the red sea, and in the riuers of Arnon,
15 And at the streame of the riuers that goeth downe to the dwelling of Ar, and
lieth vpon the border of Moab.
16 And from thence they turned to Beer: the same is the well where the Lord said
vnto Moses, Assemble the people, and I wil giue them water.
17 Then Israel sang this song, Rise vp wel, sing ye vnto it.
18 The princes digged this well, the captaines of the people digged it, euen the
lawe giuer, with their staues; from the wildernesse they came to Mattanah,
19 And from Mattanah to Nahaliel, and from Nahaliel to Bamoth,
20 And from Bamoth in the valley, that is in the plaine of Moab, to the top of
Pisgah that looketh toward Ieshimon.
21 Then Israel sent messengers vnto Sihon, King of the Amorites, saying,
22 Let me goe through thy land: we wil not turne aside into the fieldes, nor
into the vineyardes, neither drinke of the waters of ye welles: we will goe by
the kings way, vntill we be past thy countrey.
23 But Sihon gaue Israel no licence to passe through his countrey, but Sihon
assembled all his people, and went out against Israel into the wildernesse: and
he came to Iahoz, and fought against Israel.
24 But Israel smote him with the edge of the sword, and conquered his land, from
Arnon vnto Iabok, euen vnto ye children of Ammon: for the border of the children
of Ammon was strong.
25 And Israel tooke al these cities, & dwelt in all the cities of the Amorites
in Heshbon and in all the villages thereof.
26 For Heshbon was the citie of Sihon the king of the Amorites, which had fought
beforetime against the king of the Moabites, & had taken al his land out of his
hand, euen vnto Arnon.
27 Wherefore they that speake in prouerbes, say, Come to Heshbon, let the citie
of Sihon bee built and repaired:
28 For a fire is gone out of Heshbon, and a flame from the citie of Sihon, and
hath consumed Ar of the Moabites, and the lords of Bamoth in Arnon.
29 Wo be to thee, Moab: O people of Chemosh, thou art vndone: he hath suffered
his sonnes to be pursued, and his daughters to be in captiuitie to Sihon the
king of the Amorites.
30 Their empire also is lost from Heshbon vnto Dibon, and wee haue destroyed
them vnto Nophah, which reacheth vnto Medeba.
31 Thus Israel dwelt in the lande of the Amorites.
32 And Moses sent to searche out Iaazer, and they tooke the townes belonging
thereto, and rooted out the Amorites that were there.
33 And they turned and went vp toward Bashan: and Og the King of Bashan came out
against them, hee, and all his people, to fight at Edrei.
34 Then the Lord said vnto Moses, Feare him not: for I haue deliuered him into
thine hand and all his people, and his land: and thou shalt do to him as thou
diddest vnto Sihon the king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon.
35 They smote him therefore, and his sonnes, and all his people, vntill there
was none left him: so they conquered his land.

Chapter 22

1 After, the children of Israel departed & pitched in the plaine of Moab on the
other side of Iorden from Iericho.
2 Now Balak the sonne of Zippor sawe all that Israel had done to the Amorites.
3 And the Moabites were sore afraide of the people, because they were many, and
Moab fretted against the children of Israel.
4 Therfore Moab said vnto the Elders of Midian, Nowe shall this multitude licke
vp all that are round about vs, as an oxe licketh vp ye grasse of the fielde:
and Balak the sonne of Zippor was King of the Moabites at that time.
5 Hee sent messengers therefore vnto Balaam the sonne of Beor to Pethor (which
is by the riuer of the lande of the children of his folke) to call him, saying,
Beholde, there is a people come out of Egypt, which couer the face of the earth,
and lye ouer against me.
6 Come now therefore, I pray thee, and curse me this people (for they are
stronger then I) so it may be that I shall be able to smite them, and to driue
them out of the land: for I knowe that hee, whome thou blessest, is blessed, and
he whom thou cursest, shall be cursed.
7 And the Elders of Moab, and the Elders of Midian departed, hauing the reward
of the soothsaying in their hande, and they came vnto Balaam, and tolde him the
wordes of Balak.
8 Who answered them, Tary here this night, and I will giue you an answere, as
the Lorde shall say vnto mee. So the princes of Moab abode with Balaam.
9 Then God came vnto Balaam, and sayde, What men are these with thee?
10 And Baalam said vnto God, Balak ye sonne of Zippor, king of Moab hath set
vnto me, saying,
11 Beholde, there is a people come out of Egypt and couereth the face of the
earth: come nowe, curse them for my sake: so it may be that I shalbe able to
ouercome them in battell, and to driue them out.
12 And God said vnto Balaam, Go not thou with them, neither curse the people,
for they are blessed.
13 And Balaam rose vp in the morning, and sayde vnto ye princes of Balak,
Returne vnto your land: for the Lord hath refused to giue me leaue to go with
you.
14 So the princes of Moab rose vp, and went vnto Balak, & sayd, Balaam hath
refused to come with vs.
15 Balak yet sent againe moe princes, and more honourable then they.
16 Who came to Balaam, and sayde to him, Thus saith Balak the sonne of Zippor,
Bee not thou staied, I pray thee, from coming vnto me.
17 For I wil promote thee vnto great honour, and wil do whatsoeuer thou sayest
vnto me: come therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people.
18 And Balaam answered, and sayde vnto the seruants of Balak, If Balak woulde
giue me his house full of siluer and golde, I can not goe beyonde the worde of
the Lorde my God, to doe lesse or more.
19 But nowe, I pray you, tary here this night, that I may wit, what the Lorde
will say vnto mee more.
20 And God came vnto Balaam by night, and sayd vnto him, If the men come to call
thee, rise vp, and goe with them: but onely what thing I say vnto thee, that
shalt thou doe.
21 So Balaam rose vp early, and sadled his asse, and went with the princes of
Moab.
22 And ye wrath of God was kindled, because he went: and the Angel of the Lord
stood in the way to be against him, as he rode vpon his asse, & his two seruants
were with him.
23 And when the asse saw the Angel of the Lord stand in the way, and his sworde
drawen in his hand, the asse turned out of the way and went into the field, but
Balaam smote the asse, to turne her into the way.
24 Againe the Angel of the Lord stood in a path of the vineyardes, hauing a wall
on the one side, and a wall on the other.
25 And when the asse sawe the Angel of the Lord, she thrust her selfe vnto the
wall, and dasht Balaams foote against the wall: wherefore hee smote her againe.
26 Then the Angel of the Lord went further, & stoode in a narowe place, where
was no way to turne, either to the right hand, or to the left.
27 And when the asse sawe the Angell of the Lorde, she lay downe vnder Balaam:
therefore Balaam was very wroth, and smote the asse with a staffe.
28 Then the Lorde opened the mouth of the asse, and she saide vnto Balaam, What
haue I done vnto thee, that thou hast smitten me nowe three times?
29 And Balaam saide vnto the asse, Because thou hast mocked me: I woulde there
were a sworde in mine hand, for nowe would I kill thee.
30 And the asse saide vnto Balaam, Am not I thine asse, which thou hast ridden
vpon since thy first time vnto this day? haue I vsed at any time to doe thus
vnto thee? Who said, Nay.
31 And the Lord opened the eyes of Balaam, and he sawe the Angel of the Lord
standing in the way with his sword drawen in his hande: then he bowed him selfe,
and fell flat on his face.
32 And the Angel of the Lord said vnto him, Wherefore hast thou nowe smitten
thine asse three times? beholde, I came out to withstande thee, because thy way
is not straight before me.
33 But the asse sawe me, and turned fro me now three times: for els, if she had
not turned fro me, surely I had euen nowe slaine thee, and saued her aliue.
34 Then Balaam saide vnto the Angel of the Lorde, I haue sinned: for I wist not
that thou stoodest in the way against me: now therefore if it displease thee, I
will turne home againe.
35 But the Angel said vnto Balaam, Go with the men: but what I say vnto thee,
that shalt thou speake. So Balaam went with ye princes of Balak.
36 And when Balak heard that Balaam came, he went out to meete him vnto a citie
of Moab, which is in the border of Arnon, euen in the vtmost coast.
37 Then Balak saide vnto Balaam, Did I not sende for thee to call thee?
Wherefore camest thou not vnto me? am I not able in deede to promote thee vnto
honour?
38 And Balaam made answere vnto Balak, Lo, I am come vnto thee, and can I nowe
say any thing at all? the worde that God putteth in my mouth, that shal I
speake.
39 So Balaam went with Balak, & they came vnto the citie of Huzoth.
40 Then Balak offred bullockes, and sheepe, and sent thereof to Balaam, & to the
princes that were with him.
41 And on the morowe Balak tooke Balaam, and brought him vp into the hie places
of Baal, that thence hee might see the vtmost part of the people.

Chapter 23

1 And Balaam sayd vnto Balak, Builde me here seuen altars, and prepare me here
seuen bullockes, and seuen rammes.
2 And Balak did as Balaam sayd, and Balak and Balaam offred on euery altar a
bullocke and a ramme.
3 Then Balaam sayde vnto Balak, Stande by the burnt offring, and I will goe, if
so be that the Lorde will come and meete me: and whatsoeuer he sheweth me, I
will tell thee: so he went forth alone.
4 And God met Balaam, and Balaam sayd vnto him, I haue prepared seuen altars,
and haue offred vpon euery altar a bullocke and a ramme.
5 And the Lord put an answere in Balaams mouth, and sayde, Go againe to Balak,
and say on this wise.
6 So when he returned vnto him, loe, hee stoode by his burnt offering, he, and
all the princes of Moab.
7 Then he vttered his parable, and sayde, Balak the king of Moab hath brought
mee from Aram out of the mountaines of the East, saying, Come, curse Iaakob for
my sake: come, and detest Israel.
8 How shal I curse, where God hath not cursed? or howe shall I detest, where the
Lorde hath not detested?
9 For from the top of the rocks I did see him, and from the hils I did beholde
him: lo, the people shal dwell by themselues, and shal not be reckened among the
nations.
10 Who can tell the dust of Iaakob, and the nomber of the fourth part of Israel?
Let me die the death of the righteous, and let my last ende be like his.
11 Then Balak saide vnto Balaam, What hast thou done vnto mee? I tooke thee to
curse mine enemies, and beholde, thou hast blessed them altogether.
12 And he answered, and said, Must I not take heede to speake that, which the
Lord hath put in my mouth?
13 And Balak sayde vnto him, Come, I pray thee, with mee vnto another place,
whence thou mayest see them, & thou shalt see but the vtmost part of them, and
shalt not see them all: therefore curse them out of that place for my sake.
14 And he brought him into Sede-sophim to the top of Pisgah, and built seuen
altars, and offred a bullocke, and a ramme on euery altar.
15 After, he sayde vnto Balak, Stande here by thy burnt offring, & I wil meete
the Lord yonder.
16 And the Lord mette Balaam, and put an answere in his mouth, and sayd, Goe
againe vnto Balak, and say thus.
17 And when he came to him, beholde, hee stoode by his burnt offering, and the
princes of Moab with him: so Balak sayde vnto him, What hath the Lord sayd?
18 And he vttered his parable, and sayde, Rise vp, Balak, and heare: hearken
vnto me, thou sonne of Zippor.
19 God is not as man, that he should lie, neither as the sonne of man that he
shoulde repent: hath he sayde and shal he not do it? and hath he spoken, and
shal he not accomplish it?
20 Behold, I haue receiued commandement to blesse: for he hath blessed, and I
cannot alter it.
21 Hee seeth none iniquitie in Iaakob, nor seeth no transgression in Israel: the
Lord his God is with him, and the ioyfull shoute of a king is among them.
22 God brought them out of Egypt: their strength is as an vnicorne.
23 For there is no sorcerie in Iaakob, nor soothsaying in Israel: according to
this time it shalbe sayde of Iaakob and of Israel, What hath God wrought?
24 Behold, the people shal rise vp as a lyon, & lift vp himselfe as a yong lyon:
hee shall not lye downe, till he eate of the pray, and till he drinke the blood
of the slayne.
25 Then Balak sayde vnto Balaam, Neither curse, nor blesse them at all.
26 But Balaam answered, & saide vnto Balak, Tolde not I thee, saying, All that
the Lorde speaketh, that must I do?
27 Againe Balak sayd vnto Balaam, Come, I pray thee, I wil bring thee vnto
another place, if so be it wil please God, that thou mayest thence curse them
for my sake.
28 So Balak brought Balaam vnto the top of Peor, that looketh toward Ieshmon.
29 Then Balaam sayde vnto Balak, Make me here seuen altars, and prepare me here
seuen bullocks, and seuen rammes.
30 And Balak did as Balaam had sayd, and offred a bullocke and a ram on euery
altar.

Chapter 24

1 When Balaam saw that it pleased the Lord to blesse Israel, then he went not,
as certaine times before, to set diuinations, but set his face toward the
wildernesse.
2 And Balaam lift vp his eyes, & looked vpon Israel, which dwelt according to
their tribes, and the Spirit of God came vpon him.
3 And he vttered his parable, and sayd, Balaam the sonne of Beor hath sayde, and
the man, whose eyes were shut vp, hath sayd,
4 He hath sayde, which heard the wordes of God, and sawe the vision of the
Almightie, and falling in a traunce had his eyes opened:
5 How goodly are thy tentes, O Iaakob, & thine habitations, O Israel!
6 As the valleis, are they stretched forth, as gardes by the riuers side, as the
aloe trees, which the Lorde hath planted, as the cedars beside the waters.
7 The water droppeth out of his bucket, & his seede shalbe in many waters, and
his king shall be hier then Agag, and his kingdome shall bee exalted.
8 God brought him out of Egypt: his strength shalbe as an vnicorne: he shal eate
the nations his enemies, and bruise their bones, & shoote them through with his
arrowes.
9 He coucheth and lieth downe as a yong lion, and as a lion: who shall stirre
him vp? blessed is he that blesseth thee, and cursed is he that curseth thee.
10 Then Balak was very angry with Balaam, and smote his handes together: so
Balak sayde vnto Balaam, I sent for thee to curse mine enemies, and beholde,
thou hast blessed them nowe three times.
11 Therefore nowe flee vnto thy place: I thought surely to promote thee vnto
honour, but loe, the Lorde hath kept thee backe from honour.
12 Then Balaam answered Balak, Tolde I not also thy messengers, which thou
sentest vnto me, saying,
13 If Balak would giue me his house ful of siluer and gold, I can not passe the
commandement of the Lorde, to doe either good or bad of mine owne minde? what
the Lord shall commaunde, the same will I speake.
14 And nowe behold, I goe vnto my people: come, I will aduertise thee what this
people shall doe to thy folke in the later dayes.
15 And he vttered his parable, and sayd, Balaam the sonne of Beor hath sayde,
and the man whose eyes were shut vp, hath sayd,
16 He hath said that heard the words of God, and hath the knowledge of the most
High, and sawe the vision of the Almightie, and falling in a traunce had his
eyes opened:
17 I shal see him, but not nowe: I shal behold him, but not neere: there shall
come a starre of Iaakob, and a scepter shal rise of Israel, and shall smite the
coastes of Moab, and destroy all the sonnes of Sheth.
18 And Edom shalbe possessed, and Seir shall be a possession to their enemies:
but Israel shal do valiantly.
19 He also that shall haue dominion shall bee of Iaakob, and shall destroy the
remnant of the citie.
20 And when he looked on Amalek, he vttered his parable, and sayd, Amalek was
the first of the nations: but his latter ende shal come to destruction.
21 And he looked on the Kenites, and vttered his parable, and sayde, Strong is
thy dwelling place, and put thy nest in the rocke.
22 Neuerthelesse, the Kenite shalbe spoyled vntill Asshur cary thee away
captiue.
23 Againe he vttered his parable, and sayd, Alas, who shall liue when God doeth
this?
24 The ships also shal come from the coastes of Chittim, and subdue Asshur, and
shall subdue Eber, and he also shall come to destruction.
25 Then Balaam rose vp, and went and returned to his place: and Balak also went
his way.

Chapter 25

1 Nowe whiles Israel abode in Shittim, the people began to commit whoredome with
the daughters of Moab:
2 Which called the people vnto the sacrifice of their gods, and the people ate,
& bowed downe to their gods.
3 And Israel coupled himselfe vnto Baal Peor: wherefore the wrath of the Lord
was kindled against Israel:
4 And the Lord sayde vnto Moses, Take all the heades of the people, and hang
them vp before the Lord against ye sunne, that the indignation of the Lords
wrath may be turned fro Israel.
5 Then Moses sayd vnto the Iudges of Israel, Euery one slay his men that were
ioyned vnto Baal Peor.
6 And behold, one of the children of Israel came and brought vnto his brethren a
Midianitish woman in the sight of Moses, and in the sight of all the
Congregation of the children of Israel, who wept before the doore of the
Tabernacle of the Congregation.
7 And when Phinehas the sonne of Eleazar the sonne of Aaron the Priest sawe it,
hee rose vp from the middes of the Congregation, & tooke a speare in his hand,
8 And followed ye man of Israel into the tent, and thrust them both through: to
wit, the man of Israel, and the woman, through her belly: so the plague ceased
from the children of Israel.
9 And there died in that plague, foure and twentie thousand.
10 Then the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
11 Phinehas the sonne of Eleazar, the sonne of Aaron the Priest, hath turned
mine anger away from the children of Israel, while hee was zealous for my sake
among them: therefore I haue not consumed the children of Israel in my ielousie.
12 Wherefore say to him, Beholde, I giue vnto him my couenant of peace,
13 And he shal haue it, and his seede after him, euen the couenant of the
priestes office for euer, because he was zealous for his God, & hath made an
atonement for the children of Israel.
14 And the name of the Israelite thus slayne, which was killed with the
Midianitish woman, was Zimri the sonne of Salu, prince of the familie of the
Simeonites.
15 And the name of the Midianitish woman, that was slayne, was Cozbi the
daughter of Zur, who was head ouer the people of his fathers house in Midian.
16 Againe ye Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
17 Vexe the Midianites, and smite them:
18 For they trouble you with their wiles, wherewith they haue beguiled you as
concerning Peor, & as concerning their sister Cozbi ye daughter of a prince of
Midian, which was slayne in the day of the plague because of Peor.

Chapter 26

1 And so after the plague, the Lord spake vnto Moses, and to Eleazar the sonne
of Aaron the Priest, saying,
2 Take the nomber of all the Congregation of the children of Israel from twentie
yeere olde and aboue throughout their fathers houses, all that go forth to warre
in Israel.
3 So Moses and Eleazar the Priest spake vnto them in the plaine of Moab, by
Iorden towarde Iericho, saying,
4 From twentie yeere olde and aboue ye shall nomber the people, as the Lord had
commanded Moses, and the childre of Israel, when they came out of the land of
Egypt.
5 Reuben the first borne of Israel: the children of Reube were: Hanoch, of whom
came the familie of the Hanochites, and of Pallu the familie of the Palluites:
6 Of Hesron, the familie of the Hesronites: of Carmi, the familie of the
Carmites.
7 These are the families of the Reubenites: & they were in nomber three and
fourtie thousand, seuen hundreth and thirtie.
8 And the sonnes of Pallu, Eliab:
9 And the sonnes of Eliab, Nemuel, and Dathan, and Abiram: this Dathan and
Abiram were famous in the Congregation, and stroue against Moses and against
Aaron in the assemblie of Korah, when they stroue against the Lord.
10 And the earth opened her mouth, and swalowed them vp with Korah, when the
Congregation died, what time the fire consumed, two hundreth and fiftie men, who
were for a signe.
11 Notwithstanding, all the sonnes of Korah dyed not.
12 And the children of Simeon after their families were: Nemuel, of whom came
the familie of the Nemuelites: of Iamin, the familie of the Iaminites: of
Iachin, the familie of the Iachinites:
13 Of Zerah, the familie of the Zarhites: of Shaul, the familie of the
Shaulites.
14 These are the families of the Simeonites: two and twentie thousand and two
hundreth.
15 The sonnes of Gad after their families were: Zephon, of whome came ye familie
of the Zephonites: of Haggi, the familie of the Haggites: of Shuni, the familie
of the Shunites:
16 Of Ozni, the familie of the Oznites: of Eri, the familie of the Erites:
17 Of Arod, the familie of the Arodites: of Areli, the familie of the Arelites.
18 These are the families of the sonnes of Gad, according to their nombers,
fourtie thousand and fiue hundreth.
19 The sonnes of Iudah, Er and Onan: but Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan.
20 So were the sonnes of Iudah after their families: of Shelah came the familie
of ye Shelanites: of Pharez, the familie of the Pharzites, of Zerah, the familie
of the Zarhites.
21 And the sonnes of Pharez were: of Hesron, the familie of the Hesronites: of
Hamul, the familie of the Hamulites.
22 These are the families of Iudah, after their nombers, seuentie and sixe
thousande and fiue hundreth.
23 The sonnes of Issachar, after their families were: Tola, of whom came the
familie of the Tolaites: of Pua, the familie of the Punites:
24 Of Iashub the familie of the Iashubites: of Shimron, the familie of the
Shimronites.
25 These are the families of Issachar, after their nombers, threescore and foure
thousand & three hundreth.
26 The sonnes of Zebulun, after their families were: of Sered, the familie of
the Sardites: of Elon, the familie of the Elonites: of Iahleel, the familie of
the Iahleelites.
27 These are the families of the Zebulunites, after their nombers, three score
thousande & fiue hundreth.
28 The sonnes of Ioseph, after their families were Manasseh and Ephraim.
29 The sonnes of Manasseh were: of Machir, the familie of the Machirites: and
Machir begate Gilead: of Gilead came the familie of the Gileadites.
30 These are the sonnes of Gilead: of Iezer, the familie of the Iezerites: of
Helek, the familie of the Helekites.
31 Of Asriel, the familie of the Asrielites: of Shechem, the familie of
Shichmites.
32 Of Shemida, the familie of the Shemidaites: of Hepher, the familie of the
Hepherites.
33 And Zelophehad the sonne of Hepher had no sonnes, but daughters: and the
names of the daughters of Zelophehad were Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah and
Tirzah.
34 These are the families of Manasseh, & the nomber of them, two and fiftie
thousand and seuen hundreth.
35 These are the sonnes of Ephraim after their families: of Shuthelah came the
familie of the Shuthalhites: of Becher, the familie of the Bachrites: of Tahan,
the familie of the Tahanites.
36 And these are the sonnes of Shuthelah: of Eran the familie of the Eranites.
37 These are the families of the sonnes of Ephraim after their nombers, two and
thirtie thousand and fiue hundreth. These are the sonnes of Ioseph after their
families.
38 These are the sonnes of Beniamin after their families: of Bela came the
familie of the Belaites: of Ashbel, the familie of the Ashbelites: of Ahiram,
the familie of the Ahiramites:
39 Of Shupham, the familie of the Suphamites: of Hupham, the familie of the
Huphamites.
40 And the sonnes of Bela were Ard and Naaman: of Ard came the familie of the
Ardites, of Naaman, the familie of the Naamites.
41 These are the sonnes of Beniamin after their families, and their nombers,
fiue and fourtie thousand and sixe hundreth.
42 These are the sonnes of Dan after their families: of Shuham came the familie
of the Shuhamites: these are the families of Dan after their housholdes.
43 All the families of the Shuhamites were after their nombers, threescore and
foure thousand, and foure hundreth.
44 The sonnes of Asher after their families were: of Iimnah, the familie of the
Iimnites: of Isui, the familie of the Isuites: of Beriah, the familie of the
Berijtes.
45 The sonnes of Beriah were, of Heber the familie of the Heberites: of
Malchiel, the familie of the Malchielites.
46 And the name of the daughter of Asher was Sarah.
47 These are the families of the sonnes of Asher after their nombers, three and
fifty thousand and foure hundreth.
48 The sonnes of Naphtali, after their families were: of Iahzeel, the families
of the Iahzeelites: of Guni, the familie of the Gunites.
49 Of Iezer, the familie of the Izrites: of Shillem, the familie of the
Shillemites.
50 These are the families of Naphtali according to their housholdes, and their
nomber, fiue and fourtie thousande and foure hundreth.
51 These are the nombers of the children of Israel: sixe hundreth and one
thousand, seuen hundreth and thirtie.
52 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
53 Vnto these the land shalbe deuided for an inheritance, according to the
nomber of names.
54 To many thou shalt giue the more inheritance, and to fewe thou shalt giue
lesse inheritance: to euery one according to his nomber shalbe giuen his
inheritance.
55 Notwithstanding, the land shalbe deuided by lot: according to the names of
the tribes of their fathers they shall inherite:
56 According to the lot shall the possession thereof be deuided betweene many
and fewe.
57 These also are the nobers of ye Leuites, after their families: of Gershon
came ye familie of the Gershonites: of Kohath, ye familie of the Kohathites: of
Merari, the familie of the Merarites.
58 These are the families of Leui, the familie of the Libnites: the familie of
the Hebronites: the familie of the Mahlites: the familie of the Mushites: the
familie of the Korhites: and Kohath begate Amram.
59 And Amrams wife was called Iochebed the daughter of Leui, which was borne
vnto Leui in Egypt: and she bare vnto Amram Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam their
sister.
60 And vnto Aaron were borne Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.
61 And Nadab and Abihu dyed, because they offred strange fire before the Lorde.
62 And their nombers were three and twentie thousand, all males from a moneth
old and aboue: for they were not nombred among the children of Israel, because
there was none inheritance giuen them among the children of Israel.
63 These are the nombers of Moses and Eleazar the Priest which nombred the
children of Israel in the plaine of Moab, neere Iorden, towarde Iericho.
64 And among these there was not a man of them, whome Moses and Aaron the Priest
nobred, when they tolde the children of Israel in the wildernes of Sinai.
65 For the Lorde said of them, They shall die in the wildernes: so there was not
left a man of them, saue Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh, and Ioshua the sonne of
Nun.

Chapter 27

1 Then came the daughters of Zelophehad, the sonne of Hepher, the sonne of
Gilead, the sonne of Machir, the sonne of Manasseh, of the familie of Manasseh,
the sonne of Ioseph (and the names of his daughters were these, Mahlah, Noah and
Hoglah, and Milcah, and Tirzah)
2 And stoode before Moses, and before Eleazar the Priest, and before the
Princes, and all the assemblie, at the doore of the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, saying,
3 Our father dyed in the wildernes, and he was not among the assemblie of them
that were assembled against the Lorde in the companie of Korah, but died in his
sinne, and had no sonnes.
4 Wherefore should the name of our father be taken away from among his familie,
because he hath no sonne? giue vs a possession among the brethren of our father.
5 Then Moses brought their cause before the Lorde.
6 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
7 The daughters of Zelophehad speake right: thou shalt giue them a possession to
inherite among their fathers brethren, and shalt turne the inheritance of their
father vnto them.
8 Also thou shalt speake vnto the children of Israel, saying, If a man die and
haue no sonne, then ye shall turne his inheritaunce vnto his daughter.
9 And if he haue no daughter, ye shall giue his inheritance vnto his brethren.
10 And if he haue no brethren, ye shall giue his inheritance vnto his fathers
brethren.
11 And if his father haue no brethren, ye shal giue his inheritance vnto his
next kinsman of his familie, and he shall possesse it: and this shall be vnto
the children of Israel a law of iudgement, as the Lord hath commanded Moses.
12 Againe the Lord said vnto Moses, Go vp into this mount of Abarim, & behold ye
lande which I haue giuen vnto the children of Israel.
13 And when thou hast seene it, thou shalt be gathered vnto thy people also, as
Aaron thy brother was gathered.
14 For ye were disobedient vnto my worde in the desert of Zin, in the strife of
the assemblie, to sanctifie me in the waters before their eyes. That is the
water of Meribah in Kadesh in the wildernesse of Zin.
15 Then Moses spake vnto the Lord, saying,
16 Let the Lorde God of the spirits of all flesh appoint a man ouer the
Congregation,
17 Who may goe out and in before them, and leade them out and in, that the
Congregation of the Lorde be not as sheepe, which haue not a shepheard.
18 And the Lorde said vnto Moses, Take thee Ioshua the sonne of Nun, in whom is
the Spirite, and put thine handes vpon him,
19 And set him before Eleazar the Priest, and before all the Congregation, and
giue him a charge in their sight.
20 And giue him of thy glory, that all the Congregation of ye children of Israel
may obey.
21 And he shall stande before Eleazar the Priest, who shall aske counsell for
him by the iudgement of Vrim before the Lorde: at his worde they shall goe out,
and at his worde they shall come in, both he, and all the children of Israel
with him and all the Congregation.
22 So Moses did as the Lord had commanded him, and he tooke Ioshua, and set him
before Eleazar the Priest, & before all the Congregation.
23 Then he put his handes vpon him, & gaue him a charge, as the Lorde had spoken
by the hand of Moses.

Chapter 28

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Command the children of Israel, and say vnto them, Ye shall obserue to offer
vnto me in their due season mine offering, and my bread, for my sacrifices made
by fire for a sweete sauour vnto me.
3 Also thou shalt say vnto them, This is the offring made by fire which ye shall
offer vnto the Lorde, two lambes of a yeere olde without spot, daily, for a
continuall burnt offring.
4 One lambe shalt thou prepare in the morning, and the other lambe shalt thou
prepare at euen.
5 And the tenth part of an Ephah of fine floure for a meate offering mingled
with the fourth part of an Hin of beaten oyle.
6 This shalbe a daily burnt offering, as was made in the mount Sinai for a
sweete sauour: it is a sacrifice made by fire vnto the Lord.
7 And the drinke offring thereof the fourth part of an Hin for one lambe: in the
holy place cause to powre the drinke offring vnto the Lord.
8 And the other lambe thou shalt prepare at euen: as the meate offring of the
morning, and as the drinke offering thereof shalt thou prepare this for an
offring made by fire of sweete sauour vnto the Lorde.
9 But on the Sabbath day ye shall offer two lambes of a yere old, without spot,
& two tenth deales of fine floure for a meate offring mingled with oyle, and the
drinke offring thereof.
10 This is ye burnt offring of euery Sabbath, beside the continuall burnt
offring, and drinke offring thereof.
11 And in the beginning of your moneths, ye shall offer a burnt offring vnto the
Lorde, two yong bullockes, and a ramme, and seuen lambes of a yeere olde,
without spot,
12 And three tenth deales of fine floure for a meat offring mingled with oyle
for one bullocke, and two tenth deales of fine floure for a meate offring,
mingled with oyle for one ramme,
13 And a tenth deale of fine floure mingled with oyle for a meate offring vnto
one lambe: for a burnt offring of sweete sauour: it is an offring made by fire
vnto the Lorde.
14 And their drinke offrings shalbe halfe an Hin of wine vnto one bullocke, and
the thirde part of an Hin vnto a ram, and ye fourth part of an Hin vnto a labe:
this is the burnt offring of euery moneth, throughout the moneths of the yeere.
15 And one hee goat for a sinne offring vnto the Lord shalbe prepared, besides
the continuall burnt offring, and his drinke offring.
16 Also the fourtenth day of the first moneth is the Passeouer of the Lord.
17 And in ye fiftenth day of the same moneth is the feast: seuen dayes shall
vnleauened bread be eaten.
18 In the first day shalbe an holy conuocation, ye shall do no seruile worke
therein.
19 But ye shall offer a sacrifice made by fire for a burnt offring vnto the
Lord, two yong bullocks, one ram, and seuen lambes of a yeere olde: see that
they be without blemish.
20 And their meate offering shalbe of fine floure mingled with oyle: three tenth
deales shall ye prepare for a bullocke, and two tenth deales for a ramme:
21 One tenth deale shalt thou prepare for euery lambe, euen for the seuen
lambes.
22 And an hee goate for a sinne offering, to make an atonement for you.
23 Ye shall prepare these, beside the burnt offering in the morning, which is a
continuall burnt sacrifice.
24 After this maner ye shall prepare throughout all the seuen dayes, for the
mainteining of the offring made by fire for a sweete sauour vnto the Lorde: it
shall be done beside the continuall burnt offring and drinke offring thereof.
25 And in ye seuenth day ye shal haue an holy conuocation, wherein ye shal do no
seruile work.
26 Also in the day of your first fruits, when ye bring a newe meate offring vnto
the Lorde, according to your weekes ye shal haue an holy conuocation, & ye shal
do no seruile worke in it:
27 But ye shall offer a burnt offering for a sweete sauour vnto the Lord, two
yong bullocks, a ramme, and seuen lambes of a yeere olde,
28 And their meat offring of fine floure mingled with oyle, three tenth deales
vnto a bullocke, two tenth deales to a ram,
29 And one tenth deale vnto euery lambe throughout the seuen lambes,
30 And an hee goate to make an atonement for you:
31 (Ye shall doe this besides the continuall burnt offring, and his meate
offring:) see they be without blemish, with their drinke offrings.

Chapter 29

1 Moreouer, in the first day of the seuenth moneth ye shall haue an holy
conuocation: ye shall doe no seruile worke therein: it shall be a day of blowing
the trumpets vnto you.
2 And ye shall make a burnt offering for a sweete sauour vnto the Lorde: one
yong bullocke, one ram, and seuen lambes of a yeere olde, without blemish.
3 And their meat offring shalbe of fine floure mingled with oyle, three tenth
deales vnto the bullocke, and two tenth deales vnto the ramme,
4 And one tenth deale vnto one lambe, for the seuen lambes,
5 And an hee goate for a sinne offering to make an atonement for you,
6 Beside the burnt offring of the moneth, & his meat offring, & the cotinual
burnt offring, and his meate offring and the drinke offrings of the same,
according to their maner, for a sweete sauour: it is a sacrifice made by fire
vnto ye Lord.
7 And ye shal haue in ye tenth day of the seuenth moneth, an holy conuocation:
and ye shall humble your soules, and shall not doe any worke therein:
8 But ye shall offer a burnt offring vnto the Lorde for a sweete sauour: one
yong bullocke, a ramme, and seuen lambes of a yeere olde: see they be without
blemish.
9 And their meate offering shall be of fine floure mingled with oyle, three
tenth deales to a bullocke, and two tenth deales to a ramme,
10 One tenth deale vnto euery lambe, thoroughout the seuen lambes,
11 An hee goate for a sinne offring, (beside ye sinne offring to make the
atonement & the continual burnt offring & the meat offring thereof) and their
drinke offrings.
12 And in the fifteenth day of the seuenth moneth ye shall haue an holie
conuocation: ye shall do no seruile worke therein, but yee shall keepe a feast
vnto the Lord seuen daies.
13 And ye shall offer a burnt offring for a sacrifice made by fire of sweete
sauour vnto the Lord, thirtene yong bullockes, two rammes, and fourtene lambes
of a yeere olde: they shall bee without blemish.
14 And their meate offering shall bee of fine floure mingled with oyle, three
tenth deales vnto euery bullocke of the thirteene bullockes, two tenth deales to
either of the two rammes,
15 And one tenth deale vnto eche of ye fourteene lambes,
16 And one hee goate for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring,
his meate offring, and his drinke offring.
17 And the second day ye shall offer twelue yong bullockes, two rams, fourteene
lambes of a yeere olde without blemish,
18 With their meate offring and their drinke offrings for the bullockes, for the
rammes, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after the maner,
19 And an hee goate for a sinne offring, (beside the continuall burnt offering
and his meate offring) and their drinke offrings.
20 Also the third day ye shall offer eleuen bullocks, two rams, and fourteene
lambes of a yeere olde without blemish,
21 With their meate offring and their drinke offrings, for the bullockes, for
the rams, and for the lambes, after their nomber according to the maner,
22 And an hee goat for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring, and
his meate offring and his drinke offring.
23 And the fourth day ye shall offer tenne bullocks, two rammes, and fourteene
lambes of a yeere olde without blemish.
24 Their meate offring and their drinke offrings, for the bullockes, for the
rammes, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after the maner,
25 And an hee goate for a sinne offering beside the continuall burnt offring,
his meate offering and his drinke offering.
26 In the fifth day also ye shall offer nine bullockes, two rammes, and
fourteene lambes of a yeere olde without blemish,
27 And their meat offering and their drinke offrings for the bullockes, for the
rammes, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after the maner,
28 And an hee goat for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring, and
his meat offring and his drinke offering.
29 And in the sixt day ye shall offer eight bullockes, two rams, and fourteene
lambes of a yeere olde without blemish,
30 And their meate offring, and their drinke offrings for the bullockes, for the
rammes, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after the maner,
31 And an hee goat for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring, his
meate offring and his drinke offrings.
32 In the seuenth day also ye shall offer seuen bullocks, two rammes and
fourteene lambes of a yeere olde without blemish,
33 And their meate offering and their drinke offrings for the bullockes, for the
rammes, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after their maner,
34 And an hee goate for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring,
his meate offering and his drinke offring.
35 In the eight day, yee shall haue a solemne assemblie: yee shall doe no
seruile worke therein,
36 But yee shall offer a burnt offering, a sacrifice made by fire for a sweete
sauour vnto the Lord, one bullocke, one ram, and seuen lambes of a yeere old
without blemish,
37 Their meate offring and their drinke offrings for the bullocke, for the
ramme, and for the lambes according to their nomber, after the maner,
38 And an hee goat for a sinne offring, beside the continuall burnt offring, &
his meate offring, and his drinke offring.
39 These things ye shall do vnto the Lorde in your feastes, beside your vowes,
and your free offrings, for your burnt offrings, and for your meate offrings,
and for your drinke offrings and for your peace offrings.
40 (30:1) Then Moses spake vnto the children of Israel according to all that the
Lorde had commanded him,

Chapter 30

1 (30:2) Moses also spake vnto the heads of ye tribes concerning the children of
Israel, saying, This is the thing which the Lord hath commanded,
2 (30:3) Whosoeuer voweth a vow vnto the Lord, or sweareth an othe to binde him
selfe by a bonde, he shall not breake his promise, but shall do according to al
that proceedeth out of his mouth.
3 (30:4) If a woman also vow a vow vnto the Lord, and binde her selfe by a
bonde, being in her fathers house, in the time of her youth,
4 (30:5) And her father heare her vowe and bonde, wherewith she hath bound her
selfe, and her father hold his peace concerning her, then all her vowes shall
stande, and euery bonde, wherewith she hath bound her selfe, shall stand.
5 (30:6) But if her father disalow her the same day that he heareth all her
vowes and bondes, wherewith she hath bound her selfe, they shall not bee of
value, and the Lorde will forgiue her, because her father disalowed her.
6 (30:7) And if she haue an husband when she voweth or pronounceth ought with
her lips, wherewith she bindeth her selfe,
7 (30:8) If her husband heard it, & holdeth his peace concerning her, the same
day he heareth it, then her vowe shall stande, and her bondes wherewith she
bindeth her selfe shall stand in effect.
8 (30:9) But if her husbande disalow her the same day that hee heareth it, then
shall hee make her vowe which shee hath made, and that that shee hath pronounced
with her lips, wherewith shee bound her selfe, of none effect: and the Lorde
will forgiue her.
9 (30:10) But euery vowe of a widowe, and of her that is diuorced (wherewith she
hath bound her selfe) shall stand in effect with her.
10 (30:11) And if she vowed in her husbands house, or bound her selfe streightly
with an othe,
11 (30:12) And her husband hath heard it, and helde his peace cocerning her, not
disalowing her, then all her vowes shall stand, and euery bond, wherewith she
bound her selfe, shall stand in effect.
12 (30:13) But if her husband disanulled them, the same day that he heard them,
nothing that proceeded out of her lippes concerning her vowes or concerning her
bondes, shall stand in effect: for her husband hath disanulled them: and the
Lord will forgiue her.
13 (30:14) So euery vowe, and euery othe or bonde, made to humble the soule, her
husband may stablish it, or her husband may breake it.
14 (30:15) But if her husband holde his peace concerning her from day to day,
then he stablisheth al her vowes and all her bondes which shee hath made: hee
hath confirmed them because he held his peace concerning her the same day that
hee hearde them.
15 (30:16) But if he breake them after that he hath heard them, then shall he
beare her iniquitie.
16 (30:17) These are the ordinances which the Lorde commanded Moses, betweene a
man & his wife, and betweene the father and his daughter, being young in her
fathers house.

Chapter 31

1 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Reuenge the children of Israel of the Midianites, and afterwarde shalt thou be
gathered vnto thy people.
3 And Moses spake to the people, saying, Harnesse some of you vnto warre, and
let them goe against Midian, to execute the vengeance of the Lord against
Midian.
4 A thousande of euery tribe throughout all the tribes of Israel, shall ye sende
to the warre.
5 So there were taken out of the thousands of Israel, twelue thousande prepared
vnto warre, of euery tribe a thousand.
6 And Moses sent them to the warre, euen a thousand of euery tribe, and sent
them with Phinehas the sonne of Eleazar the Priest to the warre: and the holy
instruments, that is, the trumpets to blow were in his hand.
7 And they warred against Midian, as the Lorde had commaunded Moses, and slue
all the males.
8 They slue also the Kings of Midian among them that were slaine: Eui and Rekem,
and Zur, and Hur and Reba fiue kings of Midian, and they slue Balaam the sonne
of Beor with the sworde:
9 But the children of Israel tooke the women of Midian prisoners, and their
children, and spoyled all their cattell, and all their flockes, and all their
goods.
10 And they burnt all their cities, wherein they dwelt, and all their villages
with fire.
11 And they tooke all the spoyle and all the pray both of men and beastes.
12 And they brought the captiues and that which they had taken, and the spoyle
vnto Moses and to Eleazar the Priest, and vnto the Congregation of the children
of Israel, into ye campe in the playne of Moab, which was by Iorden toward
Iericho.
13 Then Moses and Eleazar the Priest, and all the princes of the Congregation
went out of the campe to meete them.
14 And Moses was angry with the captaines of the hoste, with the captaines ouer
thousands, and captaines ouer hundreds, which came from the warre and battel.
15 And Moses sayde vnto them, What? haue ye saued all the women?
16 Behold, these caused the children of Israel through the counsell of Balaam to
commit a trespasse against the Lorde, as concerning Peor, and there came a
plague among the Congregation of the Lorde.
17 Now therefore, slay all the males among the children, and kill all the women
that haue knowen man by carnall copulation.
18 But all the women children that haue not knowen carnall copulation, keepe
aliue for your selues.
19 And ye shal remaine without the host seuen dayes, all that haue killed any
person, and all that haue touched any dead, and purifie both your selues and
your prisoners the third day and the seuenth.
20 Also ye shall purifie euery garment and all that is made of skins & al worke
of goates heare, and all things made of wood.
21 And Eleazar ye Priest sayd vnto the men of warre, which went to the battel,
This is the ordinance of the law which the Lorde commanded Moses,
22 As for gold, and siluer, brasse, yron, tynne, and lead:
23 Euen all that may abide the fire, yee shall make it goe through the fire, and
it shalbe cleane: yet, it shalbe purified with the water of purification: and
all that suffereth not the fire, yee shall cause to passe by the water.
24 Ye shal wash also your clothes the seuenth day, and ye shalbe cleane: and
afterward ye shal come into the Hoste.
25 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
26 Take the summe of the praie that was taken, both of persons and of cattell,
thou and Eleazar the Priest, and the chiefe fathers of the Congregation.
27 And deuide the praye betweene the souldiers that went to the warre, and all
the Congregation.
28 And thou shalt take a tribute vnto ye Lord of the men of warre, which went
out to battel: one person of fiue hundreth, both of the persons, and of the
beeues, & of the asses, & of the sheepe.
29 Yee shall take it of their halfe and giue it vnto Eleazar the Priest, as an
heaue offring of the Lorde.
30 But of the halfe of the children of Israel thou shalt take one, taken out of
fiftie, both of the persons, of the beeues, of the asses, and of the sheepe,
euen of all the cattel: and thou shalt giue them vnto the Leuites, which haue
the charge of the Tabernacle of the Lord.
31 And Moses and Eleazar the priest did as the Lord had commanded Moses.
32 And the bootie, to wit, the rest of the praie which the men of warre had
spoyled, was sixe hundreth seuentie and fiue thousand sheepe,
33 And seuentie and two thousand beeues,
34 And three score and one thousand asses,
35 And two and thirtie thousande persons in all, of women that had lyen by no
man.
36 And the halfe, to wit, the part of them that went out to warre touching the
nomber of sheepe, was three hundreth seuen and thirtie thousand, and fiue
hundreth.
37 And the Lordes tribute of the sheepe was sixe hundreth and seuentie and fiue:
38 And the beeues were six & thirty thousad, whereof the Lordes tribute was
seuentie & two.
39 And the asses were thirtie thousande and fiue hundreth, whereof the Lordes
tribute was three score and one:
40 And of persons sixtene thousand, whereof the Lordes tribute was two and
thirtie persons.
41 And Moses gaue the tribute of the Lordes offring vnto Eleazar the Priest, as
the Lorde had commanded Moses.
42 And of the halfe of the children of Israel, which Moses deuided from the men
of warre,
43 (For the halfe that perteined vnto the Congregation, was three hundreth
thirtie and seuen thousand sheepe and fiue hundreth,
44 And sixe and thirtie thousand beeues,
45 And thirtie thousand asses, & fiue hudreth,
46 And sixteene thousande persons)
47 Moses, I say, tooke of the halfe that perteined vnto the children of Israel,
one taken out of fiftie, both of the persons, and of the cattell, and gaue them
vnto the Leuites, which haue the charge of the Tabernacle of the Lorde, as the
Lorde had commanded Moses.
48 Then the captaines which were ouer thousandes of the hoste, the captaines
ouer the thousandes, and the captaines ouer the hundreds came vnto Moses:
49 And saide to Moses, Thy seruants haue taken the summe of the men of warre
which are vnder our authoritie, and there lacketh not one man of vs.
50 We haue therefore brought a present vnto the Lorde, what euery man found of
iewels of golde, bracelets, and cheines, rings, eare ringes, and ornaments of
the legges, to make an atonement for our soules before the Lorde.
51 And Moses and Eleazar the Priest tooke the golde of them, and all wrought
iewels,
52 And all the golde of the offring that they offered vp to the Lorde (of the
captaines ouer thousands and hundreds) was sixteene thousande seuen hundreth and
fiftie shekels,
53 (For the men of warre had spoyled, euery man for him selfe)
54 And Moses and Eleazar the Priest tooke the golde of the captaines ouer the
thousandes, and ouer the hundreds, and brought it into the Tabernacle of the
Congregation, for a memoriall of the children of Israel before the Lorde.

Chapter 32

1 Nowe the children of Reuben, and the children of Gad had an exceeding great
multitude of cattell: and they sawe the lande of Iazer, and the lande of Gilead,
that it was an apt place for cattel.
2 Then the children of Gad, and the childre of Reuben came, and spake vnto Moses
and to Eleazar the Priest, and vnto the princes of the Congregation, saying,
3 The land of Ataroth, and Dibon, and Iazer, and Nimrah, and Heshbon, and
Elealeh, and Shebam, and Nebo, and Beon,
4 Which countrey the Lorde smote before the Congregation of Israel, is a lande
meete for cattell, and thy seruants haue cattell:
5 Wherefore, said they, if we haue foud grace in thy sight, let this lande be
giuen vnto thy seruants for a possession, & bring vs not ouer Iorde.
6 And Moses said vnto the children of Gad, and to the children of Reuben, Shall
your brethren goe to warre, and ye tary heere?
7 Wherefore now discourage ye the heart of the children of Israel, to goe ouer
into the lande, which the Lorde hath giuen them?
8 Thus did your fathers when I sent them from Kadesh-barnea to see the lande.
9 For when they went vp euen vnto the riuer of Eshcol, and sawe the land: they
discouraged the heart of the childre of Israel, that they woulde not goe into
the lande, which the Lorde had giuen them.
10 And the Lordes wrath was kindled the same day, and he did sweare, saying,
11 None of the men that came out of Egypt from twentie yeere olde and aboue,
shall see the land for the which I sware vnto Abraha, to Izhak, and to Iaakob,
because they haue not wholly followed me:
12 Except Caleb the sonne of Iephunneh the Kenesite, and Ioshua the sonne of
Nun: for they haue constantly followed the Lorde.
13 And the Lord was very angry with Israel, and made them wander in the
wildernesse fourty yeeres, vntill all the generation that had done euill in the
sight of the Lorde were consumed.
14 And behold, ye are risen vp in your fathers steade as an encrease of sinfull
men, still to augment the fierce wrath of the Lord, toward Israel.
15 For if ye turne away from following him, he will yet againe leaue the people
in the wildernesse, and ye shall destroy all this folke.
16 And they went neere to him, and said, We will builde sheepe foldes here for
our sheepe, and for our cattell, and cities for our children.
17 But we our selues will be readie armed to go before the children of Israel,
vntill we haue brought them vnto their place: but our childre shall dwell in the
defenced cities, because of the inhabitants of the lande.
18 We will not returne vnto our houses, vntil the children of Israel haue
inherited, euery man his inheritance.
19 Neither wil we inherite with them beyond Iorden and on that side, because our
inheritance is fallen to vs on this side Iorden Eastwarde.
20 And Moses saide vnto them, If ye will doe this thing, and goe armed before
the Lord to warre:
21 And will goe euery one of you in harnesse ouer Iorden before the Lorde,
vntill he hath cast out his enemies from his sight:
22 And vntill the land be subdued before the Lorde, then ye shall returne and be
innocent toward the Lorde, and toward Israel: and this land shalbe your
possession before the Lorde.
23 But if ye will not doe so, beholde, ye haue sinned against the Lorde, and be
sure, that your sinne will finde you out.
24 Builde you then cities for your children & folds for your sheepe, and do that
ye haue spoke.
25 Then the children of Gad & the children of Reuben spake vnto Moses, saying,
Thy seruats will doe as my lorde commandeth:
26 Our childre, our wiues, our sheepe, & al our cattell shall remaine there in
the cities of Gilead,
27 But thy seruants will goe euery one armed to warre before the Lorde for to
fight, as my lorde saith.
28 So concerning them, Moses commanded Eleazar the Priest, and Ioshua the sonne
of Nun, and the chiefe fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel:
29 And Moses said vnto them, If the children of Gad, and the children of Reuben,
will go with you ouer Iorden, all armed to fight before the Lord, then when the
land is subdued before you, ye shall giue the the lad of Gilead for a possessio:
30 But if they will not goe ouer with you armed, then they shall haue their
possessions amog you in the land of Canaan.
31 And the children of Gad, and the children of Reuben answered, saying, As the
Lorde hath said vnto thy seruants, so will we doe.
32 We will goe armed before the Lorde into the lande of Canaan: that the
possession of our inheritance may be to vs on this side Iorden.
33 So Moses gaue vnto them, euen to the children of Gad, and to the children of
Reuben, and to halfe the tribe of Manasseh the sonne of Ioseph, the kingdome of
Sihon King of the Amorites, and the kingdome of Og King of Bashan, the lande
with the cities thereof & coastes, euen the cities of the countrey round about.
34 Then the children of Gad built Dibon, and Ataroth, and Aroer,
35 And Atroth, Shophan, and Iazer, and Iogbehah,
36 And Beth-nimrah, and Beth-haran, defenced cities: also sheepe foldes.
37 And the children of Reuben built Heshbon, and Elealeh, and Kiriathaim,
38 And Nebo, and Baal-meon, and turned their names, and Shibmah: and gaue other
names vnto the cities which they built.
39 And the children of Machir the sonne of Manasseh went to Gilead, and tooke
it, and put out the Amorites that dwelt therein.
40 Then Moses gaue Gilead vnto Machir the sonne of Manasseh, and he dwelt
therein.
41 And Iair the sonne of Manasseh went and tooke the small townes thereof, and
called them Hauoth Iair.
42 Also Nobah went and tooke Kenath, with the villages thereof and called it
Nobah, after his owne name.

Chapter 33

1 These are the iourneyes of the children of Israel, which went out of the land
of Egypt according to their bands vnder the hand of Moses and Aaron.
2 And Moses wrote their going out by their iourneies according to ye
commandement of the Lord: so these are ye iourneies of their going out.
3 Nowe they departed from Rameses the first moneth, euen the fifteenth day of
the first moneth, on the morowe after the Passeouer: and the children of Israel
went out with an hie hand in the sight of all the Egyptians.
4 (For the Egyptians buried all their first borne, which the Lord had smitten
among them: vpon their gods also the Lord did execution.)
5 And the children of Israel remoued from Rameses, and pitched in Succoth.
6 And they departed from Succoth, and pitched in Etham, which is in the edge of
the wildernesse.
7 And they remoued from Etham, and turned againe vnto Pi-hahiroth, which is
before Baal-zephon, and pitched before Migdol.
8 And they departed from before Hahiroth, and went through the middes of the Sea
into the wildernesse, and went three dayes iourney in the wildernesse of Etham,
and pitched in Marah.
9 And they remoued from Marah, and came vnto Elim, and in Elim were twelue
fountaines of water, and seuentie palme trees, and they pitched there.
10 And they remoued from Elim, and camped by the red Sea.
11 And they remoued from the red Sea, and lay in the wildernesse of Sin.
12 And they tooke their iourney out of the wildernesse of Sin, and set vp their
tentes in Dophkah.
13 And they departed from Dophkah, and lay in Alush.
14 And they remoued from Alush, and lay in Rephidim, where was no water for the
people to drinke.
15 And they departed from Rephidim, and pitched in the wildernesse of Sinai.
16 And they remoued from the desert of Sinai, and pitched in Kibroth Hattaauah.
17 And they departed from Kibroth Hattaauah, and lay at Hazeroth.
18 And they departed from Hazeroth, and pitched in Rithmah.
19 And they departed from Rithmah, and pitched at Rimmon Parez.
20 And they departed from Rimmon Parez, and pitched in Libnah.
21 And they remoued from Libnah, and pitched in Rissah.
22 And they iourneyed from Rissah, and pitched in Kehelathah.
23 And they went from Kehelathah, and pitched in mount Shapher.
24 And they remoued from mount Shapher, and lay in Haradah.
25 And they remoued from Haradah, and pitched in Makheloth.
26 And they remoued from Makheloth, and lay in Tahath.
27 And they departed from Tahath, and pitched in Tarah.
28 And they remoued from Tarah, and pitched in Mithkah.
29 And they went from Mithkah, and pitched in Hashmonah.
30 And they departed from Hashmonah, and lay in Moseroth.
31 And they departed from Moseroth, and pitched in Bene-iaakan.
32 And they remoued from Bene-iaakan, and lay in Hor-hagidgad.
33 And they went from Hor-hagidgad, and pitched in Iotbathah.
34 And they remoued from Iotbathah, and lay in Ebronah.
35 And they departed from Ebronah, & lay in Ezion-gaber.
36 And they remoued from Ezion-gaber, and pitched in the wildernesse of Zin,
which is Kadesh.
37 And they remooued from Kadesh, and pitched in mount Hor, in the edge of the
land of Edom.
38 (And Aaron the Priest went vp into mount Hor, at the commandement of the
Lord, and died there, in the fourtieth yeere after the children of Israel were
come out of the lande of Egypt, in the first day of the fifth moneth.
39 And Aaron was an hundreth, and three and twentie yeere olde, when hee dyed in
mount Hor.
40 And King Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the South of the land of Canaan,
heard of the comming of the children of Israel)
41 And they departed from mount Hor, & pitched in Zalmonah.
42 And they departed from Zalmonah, and pitched in Punon.
43 And they departed from Punon, and pitched in Oboth.
44 And they departed from Oboth, and pitched in Iie-abarim, in the borders of
Moab.
45 And they departed from Iim, and pitched in Dibon-gad.
46 And they remooued from Dibon-gad, and lay in Almon-diblathaim.
47 And they remooued from Almon-diblathaim, and pitched in the mountaines of
Abarim before Nebo.
48 And they departed from the mountaines of Abarim, and pitched in the plaine of
Moab, by Iorden toward Iericho.
49 And they pitched by Iorden, from Bethieshimoth vnto Abel-shittim in the
playne of Moab.
50 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses in the playne of Moab, by Iorden towarde
Iericho, saying,
51 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When ye are come ouer
Iorden to enter into the land of Canaan,
52 Ye shall then driue out all the inhabitants of the land before you, and
destroy all their pictures, and breake asunder all their images of metall, and
plucke downe all their hie places.
53 And ye shall possesse the lande and dwell therein: for I haue giue you ye
land to possesse it.
54 And ye shall inherite the land by lot according to your families: to the more
yee shall giue more inheritance, and to the fewer the lesse inheritance. Where
the lot shall fall to any man, that shall be his: according to the tribes of
your fathers shall ye inherite.
55 But if ye will not driue out the inhabitants of the land before you, then
those which yee let ramaine of them, shalbe prickes in your eyes, and thornes in
your sides, and shall vexe you in the land wherein ye dwell.
56 Moreouer, it shal come to passe, that I shal doe vnto you, as I thought to do
vnto them.

Chapter 34

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses, saying,
2 Commande the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When yee come into the
land of Canaan, this is the land that shall fall vnto your inheritance: that is,
the land of Canaan with the coastes thereof.
3 And your Southquarter shalbe from the wildernesse of Zin to the borders of
Edom: so that your Southquarter shall be from the salt Sea coast Eastwarde:
4 And the border shall compasse you from the South to Maaleh-akrabbim, and reach
to Zin, and goe out from the South to Kadesh-barnea: thence it shal stretch to
Hazar-addar, & go along to Azmon.
5 And the border shall compasse from Azmon vnto the riuer of Egypt, and shall
goe out to the Sea.
6 And your Westquarter shall bee the great Sea: euen that border shalbe your
Westcoast.
7 And this shall bee your Northquarter: yee shall marke out your border from the
great Sea vnto mount Hor.
8 From mount Hor ye shall point out till it come vnto Hamath, and the end of the
coast shal be at Zedad.
9 And the coast shall reach out to Ziphron, & goe out at Hazar-enan. this shalbe
your Northquarter.
10 And ye shall marke out your Eastquarter from Hazar-enan to Shepham.
11 And the coast shall goe downe from Shepham to Riblah, and from the Eastside
of Ain: and the same border shall descend and goe out at the side of the sea of
Chinnereth Eastward.
12 Also that border shall goe downe to Iorden, & leaue at the salt Sea. this
shalbe your land with the coastes thereof round about.
13 Then Moses commaunded the children of Israel, saying, This is the lande which
yee shall inherite by lot, which the Lord commaunded to giue vnto nine tribes
and halfe the tribe.
14 For the tribe of the children of Reuben, according to the housholdes of their
fathers, and the tribe of the children of Gad, according to their fathers
housholdes, and halfe the tribe of Manasseh, haue receiued their inheritance.
15 Two tribes and an halfe tribe haue receiued their inheritance on this side of
Iorden toward Iericho full East.
16 Againe the Lord spake to Moses, saying,
17 These are the names of the men which shall deuide ye land vnto you: Eleazar
the Priest, and Ioshua the sonne of Nun.
18 And ye shall take also a prince of euerie tribe to deuide the land.
19 The names also of the men are these: Of the tribe of Iudah, Caleb ye sonne of
Iephunneh.
20 And of the tribe of the sonnes of Simeon, Shemuel the sonne of Ammihud.
21 Of the tribe of Beniamin, Elidad the sonne of Chislon.
22 Also of the tribe of the sonnes of Dan, the prince Bukki, the sonne of Iogli.
23 Of the sonnes of Ioseph: of the tribe of the sonnes of Manasseh, the prince
Hanniel the sonne of Ephod.
24 And of the tribe of the sonnes of Ephraim, the prince Kemuel, the sonne of
Shiphtan.
25 Of the tribe also of the sonnes of Zebulun, the prince Elizaphan, the sonne
of Parnach.
26 So of the tribe of the sonnes of Issachar, the prince Paltiel the sonne of
Azzan.
27 Of the tribe also of the sonnes of Asher, the prince Ahihud, the sonne of
Shelomi.
28 And of the tribe of the sonnes of Naphtali, the prince Pedahel, the sonne of
Ammihud.
29 These are they, whome the Lord commanded to deuide the inheritance vnto the
children of Israel, in the land of Canaan.

Chapter 35

1 And the Lord spake vnto Moses in the plaine of Moab by Iorden, toward Iericho,
saying,
2 Commande ye children of Israel, that they giue vnto the Leuites of the
inheritace of their possession, cities to dwell in: yee shall giue also vnto the
Leuites the suburbes of the cities round about them.
3 So they shall haue the cities to dwell in, & their suburbes shall be for their
cattell, and for their substance, and for all their beasts.
4 And the suburbes of the cities, which ye shal giue vnto the Leuites, from the
wall of the citie outward, shalbe a thousand cubites round about.
5 And yee shall measure without the citie of the Eastside, two thousand cubites:
and of the Southside, two thousand cubites: & of the Westside, two thousand
cubites: & of ye Northside, two thousand cubites: & the citie shalbe in ye
middes. this shalbe the measure of the suburbes of their cities.
6 And of the cities which yee shall giue vnto the Leuites, there shalbe sixe
cities for refuge, which ye shal appoint, that he which killeth, may flee
thither: and to them yee shall adde two and fourtie cities mo.
7 All the cities which yee shall giue to the Leuites, shalbe eight and fourtie
cities: them shal ye giue with their suburbes.
8 And concerning the cities which yee shall giue, of the possession of the
children of Israel: of many ye shall take mo, and of few ye shall take lesse:
euery one shall giue of his cities vnto the Leuites, according to his
inheritance, which hee inheriteth.
9 And the Lorde spake vnto Moses, saying,
10 Speake vnto the children of Israel, and say vnto them, When ye be come ouer
Iorden into the land of Canaan,
11 Ye shall appoint you cities, to bee cities of refuge for you, that the
slayer, which slayeth any person vnwares, may flee thither.
12 And these cities shalbe for you a refuge fro the auenger, that he which
killeth, die not, vntill he stand before the Congregation in iudgement.
13 And of the cities which ye shall giue, sixe cities shall ye haue for refuge.
14 Ye shall appoint three on this side Iorden, and ye shall appoint three cities
in the lande of Canaan which shalbe cities of refuge.
15 These six cities shalbe a refuge for the children of Israel, and for the
stranger, and for him that dwelleth among you, that euery one which killeth any
person vnwares, may flee thither.
16 And if one smite another with an instrument of yron that hee die, hee is a
murtherer, and the murtherer shall die the death.
17 Also if hee smite him by casting a stone, wherewith hee may be slaine, and he
die, hee is a murtherer, and the murtherer shall die the death.
18 Or if he smite him with an hand weapon of wood, wherewith he may be slaine,
if he die, he is a murtherer, and the murtherer shall die the death.
19 The reuenger of the blood himselfe shall slay the murtherer: when he meeteth
him, he shall slay him.
20 But if hee thrust him of hate, or hurle at him by laying of wait, that he
die,
21 Or smite him through enimitie with his hand, that he die, he that smote him
shal die ye death: for hee is a murtherer: the reuenger of the blood shall slay
the murtherer when he meeteth him.
22 But if he pusshed him vnaduisedly, and not of hatred, or cast vpon him any
thing, without laying of waite,
23 Or any stone (whereby he might be slaine) and sawe him not, or caused it to
fall vpon him, and he die, and was not his enemie, neither sought him any harme,
24 Then the Congregation shall iudge betweene the slayer and the auenger of
blood according to these lawes.
25 And the Congregation shall deliuer the slayer out of the hande of the auenger
of blood, and the Congregation shall restore him vnto the citie of his refuge,
whither hee was fled: and hee shal abide there vnto the death of the hie Priest,
which is anointed with the holy oyle.
26 But if the slayer come without the borders of the citie of his refuge,
whither he was fled,
27 And the reuenger of blood finde him without the borders of the citie of his
refuge, & the reueger of blood slay ye murtherer, he shalbe giltles,
28 Because he should haue remained in the citie of his refuge, vntill the death
of the hie Priest: and after the death of the hie Priest, the slayer shal
returne vnto the land of his possession.
29 So these thinges shall be a lawe of iudgement vnto you, throughout your
generations in all your dwellings.
30 Whosoeuer killeth any person, the Iudge shall slay the murtherer, through
witnesses: but one witnesse shall not testifie against a person to cause him to
die.
31 Moreouer ye shall take no recompense for the life of the murtherer, which is
worthy to die: but he shalbe put to death.
32 Also ye shall take no recompense for him that is fled to the citie of his
refuge, that he should come againe, and dwell in the lande, before the death of
the hie Priest.
33 So ye shall not pollute the land wherein ye shall dwell: for blood defileth
the land: and the land cannot be clensed of the blood that is shed therein, but
by the blood of him that shed it.
34 Defile not therefore the lande which yee shall inhabite, For I dwell in the
middes thereof: for I the Lord dwel among the children of Israel.

Chapter 36

1 Then the chiefe fathers of the familie of the sonnes of Gilead, the sonne of
Machir, the sonne of Manasseh, of the families of the sones of Ioseph, came, &
spake before Moses, & before the princes, the chiefe fathers of the children of
Israel,
2 And saide, The Lorde commaunded my lord to giue the land to inherit by lot to
the children of Israel: and my lord was commaunded by the Lorde, to giue the
inheritance of Zelophehad our brother vnto his daughters.
3 If they bee married to any of the sonnes of the other tribes of the children
of Israel, then shall their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of
our fathers, and shalbe put vnto the inheritance of the tribe whereof they
shalbe: so shall it be taken away from the lot of our inheritance.
4 Also when the Iubile of the children of Israel commeth, then shall their
inheritance be put vnto the inheritance of the tribe whereof they shall be: so
shall their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of the tribe of our
fathers.
5 Then Moses commaunded the children of Israel, according to the word of the
Lord, saying, The tribe of the sonnes of Ioseph haue said well.
6 This is the thing that the Lorde hath commaunded, concerning the daughters of
Zelophehad, saying, They shall be wiues, to whome they thinke best, onely to the
familie of the tribe of their father shall they marry:
7 So shall not the inheritance of the children of Israel remoue from tribe to
tribe, for euery one of the children of Israel shal ioyne himselfe to the
inheritance of the tribe of his fathers.
8 And euery daughter that possesseth any inheritance of the tribes of the
children of Israel, shalbe wife vnto one of the familie of the tribe of her
father: that the children of Israel may enioye euery man the inheritance of
their fathers.
9 Neither shal the inheritance go about from tribe to tribe: but euery one of
the tribes of the childre of Israel shal sticke to his own inheritace.
10 As the Lord commanded Moses, so did the daughters of Zelophehad.
11 For Mahlah, Tirzah, & Hoglah, and Milcah, and Noah the daughters of
Zelophehad were married vnto their fathers brothers sonnes,
12 They were wiues to certaine of the families of the sonnes of Manasseh the
sonne of Ioseph: so their inheritance remained in the tribe of the familie of
their father.
13 These are the commandements and lawes which the Lord commanded by the hand of
Moses, vnto the children of Israel in the plaine of Moab, by Iorden toward
Iericho.
